
Vladimir Lenin

Two Tactics of Social-Democracy in the Democratic Revolution

.................................................

Preface

 

 

In a revolutionary period it is very difficult to keep abreast of
events, which provide an astonishing amount of new material for an
evaluation of the tactical slogans of revolutionary parties. The present
pamphlet was written before the Odessa events.^([1]) We have already
pointed out in the Proletary^([4]) (No. 9—“Revolution Teaches”)^([2])
that these events have forced even those Social-Democrats who created
the “uprising-as-a-process” theory and who rejected propaganda for a
provisional revolutionary government actually to pass over, or begin to
pass over, to the side of their opponents. Revolution undoubtedly
teaches with a rapidity and thoroughness which appear incredible in
peaceful periods of political development. And, what is particularly
important, it teaches not only the leaders, but the masses as well.

There is not the slightest doubt that the revolution will teach
social-democratism to the masses of the workers in Russia. The
revolution will confirm the program and tactics of Social-Democracy in
actual practice, by demonstrating the true nature of the various classes
of society, by demonstrating the bourgeois character of our democracy
and the real aspirations of the peasantry, who, while being
revolutionary in the bourgeois-democratic sense, harbour not the idea of
“socialisation,” but of a new class struggle between the peasant
bourgeoisie and the rural proletariat. The old illusions of the old
Narodism, which are so clearly visible, for instance, in the draft
programme of the “Socialist-Revolutionary Party”^([5]) on the question
of the development of capitalism in Russia, the question of the
democratic character of our “society” and the question of the
significance of a complete victory of a peasant uprising—all these
illusions will be mercilessly and completely blown to the winds by the
revolution. For the first time it will give the various classes their
real political baptism. These classes will emerge from the revolution
with a definite political physiognomy, for they will have revealed
themselves, not only in the programs and tactical slogans of their
ideologists, but also in the open political action of the masses.

Undoubtedly, the revolution will teach us, and will teach the masses of
the people. But the question that now confronts a militant political
party is: shall we be able to teach the revolution anything? shall we be
able to make use of the correctness of our Social-Democratic doctrine,
of our bond with the only thoroughly revolutionary class, the
proletariat, to put a proletarian imprint on the revolution, to carry
the revolution to a real and decisive victory, not in word but indeed,
and to paralyse the instability, half-heartedness and treachery of the
democratic bourgeoisie?

It is to this end that we must direct all our efforts, and the
achievement of it will depend, on the one hand, on the accuracy of our
appraisal of the political situation, on the correctness of our tactical
slogans, and, on the other hand, on whether these slogans will be backed
by the real fighting strength of the masses of the workers. All the
usual, regular, current work of all the organisations and groups of our
Party, the work of propaganda, agitation and organisation, is directed
towards strengthening and expanding the ties with the masses. This work
is always necessary; but in a revolutionary period less than in any
other can it be considered sufficient. At such a time the working class
feels an instinctive urge for open revolutionary action, and we must
learn to set the aims of this action correctly, and then make these aims
as widely known and understood as possible. It must not be forgotten
that the current pessimism about our ties with the masses very often
serves as a screen for bourgeois ideas regarding the role of the
proletariat in the revolution. Undoubtedly, we still have a great deal
to do to educate and organise the working class; but the whole question
now is: where should the main political emphasis in this work of
education and of organisation be placed? On the trade unions and legally
existing societies, or on armed insurrection, on the work of creating a
revolutionary army and a revolutionary government? Both serve to educate
and organise the working class. Both are, of course, necessary. But the
whole question now, in the present revolution, amounts to this: what is
to be emphasised in the work of educating and organising the working
class, the former or the latter?

The outcome of the revolution depends on whether the working class will
play the part of a subsidiary to the bourgeoisie, a subsidiary that is
powerful in the force of its onslaught against the autocracy but
impotent politically, or whether it will play the part of leader of the
people’s revolution. The more intelligent representatives of the
bourgeoisie are perfectly aware of this. That is precisely why the
Osvobozhdeniye^([6]) praises Akimovism, Economism in Social-Democracy,
the trend, which is _now_ placing the trade unions and the legally
existing societies in the forefront. That is precisely why Mr. Struve
welcomes (in the _Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 72) the Akimovist trends in the
principles of the new _Iskra_. That is why he comes down so heavily on
the detested revolutionary narrowness of the decisions of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party.

It is exceptionally important at the present time for Social-Democracy
to have correct tactical slogans for leading the masses. There is
nothing more dangerous in a revolutionary period than belittling the
importance of tactical slogans that are sound in principle. For example,
the [Menshevik] _Iskra_^([7]) in No. 104, actually passes over to the
side of its opponents in the Social-Democratic movement, and yet, at the
same time, disparages the importance of slogans and tactical decisions
that are in front of the times and indicate the path along which the
movement is proceeding, with a number of failures, errors, etc. On the
contrary, the working out of correct tactical decisions is of immense
importance for a party which, in the spirit of the sound principles of
Marxism, desires to lead the proletariat and not merely to drag at the
tail of events. In the resolutions of the Third Congress of the Russian
Social-Democratic Labour Party and of the Conference of the section
which has seceded from the Party,^([3]) we have the most precise, most
carefully thought-out, and most complete expression of tactical
views—views not casually expressed by individual writers, but accepted
by the responsible representatives of the Social-Democratic proletariat.
Our Party is in advance of all the others, for it has a precise program,
accepted by all. It must also set the other parties an example of strict
adherence to its tactical resolutions, in contradistinction to the
opportunism of the democratic bourgeoisie of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ and
the revolutionary phrase-mongering of the Socialist-Revolutionaries, who
only during the revolution suddenly thought of coming for ward with a
“draft” of a program and of investigating for the first time whether it
is a bourgeois revolution that is going on in front of their eyes.

That is why we think it a most urgent task of the revolutionary
Social-Democrats to study carefully the tactical resolutions of the
Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party and of the
Conference, to define what deviations there are in them from the
principles of Marxism, and to get a clear understanding of the concrete
tasks of the Social-Democratic proletariat in a democratic revolution.
It is to this task that the present pamphlet is devoted. The testing of
our tactics from the standpoint of the principles of Marxism and of the
lessons of the revolution is also necessary for those who really desire
to pave the way for unity of tactics as a basis for the future complete
unity of the whole Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party, and not to
confine themselves solely to verbal admonitions.

N. Lenin

July 1905

Notes

 

^([1]) The reference is to the mutiny on the armoured cruiser
Potemkin.^([8]) (Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–_Ed_.) —_Lenin_

^([2]) See p. 148 of this volume.–Ed.—_Lenin_

^([3]) The Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party
(held in London in May 1905) was attended only by Bolsheviks, while in
the “Conference” (held in Geneva at the same time) only Mensheviks
participated. In the present pamphlet the latter are frequently referred
to as “new _Iskra-ists_” because while continuing to publish the _Iskra_
they declared, through their then adherent, Trotsky, that there was a
gulf between the old and the new _Iskra_. (Author’s note to the 1907
edition.–Ed.) —_Lenin_

^([8]) PLACEHOLDER

^([4]) PLACEHOLDER

^([5]) PLACEHOLDER

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

1. An Urgent Political Question

 

 

At the present revolutionary juncture the question of the convocation of
a popular constituent assembly is on the order of the day. Opinions are
divided on the point as to how this question should be solved. Three
political trends are to be observed. The tsarist government admits the
necessity of convening representatives of the people, but it does not
want under any circumstances to permit their assembly to be a popular
and a constituent assembly. It seems willing to agree, if we are to
believe the newspaper reports on the work of the Bulygin
Commission,^([2]) to an advisory assembly, to be elected without freedom
to conduct agitation, and on the basis of restricted qualifications or a
restricted class system. The revolutionary proletariat, inasmuch as it
is led by the Social-Democratic Party, demands complete transfer of
power to a constituent assembly, and for this purpose strives to obtain
not only universal suffrage and complete freedom to conduct agitation,
but also the immediate overthrow of the tsarist government and its
replacement by a provisional revolutionary government. Finally, the
liberal bourgeoisie, expressing its wishes through the leaders of the
so-called “Constitutional-Democratic Party”,^([3]) does not demand the
overthrow of the tsarist government, does not advance the slogan of a
provisional government and does not insist on real guarantees that the
elections will be absolutely free and fair and that the assembly of
representatives will be a genuinely popular and a genuinely constituent
assembly. As a matter of fact, the liberal bourgeoisie, the only serious
social support of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ trend, is striving to effect as
peaceful a deal as possible between the tsar and the revolutionary
people, a deal, moreover, that would give a maximum of power to itself,
the bourgeoisie, and a minimum to the revolutionary people—the
proletariat and the peasantry.

Such is the political situation at the present time. Such are the three
main political trends, corresponding to the three main social forces in
contemporary Russia. We have already shown on more than one occasion (in
the _Proletary_, Nos. 3, 4, 5)^([1]) how the _Osvobozhdentsi_ use
pseudo-democratic phrases to cover up their half-hearted, or, to put it
more bluntly and plainly, their treacherous, perfidious policy towards
the revolution. Let us now see how the Social-Democrats appraise the
tasks of the moment. Excellent material for this purpose is provided by
the two resolutions that were passed quite recently by the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party and by the
“Conference” of the section which has seceded from the Party. The
question as to which of these resolutions more correctly appraises the
political situation and more correctly defines the tactics of the
revolutionary proletariat is of enormous importance, and every
Social-Democrat who is anxious to fulfil his duties as a propagandist,
agitator and organiser intelligently, must study this question with the
closest attention, leaving all irrelevant considerations entirely aside.

By the Party’s tactics we mean the Party’s political conduct, or the
character, the direction and methods of its political activity. Tactical
resolutions are adopted by Party congresses in order precisely to define
the political conduct of the Party as a whole with regard to new tasks,
or in view of a new political situation. Such a new situation has been
created by the revolution that has started in Russia, i.e., the
complete, resolute and open rupture between the overwhelming majority of
the people and the tsarist government. The new question concerns the
practical methods to be adopted in convening a genuinely popular and
genuinely constituent assembly (the theoretical question concerning such
an assembly was officially settled by Social-Democracy long ago, before
all other parties, in its Party program). Since the people have broken
with the government, and the masses realise the necessity of setting up
a new order, the party which set itself the object of overthrowing the
government must necessarily consider what government to put up in place
of the old, deposed government. A new question concerning a provisional
revolutionary government arises. In order to give a complete answer to
this question the Party of the class-conscious proletariat must make
clear: 1) the _significance_ of a provisional revolutionary government
in the revolution that is now going on and in the entire struggle of the
proletariat in general; 2) its _attitude_ towards a provisional
revolutionary government; 3) the precise conditions of Social-Democratic
_participation_ in this government; 4) the conditions under which
pressure is to be brought to bear on this government _from below_, i.e.,
in the event of there being no Social-Democrats in it. Only after all
these questions are made clear, will the political conduct of the Party
in this sphere be principled, clear and firm.

Let us now consider how the resolution of the Third Congress of the
Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party answers these questions. The
following is the full text of the resolution:

“_Resolution on a Provisional Revolutionary Government_

“Whereas:

“1) both the direct interests of the proletariat and the interests of
its struggle for the final aims of socialism require the fullest
possible measure of political liberty and, consequently, the replacement
of the autocratic form of government by a democratic republic;

“2) the establishment of a democratic republic in Russia is possible
only as a result of a victorious popular insurrection whose organ will
be a provisional revolutionary government, which alone will be capable
of ensuring complete freedom of agitation during the election campaign
and of convening a constituent assembly that will really express the
will of the people, an assembly elected on the basis of universal and
equal suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot;

“3) under the present social and economic order this democratic
revolution in Russia will not weaken, but strengthen the rule of the
bourgeoisie, which at a certain moment will inevitably try, stopping at
nothing, to take away from the Russian proletariat as many of the gains
of the revolutionary period as possible:

“The Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party
resolves that:

“a) that it is necessary to disseminate among the working class a
concrete idea of the most probable course of the revolution and of the
necessity, at a certain moment in the revolution, for the appearance of
a provisional revolutionary government, from which the proletariat will
demand the realisation of all the immediate political and economic
demands contained in our program (the minimum program);

“b) that subject to the relation of forces, and other factors which
cannot be exactly determined beforehand, representatives of our Party
may participate in the provisional revolutionary government for the
purpose of relentless struggle against all counter-revolutionary
attempts and of the defence of the independent interests of the working
class;

“c) that an indispensable condition for such participation is that the
Party should exercise strict control over its representatives and that
the independence of the Social-Democratic Party, which is striving for a
complete socialist revolution and, consequently, is irreconcilably
hostile to all bourgeois parties, should be strictly maintained;

“d) that irrespective whether the participation of Social-Democrats in
the provisional revolutionary government prove possible or not, we must
propagate among the broadest masses of the proletariat the necessity for
permanent pressure to be brought to bear upon the provisional government
by the armed proletariat, led by the Social-Democratic Party, for the
purpose of defending, consolidating and extending the gains of the
revolution.”

Notes

 

^([1]) “Revolutionary Struggle and Liberal Brokerage”, 1905: “The
Democratic Tasks of the Revolutionary Proletariat”, 1905 and “The First
Steps of Bourgeois Betrayal”, 1905. See present edition, Volume 8, pp.
486-94, 511-25–_Ed_.—_Lenin_

^([2]) PLACEHOLDER

^([3]) PLACEHOLDER

 

2. What Can We Learn From the Resolution of the Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. on a Provisional Revolutionary Government?

 

 

As is evident from the title, the resolution of the Third Congress of
the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party, is devoted wholly and
exclusively to the question of a provisional revolutionary government.
Hence, the participation of Social-Democrats in a provisional
revolutionary government is included in it as part of that question. On
the other hand, it deals only with a provisional revolutionary
government and with nothing else; consequently, it completely leaves
out, for example, the question of the “conquest of power” in general,
etc. Was the Congress right in eliminating this and similar questions?
Undoubtedly it was right, because the political situation in Russia does
not at all give rise to such questions as immediate issues. On the
contrary, the whole of the issue that has been raised by the people at
the present time is the overthrow of the autocracy and the convocation
of a constituent assembly. Party congresses should take up and decide
not issues which this or that writer happened to mention , but those
that are of vital political importance by reason of the prevailing
conditions and the objective course of social development.

Of what importance is a provisional revolutionary government in the
present revolution, and in the general struggle of the proletariat? The
resolution of the Congress explains this by pointing at the very outset
to the need for the “fullest possible measure of political liberty,”
both from the standpoint of the immediate interests of the proletariat
and from the standpoint of the “final aims of Socialism.” And complete
political liberty requires that the tsarist autocracy be replaced by a
democratic republic, as our Party program has already recognised. The
stress laid in the Congress resolution on the slogan of a democratic
republic is necessary both as a matter of logic and in point of
principle, for it is precisely complete freedom that the proletariat, as
the foremost champion of democracy, is striving to attain. Moreover, it
is all the more advisable to stress this at the present time because
right now the monarchists, namely, the so-called
constitutional-“democratic” party, or party of “liberation,” in our
country, are flying the flag of “democracy.” In order to establish a
republic it is absolutely necessary to have an assembly of people’s
representatives; and it must be a popular (elected on the basis of
universal and equal suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot), and a
constituent assembly. This exactly what is recognised in the Congress
resolution, further on. But the resolution does not stop there. In order
to establish the new order “that will really express the will of the
people” it is not enough to call a representative assembly a constituent
assembly. This assembly must have the authority and power to
“constitute.” Taking this into consideration, the resolution of the
Congress does not confine itself to the formal slogan of a “constituent
assembly,” but adds the material conditions which alone will enable that
assembly really to carry out its tasks. Such specification of the
conditions that will enable an assembly which is constituent in name to
become constituent in fact is imperatively necessary, for, as we have
pointed out more than once, the liberal bourgeoisie, as represented by
the Constitutional-Monarchist Party, is deliberately distorting the
slogan of a popular constituent assembly and reducing it to a hollow
phrase.

The Congress resolution states that a provisional revolutionary
government _on its own_ — one, moreover, that will be the organ of a
victorious popular insurrection — can secure full freedom of agitation
in the election campaign and convene an assembly that will really
express the will of the people. Is this postulate correct? Whoever took
it into his head to dispute it would have to assert that it is possible
for the tsarist government not to side with the reaction, that it is
capable of being neutral during the elections, that it will see to it
that the will of the people is really expressed. Such assertions are so
absurd that no one would venture to defend them openly; but they are
being surreptitiously smuggled in under liberal colours, by our
liberationists. Somebody must convene the constituent assembly, somebody
must guarantee the freedom and fairness of the elections; somebody must
invest such an assembly with full power and authority. Only a
revolutionary government, which is the organ of the insurrection, can
desire this in all sincerity and be capable of doing all that is
required to achieve this. The tsarist government will inevitably
counteract this. A liberal government, which will come to terms with the
tsar, and which does not rely in full on the popular uprising, cannot
sincerely desire this, and could not accomplish it even if it most
sincerely desired to. Therefore, the resolution of the Congress gives
the only correct and entirely consistent democratic slogan.

But an appraisal of a provisional revolutionary government’s
significance would be incomplete and wrong if the class nature of the
democratic revolution were lost sight of. The resolution therefore adds
that the revolution will strengthen the rule of the bourgeoisie. This is
inevitable under the present, i.e., capitalist, social and economic
system. And the strengthening of the bourgeoisie’s rule over the
proletariat which has secured some measure of political liberty must
inevitably lead to a desperate struggle between them for power, must
lead to desperate attempts on the part of the bourgeoisie “to take away
from the proletariat the gains of the revolutionary period.” Therefore
the proletariat, which is fighting for democracy in front of all and at
the head of all, must not for a single moment forget about the new
antagonisms that are inherent in bourgeois democracy and about the new
struggle.

Thus, the section of the resolution which we have just reviewed fully
appraises the significance of a provisional revolutionary government in
its relation to the struggle for freedom and for a republic, in its
relation to a constituent assembly and in its relation to the democratic
revolution, which clears the ground for a new class struggle.

The next question is that of the proletariat’s attitude in general
towards a provisional revolutionary government. The Congress resolution
answers this first of all by directly advising the Party to spread among
the working class the conviction that a provisional revolutionary
government is necessary. The working class must be made aware of this
necessity. Whereas the “democratic” bourgeoisie leaves the question of
overthrowing the tsarist government in the shade, we must push it to the
fore and insist on the need for a provisional revolutionary government.
More than that, we must outline for such a government a program of
action that will conform with the objective conditions of the historic
period through which we are now passing and with the aims of proletarian
democracy. This program is the _entire_ minimum program of our Party,
the program of the immediate political and economic reforms which, on
the one hand, can be fully realised on the basis of the existing social
and economic relationships and, on the other hand, are requisite for the
next step forward, for the achievement of Socialism.

Thus, the resolution fully clearly defines the nature and aims of a
provisional revolutionary government. In its origin and fundamental
nature such a government must be the organ of the popular insurrection.
Its formal purpose must be to serve as the instrument for convening a
popular constituent assembly. The content of its activities must be to
put into effect the minimum program of proletarian democracy, the only
program capable of safeguarding the interests of the people which has
risen against the autocracy.

It might be argued that being only provisional, a provisional government
cannot carry out a constructive program which has not yet received the
approval of the entire people. Such an argument would merely be the
sophistry of reactionaries and “absolutists.” To abstain from carrying
out a constructive program means tolerating the existence of the feudal
regime of the putrid autocracy. Such a regime could be tolerated only by
a government of traitors to the cause of the revolution, but not by a
government which is the organ of a popular insurrection. It would be
mockery for anyone to propose that we should refrain from exercising
freedom of assembly pending the confirmation of such freedom by a
constituent assembly, on the plea that the constituent assembly might
not confirm freedom of assembly! It is equal mockery to object to the
immediate execution of the minimum program by a provisional
revolutionary government.

Finally, we will note that the resolution, by making implementation of
the minimum program provisional revolutionary government’s task
eliminates the absurd, semi-anarchist ideas about giving immediate
effect to the maximum program, and the conquest of power for a socialist
revolution. The degree of economic development of Russia (an objective
condition) and the degree of class consciousness and organisation of the
broad masses of the proletariat (a subjective condition inseparably
connected with the objective condition) make the immediate complete
emancipation of the working class impossible. Only the most ignorant
people can ignore the bourgeois nature of the democratic revolution
which is now taking place; only the most naive optimists can forget how
little as yet the masses of the workers are informed about the aims of
Socialism and about the methods of achieving it. And we are all
convinced that the emancipation of the workers can be effected only by
the workers themselves; a socialist revolution is out of the question
unless the masses become class conscious and organised, trained and
educated in open class struggle against the entire bourgeoisie. In
answer to the anarchist objections that we are putting off the socialist
revolution, we say: we are not putting it off, but we are taking the
first step towards it in the only possible way, along the only correct
road, namely, the road of a democratic republic. Whoever wants to reach
Socialism by a different road, other than that of political democracy,
will inevitably arrive at conclusions that are absurd and reactionary
both in the economic and the political sense. If any workers ask us at
the given moment why we should not go ahead and carry out our maximum
program, we shall answer by pointing out how far the masses of the
democratically-minded people still are from Socialism, how undeveloped
class antagonisms still are, how unorganised the proletarians still are.
Organise hundreds of thousands of workers all over Russia; enlist the
sympathy of millions for our program! Try to do this without confining
yourselves to high-sounding but hollow anarchist phrases—and you will
see at once that in order to achieve this organisation, in order to
spread this socialist enlightenment, we must achieve the fullest
possible measure of democratic reforms.

Let us continue. Once we are clear about the importance of a provisional
revolutionary government and the attitude of the proletariat toward it,
the following question arises: is it permissible for us to participate
in it (action from above) and, if so, under what conditions? What should
be our action from below? The resolution supplies precise answers to
both these questions. It emphatically declares that it is _permissible_
in principle for Social-Democrats to participate in a provisional
revolutionary government (during the period of a democratic revolution,
the period of struggle for a republic). By this declaration we once and
for all dissociate ourselves both from the anarchists, who answer this
question in the negative on principle, and from the _khvostists_ among
the Social-Democrats (like Martynov and the new _Iskra_-ists) who have
_tried to frighten_ us with the prospect of a situation wherein it might
prove necessary for us to participate in such a government. By this
declaration the Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour
Party rejected, once and for all, the idea expressed by the new _Iskra_
that the participation of Social-Democrats in a provisional
revolutionary government would be a variety of Millerandism,^([1]) that
it is impermissible in principle, as sanctifying the bourgeois order,
etc.

It stands to reason, however, that the question of permissibility in
principle does not solve the question of practical expediency. Under
what conditions is this new form of struggle—the struggle “from above”
recognised by the Party Congress—expedient? It goes without saying that
at the present time it is impossible to speak of concrete conditions,
such as relation of forces, etc., and the resolution, naturally,
refrains from defining these conditions in advance. No intelligent
person would venture at the present time to prophesy anything on this
subject. What we can and must do is determine the nature and aim of our
participation. This is precisely what is done in the resolution, which
points out two objectives of our participation: 1) a relentless struggle
against counter-revolutionary attempts, and 2) the defence of the
independent interests of the working class. At a time when the liberal
bourgeoisie is beginning to talk assiduously about the psychology of
reaction (see Mr. Struve’s most instructive “Open Letter” in the
_Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 71) in an attempt to frighten the revolutionary
people and induce it to show compliance towards the autocracy—at such a
time it is particularly appropriate for the party of the proletariat to
call attention to the task of waging a real war against
counterrevolution. In the final analysis, force alone settles the great
problems of political liberty and the class struggle, and it is our
business to prepare and organise this force and to employ it actively,
not only for defence, but also for attack. The long reign of political
reaction in Europe, which has lasted almost uninterruptedly since the
days of the Paris Commune, has too greatly accustomed us to the idea
that action can proceed only “from below,” has too greatly inured us to
seeing only defensive struggles. We have now, undoubtedly, entered a new
era: a period of political upheavals and revolutions has begun. In a
period such as Russia is passing through at the present time, it is
impermissible to confine ourselves to old, stereotyped formulae. We must
propagate the idea of action from above, we must prepare for the most
energetic, offensive action, and must study the conditions for and forms
of such actions. The Congress resolution puts two of these conditions
into the forefront: one refers to the formal aspect of Social-Democratic
participation in a provisional revolutionary government (strict control
by the Party over its representatives), the other to the very nature of
such participation (never for an instant to lose sight of the aim of
effecting a complete socialist revolution).

Having thus explained from all aspects the Party’s policy with regard to
action “from above”—this new, hitherto almost unprecedented method of
struggle—the resolution also provides for the eventuality that we shall
not be able to act from above. We must exercise pressure on the
provisional revolutionary government from below in any case. In order to
be able to exercise this pressure from below, the proletariat must be
armed—for in a revolutionary situation matters develop with exceptional
rapidity to the stage of open civil war—and must be led by the
Social-Democratic Party. The object of its armed pressure is that of
“defending, consolidating and extending the gains of the revolution,”
i.e., those gains which from the standpoint of the interests of the
proletariat must consist in the fulfilment of the whole of our minimum
program.

With this we conclude our brief analysis of the resolution of the Third
Congress on a provisional revolutionary government. As the reader can
see, the resolution explains the importance of this new question, the
attitude of the Party of the proletariat toward it, and the policy the
Party must pursue both inside a provisional revolutionary government and
outside of it.

Let us now consider the corresponding resolution of the “Conference.”

Notes

 

^([1]) PLACEHOLDER

 

3. What Is A “Decisive Victory of the Revolution Over Tsarism”?

 

 

The resolution of the “Conference” is devoted to the question: “_The
conquest of power and participation in a provisional government_.”^([1])
As we have already pointed out, the very manner in which the question is
presented betrays confusion. On the one hand, the question is presented
in a narrow way: it deals only with our participation in a provisional
government and not with the Party’s tasks in regard to a provisional
revolutionary government in general. On the other hand, two totally
different questions are confused, viz., the question of our
participation at one of the stages of the _democratic_ revolution, and
the question of the _socialist_ revolution. Indeed, the “conquest of
power” by Social-Democracy is a socialist revolution, nor can it be
anything else if we use these words in their direct and usually accepted
sense. If, however, we are to understand these words to mean the
conquest of power for a democratic revolution and not for a socialist
revolution, then what is the point in talking not only about
participation in a provisional revolutionary government but also about
the “conquest of power” in general? Obviously our “Conferencers” were
not very clear themselves as to what they should talk about: the
democratic or the socialist revolution. Those who have followed the
literature on this question know that it was Comrade Martynov, in his
notorious _Two Dictatorships_; the new-Iskrists are reluctant to recall
the manner in which this question was presented (even before January
9)^([6]) [the date of Bloody Sunday] in that model of tail-ender
writing. Nevertheless, there can be no doubt that it exerted an
ideological influence on the Conference.

But let us leave the title of the resolution. Its contents reveal
mistakes incomparably more profound and serious. Here is the first part:

  “A decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism may be marked
  either by the establishment of a provisional government, which will
  emerge from a victorious popular insurrection, or by the revolutionary
  initiative of a representative institution of one kind or another,
  which, under direct revolutionary pressure of the people, decides to
  set up a popular constituent assembly.”

Thus, we are told that a decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism
may be marked either by a victorious insurrection, or ... by a decision
of a representative institution to set up a constituent assembly! What
does this mean? How are we to understand it? A decisive victory may be
marked by a “decision” to set up a constituent assembly?? And such a
“victory” is put side by side with the establishment of a provisional
government which will “emerge from a victorious popular insurrection”!!
The Conference failed to note that a _victorious_ popular insurrection
and the _establishment_ of a provisional government would signify the
victory of the revolution _in actual fact_, whereas a “decision” to set
up a constituent assembly would signify a victory of the revolution in
words only.

The Conference of the Mensheviks, or new-_Iskra,_ fell into the very
same error that the liberals, the _Osvobozhdeniye_ are constantly
committing. The _Osvobozhdeniye_ group prattle about a “constituent”
assembly and bashfully shut their eyes to the fact that power and
authority remain in the hands of the tsar, forgetting that in order to
“constitute” one must possess the _power_ to do so. The Conference also
forgot that it is a far cry from a “decision” adopted by
representatives—no matter who they are—to the fulfilment of that
decision. The Conference further forgot that so long as power remained
in the hands of the tsar, all decisions passed by any representatives
whatsoever would remain empty and miserable prattle, as was the case
with the “decisions” of the Frankfurt Parliament, famous in the history
of the German Revolution of 1848. In his _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_^([7])
Marx, the representative of the revolutionary proletariat, castigated
the Frankfurt liberal _Osvobozhdentsi_ with merciless sarcasm precisely
because they uttered fine words, adopted all sorts of democratic
“decisions,” “constituted” all kinds of liberties, while actually they
left power in the hands of the king and failed to organise an armed
struggle against the military forces at the disposal of the king. And
while the Frankfurt _Osvobozbdentsi_ were prattling—the king bided his
time, consolidated his military forces, and the counterrevolution,
relying on real force, utterly routed the democrats with all their fine
“decisions.”

The Conference put on a par with a decisive victory the very thing that
lacks the essential condition of victory. How was it possible for
Social-Democrats who recognise the republican program of our Party to
commit such an error? In order to understand this strange phenomenon we
must turn to the resolution of the Third Congress on the section which
has seceded from the Party.^([2]) This resolution refers to the fact
that various trends “akin to Economism” have survived in our Party. Our
“Conferencers” (it is not for nothing that they are under the
ideological guidance of Martynov) talk of the revolution in exactly the
same way as the Economists talked of the political struggle or the eight
hour day. The Economists immediately gave currency to the “theory of
stages”: 1) the struggle for rights,
2) political agitation,
3) political struggle; or, 1) a ten-hour day,
2) a nine-hour day,
3) an eight-hour day. The results of this “tactics-as-a-process” are
sufficiently well known to all. Now we are invited nicely to divide the
revolution too in advance into the following stages: 1) the tsar
convenes a representative body; 2) this representative body “decides”
under pressure of the “people” to set up a constituent assembly; 3) ...
the Mensheviks have not yet agreed among themselves as to the third
stage; they have forgotten that the revolutionary pressure of the people
will meet with the counter-revolutionary pressure of tsarism and that,
therefore, either the “decision” will remain unfulfilled or the issue
will be decided after all by the victory or the defeat of the popular
insurrection. The resolution of the Conference is an exact reproduction
of the following reasoning of the Economists: a decisive victory of the
workers may be marked either by the realisation of the eight-hour day in
a revolutionary way, or by the grant of a ten-hour day and a “decision”
to go over to a nine-hour day.... the duplication is perfect.

The objection may be made to us that the authors of the resolution did
not mean _to place on a par_ the victory of an insurrection with the
“decision” of a representative institution convened by the tsar, that
they only wanted to provide for the Party’s tactics in either case. To
this our answer would be: 1) The text of the resolution plainly and
unambiguously describes the _decision_ of a representative institution
as “a decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism.” Perhaps that is
the result of careless wording, perhaps it could be corrected after
consulting the minutes, but, so long as it is not corrected, the present
wording can have only one meaning, and this meaning is entirely in
keeping with the _Osvobozhdeniye_ line of reasoning. 2) The
_Osvobozbdeniye_ line of reasoning, into which the authors of the
resolution have drifted, stands out in incomparably greater relief in
other literary productions of the new _Iskra_-ists. For instance, the
organ of the Tiflis Committee, (in the Georgian language; praised by the
_Iskra_ in No. 100), in the article “The Zemsky Sobor^([3]) and Our
Tactics,” Sotsial-Demokrat,^([8]) organ of the Tiflis Committee
(published in the Georgian language; praised by _Iskra_ in No. 100) goes
so far as to say that the “Tactics” “which make the Zemsky Sobor the
centre of our activities” (about the convocation of which, we may add,
nothing definite is known as yet!) “_are more advantageous for us_” than
the “tactics” of armed insurrection and the establishment of a
provisional revolutionary government. We shall refer to this article
again further on. 3) No objection can be made to a preliminary
discussion of what tactics the Party should adopt in the event of the
victory of the revolution as well as in the event of its defeat, in the
event of a successful insurrection as well as in the event of the
insurrection failing to develop into a serious force. It is possible
that the tsarist government will succeed in convening a representative
assembly for the purpose of coming to terms with the liberal
bourgeoisie; providing for that eventuality, the resolution of the Third
Congress speaks plainly about “hypocritical policy,” “pseudo democracy,”
“a travesty of popular representation, something like the so-called
Zemsky Sobor.”^([4]) But the whole point is that this is not said in the
resolution on a provisional revolutionary government, for it has nothing
to do with a provisional revolutionary government. This eventuality
defers the problem of the insurrection and of the establishment of a
provisional revolutionary government; it alters this problem, etc. The
point in question now is not that all kinds of combinations are
possible, that both victory and defeat are possible, that there may be
direct or circuitous paths; the point is that it is impermissible for a
Social-Democrat to cause confusion in the minds of the workers
concerning the genuinely revolutionary path, that it is impermissible,
to describe in the _Osvobozhdeniye_ manner, as a decisive victory that
which lacks the main requisite for victory. It is possible that we shall
win even the eight-hour day, not at one stroke, but only by a long and
roundabout way; but what would you say of a man who calls such
impotence, such weakness as renders the proletariat _incapable_ of
counteracting procrastination, delays, haggling, treachery and reaction,
a victory for the workers? It is possible that the Russian revolution
will end in an “abortive constitution,” as was once stated in the
_Vperyod_,^([5]) but can this justify a Social-Democrat, who on the eve
of a decisive struggle would call this abortion a “decisive victory over
tsarism”? It is possible that, at the worst, not only will we not win a
republic, but that even the constitution we will get will be an illusory
one, a constitution “_à la_ Shipov”,^([9]) but would it be pardonable
for a Social-Democrat to obscure our slogan of a republic?

Of course the new-Iskraists have not as yet gone so far as to obscure
it. But the degree to which the revolutionary spirit has fled from them,
the degree to which lifeless pedantry has blinded them to the militant
tasks of the moment is most vividly shown by the fact that in their
resolution they, of all things, forgot to say a word about the republic.
It is incredible, but it is a fact. All the slogans of Social-Democracy
were endorsed, repeated, explained and presented in detail in the
various resolutions of the Conference—even the election of shop stewards
and deputies by the workers was not forgotten, but in a resolution on a
provisional revolutionary government they simply did not find occasion
to mention the republic. To talk of the “victory” of the people’s
insurrection, of the establishment of a provisional government, and not
to indicate what relation these “steps” and acts have to the winning of
a republic—means writing a resolution not for the guidance of the
proletarian struggle, but for the purpose of hobbling along at the tail
end of the proletarian movement.

To sum up: the first part of the resolution 1) gave no explanation
whatever of the significance of a provisional revolutionary government
from the standpoint of the struggle for a republic and of securing a
genuinely popular and genuinely constituent assembly; 2) confused the
democratic consciousness of the proletariat by placing on a par with a
decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism a state of affairs in
which precisely the main requisite for a real victory is lacking.

Notes

 

^([1]) The full text of this resolution can be reconstructed by the
reader from the quotations given on pp. 400, 403, 407, 431, and 433 of
the pamphlet. (Author’s note to the 1907 edition. See pp. 32-33, 38-39,
44, 78, 82 of this volume.–Ed.) —_Lenin_

^([2]) We cite this resolution in full. “The Congress places on record
that since the time of the Party’s fight against Economism, certain
trends have survived in the R.S.D.L.P. which, in various degrees and
respects, are akin to Economism and which betray a common tendency to
belittle the importance of the elements of consciousness in the
proletarian struggle, and to subordinate it to the element of
spontaneity. On questions of organisation, the representatives of these
trends put forward, in theory, the organisation-as-a-process principle,
which is out of harmony with methodical Party work, while in practice
they systematically deviate from Party discipline in very many cases,
and in other cases preach to the least enlightened section of the Party
the idea of a wide application of the elective principle, without taking
into consideration the objective conditions of Russian life, and so
strive to undermine the only basis for Party ties that is possible at
the present time. In tactical questions they betray a striving to narrow
the scope of Party work, declaring their opposition to the Party
pursuing completely independent tactics in relation to the
liberal-bourgeois parties, denying that it is possible and desirable for
our Party to assume the role of organiser in the people’s insurrection
and opposing the participation of the Party in a provisional democratic
revolutionary government under any conditions whatsoever.

“The Congress instructs all Party members everywhere to conduct an
energetic ideological struggle against such partial deviations from the
principles of revolutionary Social-Democracy; at the same time, however,
it is of the opinion that persons who share such views to any degree may
belong to Party organisations on the indispensable condition that they
recognise the Party congresses and the Party Rules and wholly submit to
Party discipline.” (Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–Ed.) —_Lenin_

^([3]) National Assembly.–Ed.—_Lenin_

^([4]) The following is the text of this resolution on the attitude
towards the tactics of the government on the eve of the revolution:

“Whereas for purposes of self-preservation the government during the
present revolutionary period, while intensifying the usual measures of
repression directed mainly against the class-conscious elements of the
proletariat, at the same time 1) tries by means of concessions and
promises of reform to corrupt the working class politically and thereby
to divert it from the revolutionary struggle; 2) with the same object
clothes its hypocritical policy of concessions in pseudo-democratic
forms, beginning with an invitation to the workers to elect their
representatives to commissions and conferences and ending with the
establishment of a travesty of popular representation, something like
the so-called Zemsky Sobor; 3) organises the so-called Black
Hundreds^([10]) and incites against the revolution all those elements of
the people in general who are reactionary, ignorant or blinded by racial
or religious hatred:

“The Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. resolves to call on all Party
organisations:

“a) while exposing the reactionary purpose of the government’s
concessions, to emphasise in their propaganda and agitation the fact
that, on the one hand, these concessions were granted under compulsion,
and, on the other, that it is absolutely impossible for the autocracy to
grant reforms satisfactory to the proletariat;

“b) taking advantage of the election campaign, to explain to the  
workers the real significance of the government’s measures and to show
that it is necessary for the proletariat to convene by revolutionary
means a constituent assembly on the basis of universal and equal
suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot;

“c) to organise the proletariat for the immediate realisation, in a
revolutionary way, of the eight-hour working day and of the other
immediate demands of the working class;

“d) to organise armed resistance to the actions of the Black Hundreds,
and generally, of all reactionary elements led by the government.”
(Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–Ed.) —_Lenin_

^([5]) The newspaper _Vperyod_, published in Geneva, began to appear in
January 1905 as the organ of the Bolshevik section of the Party. From
January to May, eighteen issues appeared. After May, by virtue of the
decision of the Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour
Party, the _Proletary_ was issued in place of the _Vperyod_ as the
central organ of the R.S.D.L.P. (This Congress took place in London May,
the Mensheviks did not appear; they organised their own “Conference” in
Geneva.) (Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–Ed.) —_Lenin_

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

^([8]) PLACEHOLDER

^([10]) PLACEHOLDER

^([9]) A constitution à La Shipov — Lenin’s name for the draft of state
structure drawn up by D. Shipov, a moderate liberal leader of the
Zemstvos’ Right wing. In an attempt to curb the sweep of the revolution
and also to obtain certain concessions from the tsarist government in
favour of the Zemstvos, Shipov proposed the creation of an advisory
representative body under the tsar. By a deal of this kind the moderate
liberals wanted to preserve the monarchy, while winning certain
political rights for themselves.

 

4. The Abolition of the Monarchist System and the Republic

 

 

Let us go over to the next section of the resolution: “...in either case
such a victory will inaugurate a new phase in the revolutionary epoch.

  “The final abolition of the whole regime of the monarchy and the
  social estates in the process of mutual struggle between the elements
  of politically emancipated bourgeois society for the satisfaction of
  their social interests and for the direct acquisition of power—such is
  the task in this new phase which the objective conditions of social
  development spontaneously evoke.

  “Therefore, a provisional government that would under take to carry
  out the tasks of this revolution, bourgeois in its historical nature,
  would, in regulating the mutual struggle between antagonistic classes
  of a nation in the process of emancipation, not only have to advance
  revolutionary development, but also to combat factors in that
  development threatening the foundations of the capitalist system.”

Let us examine this section which forms an independent part of the
resolution. The basic idea in the arguments quoted above coincides with
the one set forth in the third clause of the Congress resolution.
However, collation of these parts of the two resolutions will at once
reveal the following radical difference between them. The Congress
resolution, which briefly describes the social and economic basis of the
revolution, concentrates attention entirely on the clear-cut struggle of
classes for definite gains, and places in the fore front the militant
tasks of the proletariat. The resolution of the Conference, which
carries a long, nebulous, and confused description of the socio-economic
basis of the revolution, speaks very vaguely about a struggle for
definite gains. and leaves the militant tasks of the proletariat
completely in the background. The resolution of the Conference speaks of
the old order in the process of mutual struggle among the various
elements of society. The Congress resolution says that we, the party of
the proletariat, must effect this abolition; that only establishment of
a democratic republic signifies genuine abolition of the old order; that
we must win that republic; that we shall fight for it and for complete
liberty, not only against the autocracy, but also against the
bourgeoisie, when it attempts (and it will surely do so) to wrest our
gains from us. The Congress resolution calls on a definite class to wage
a struggle for a precisely defined immediate aim. The Conference
resolution discourses on the mutual struggle of various forces. One
resolution expresses the psychology of active struggle, the other that
of the passive onlooker; one resounds with the call for live action, the
other is steeped in lifeless pedantry. Both resolutions state that the
present revolution is only our first step, which will be followed by a
second; but from this, one resolution draws the conclusion that we must
take this first step all the sooner, get it over all the sooner, win a
republic, mercilessly crush the counter-revolution, and prepare the
ground for the second step. The other resolution, however, oozes, so to
speak, with verbose descriptions of the first step and (excuse the crude
expression) simply masticates it. The Congress resolution takes the old,
yet eternally new, ideas of Marxism (the bourgeois nature of a
democratic revolution) as a preface or first premise, whence it draws
conclusions as to the progressive tasks of the progressive class, which
is fighting both for the democratic and for the socialist revolution.
The Conference resolution does not go beyond the preface, chewing it
over and over again, and trying to be clever about it.

This is the very distinction which has long divided the Russian Marxists
into two wings: the moralising and the militant wings of the old days of
“legal Marxism”, and the economic and political wings of the period of
the nascent mass movement. From the correct Marxist premise concerning
the deep economic roots of the class struggle in general and of the
political struggle in particular, the Economists have drawn the singular
conclusion that we must turn our backs on the political struggle and
retard its development, narrow its scope, and reduce its aims. The
political wing, on the contrary, has drawn a different conclusion from
these same premises, namely, that the deeper the roots of our present
struggle, the more widely, the more boldly, the more resolutely, and
with greater initiative must we wage this struggle. We have the very
same controversy before us now, only under different circumstances and
in a different form. From the premises that a democratic revolution is
far from being a socialist revolution, that the poor and needy are by no
means the only ones to be “interested” in it, that it is deeply rooted
in the inescapable needs and requirements of the _whole_ of bourgeois
society—from these premises we draw the conclusion that the advanced
class must formulate its democratic aims all the more boldly, express
them all the more sharply and completely, put forward the immediate
slogan of a republic, and popularise the idea of the need to establish a
provisional revolutionary government and to crush the counter revolution
ruthlessly. Our opponents, the _new-Iskra_ group, however, deduce from
these very same premises that the democratic conclusions should not be
expressed fully, that the republic may be omitted from the practical
slogans, that we can refrain from popularising the idea of the need for
a provisional revolutionary government, that a mere decision to convene
a constituent assembly can be termed a decisive victory, that there is
no need to advance the task of combating counter-revolution as our
active aim, so that it may be submerged in a nebulous (and, as we shall
presently see, wrongly formulated) reference to a “process of mutual
struggle”. This is not the language of political leaders, but of archive
fogeys.

The more closely one examines the various formulations in the resolution
of the _new-Iskra_ group, the clearer its aforementioned basic features
become. We are told, for in stance, of a “process of mutual struggle
between the elements of politically emancipated bourgeois society”.
Bearing in mind the subject this resolution deals with (a provisional
revolutionary government) one asks in astonishment, “If you are
referring to the process of mutual struggle, how can you keep silent
about the elements which are politically _enslaving_ bourgeois society?
Do the ’conferees’ really imagine that, since they have assumed the
revolution will be victorious, these elements have already disappeared?”
Such an idea would be absurd in general and an expression of the
greatest political naíveté and political short-sightedness in
particular. After the revolution’s victory over counter revolution the
latter will not disappear; on the contrary, it will inevitably start a
new and even more desperate struggle. Since the purpose of our
resolution is to analyse the tasks that will confront us when the
revolution is victorious, it is our duty to devote tremendous attention
to the tasks of repelling counter-revolutionary attacks (as is done in
the Congress resolution), and not to submerge these immediate, urgent,
and vital political tasks of a militant party in general discussions on
what will happen _after_ the present revolutionary period, or what will
happen when a “politically _emancipated_ society” already exists. Just
as the Economists would, by repeating the truism that politics are
subordinated to economics, cover up their incapacity to understand
urgent political tasks, so the new_Iskra_-ists, by repeating the general
truism that struggles will take place in a politically _emancipated_
society, cover up their failure to understand the urgent revolutionary
tasks of the political _emancipation_ of this society.

Take the expression “the final abolition of the whole regime of social
estates and the monarchy.” In plain language, the final abolition of the
monarchist system means the establishment of a democratic republic. But
our good Martynov and his admirers think that this expression is far too
simple and clear. They insist on rendering it “more profound” and saying
it more “cleverly.” As a result, we get, on the one hand, ridiculous and
vain efforts to appear profound; on the other hand, we get a description
instead of a slogan, a sort of melancholy looking backward instead of a
stirring appeal to march forward. We get the impression, not of living
people eager to fight for a republic here and now, but of fossilised
mummies who, _sub specie aeternitatis_,^([1]) consider the question from
the standpoint of _plusquamperfectum_ viewpoint.

Let us proceed further: “... the provisional government ... would
undertake to carry out the tasks of this ... bourgeois revolution.”
...Here we see at once the result of the fact that our “Conferencers”
have overlooked a concrete question which confronts the political
leaders of the proletariat. The concrete question of a provisional
revolutionary government was obscured from their field of vision by the
question of the future series of governments which will carry out the
aims of the bourgeois revolution in general. If you want to consider the
question “historically,” the example of any European country will show
you that it was a series of governments, not by any means “provisional,”
that carried out the historical aims of the bourgeois revolution, that
even the governments which defeated the revolution were nonetheless
forced to carry out the historical aims of that defeated revolution. But
what is called a “provisional revolutionary government” is something
altogether different from what you are referring to: that is the name
given to the government of a revolutionary epoch, which directly
replaces the overthrown government and rests on the insurrection of the
people, and not on some kind of representative institutions coming from
the people. A provisional revolutionary government is the organ of
struggle for the immediate victory of the revolution, for immediately
repelling counter-revolutionary attempts, and not by any means an organ
for carrying out the historical aims of the bourgeois revolution in
general. Gentlemen, let us leave it to the future historians of a future
Russkaya Starina^([2]) to determine exactly what aims of the bourgeois
revolution we, or this or that government, shall have achieved—there
will be time enough to do that thirty years from now; at present we must
put forward slogans and give practical directives for the struggle for a
republic and for the proletariat’s most active participation in this
struggle.

For the reasons stated, the final propositions in the forgoing section
of the resolution which we have quoted above are also unsatisfactory.
The expression that the provisional government would have to “regulate”
the mutual struggle among the antagonistic classes is exceedingly inapt,
or at any rate awkwardly put; Marxists should not use such liberal,
_Osvobozhdeniye_ formulations, which lead one to believe that it is
possible to have governments which serve not as organs of the class
struggle but as its “regulators”. . . . The government would “not only
have to push revolutionary development further forward but also fight
against those of its factors which threaten the foundations of the
capitalist system.” But it is the proletariat, the very same in whose
name the resolution is speaking, that constitutes this “factor”! Instead
of indicating just how the proletariat should “push revolutionary
development further forward” at the present time (push it further than
the constitutionalist bourgeois would care to go), instead of advice to
prepare definite ways and means of combating the bourgeoisie when the
latter turns against the conquests of the revolution, we are offered a
general description of a process, which does not say a word about the
concrete aims of _our_ activity. The new _Iskra_-ist method of
expressing its views reminds one of Marx’s opinion (in his famous
“theses” on Feuerbach) of the old materialism, which was alien to the
ideas of dialectics. The philosophers have only _interpreted_ the world,
in various ways, said Marx, the point, however, is to _change_ it.^([3])
Similarly, the new-Iskraists can give a tolerable description and
explanation of the process of struggle which is taking place before
their eyes, but they are altogether incapable of giving a correct slogan
for this struggle. Good marchers but bad leaders, they belittle the
materialist conception of history by ignoring the active, leading and
guiding part in history which can and must be played by parties that
understand the material prerequisites of a revolution and that have
placed themselves at the head of the progressive classes.

Notes

^([1]) From the viewpoint of eternity (Latin).—_Ed_.

^([2]) PLACEHOLDER

^([3]) PLACEHOLDER

 

5. How Should “The Revolution Be Pushed Forward”?

Let us quote the next section of the resolution:

  “Under such conditions, Social-Democracy must strive to maintain
  during the whole course of the revolution, a position which will best
  of all secure for it the possibility of pushing the revolution
  forward, which will not tie the hands of Social-Democracy in its
  struggle against the inconsistent and self-seeking policy of the
  bourgeois parties and which will preserve it from being merged in
  bourgeois democracy.

  “Therefore, Social-Democracy must not set itself the aim of seizing or
  sharing power in the provisional government, but must remain the party
  of extreme revolutionary opposition.”

The advice to occupy a position which best ensures the possibility of
advancing the revolution pleases us very much indeed. We would only
desire that this piece of good advice should be accompanied by a direct
indication as to how Social-Democracy should further advance the
revolution right now, in the present political situation, in a period of
rumours, conjectures, and talk and schemes about the convocation of the
people’s representatives. Can the revolution now be further advanced by
those who fail to understand the danger of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ theory
of “compromise” between the people and the tsar, by those who call a
mere “decision” to convene a constituent assembly a victory, who do not
set themselves the task of carrying on active propaganda of the idea of
the need for a provisional revolutionary government, or who leave the
slogan of a democratic republic in the background? Such people actually
_pull the revolution back,_ because, as far as _practical politics_ are
concerned, they have stopped at the level of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ stand.
What is the use of their recognising a programme which demands that the
autocracy be replaced by a republic, if in a resolution on tactics that
defines the Party’s present and immediate tasks in the period of
revolution they omit the slogan of a struggle for a republic? It is the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ position, the position of the constitutionalist
bourgeoisie, that is now actually characterised by the fact that a
decision to convene a popular constituent assembly is considered a
decisive victory, while a prudent silence is maintained on the subject
of a provisional revolutionary government and a republic! To _advance_
the revolution, to take it beyond the limits to which the monarchist
bourgeoisie advances it, it is necessary actively to produce, emphasise,
and bring into the forefront slogans that will _preclude_ the
“inconsistency” of bourgeois democracy. At present there are _only two_
such slogans: 1) a provisional revolutionary government, and 2) a
republic, because the slogan of a popular constituent assembly _has been
accepted_ by the monarchist bourgeoisie (see the programme of the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ League) and accepted for the very purpose of
devitalising the revolution, preventing its complete victory, and
enabling the big bourgeoisie to strike a huckster’s bargain with
tsarism. And now we see that of the two slogans, which alone are capable
of advancing the revolution, the Conference completely forgot the slogan
of a republic, and plainly put the slogan of a provisional revolutionary
government on a par with the _Osvobozhdeniye_ slogan of a popular
constituent assembly, calling both the one and the other “a decisive
victory of the revolution”!!

Indeed, such is the undoubted fact, which, we are sure, will serve as a
landmark for the future historian of Russian Social-Democracy. The
Conference of Social-Democrats held in May 1905 passed a resolution
which contains fine words about the necessity of advancing the
democratic revolution, but in fact pulls it back and goes no farther
than the democratic slogans of the monarchist bourgeoisie.

The new_-Iskra_ group likes to accuse us of ignoring the danger of the
proletariat becoming dissolved in bourgeois democracy. We should like to
see the person who would undertake to prove this charge on the basis of
the text of the resolutions passed by the Third Congress of the Russian
Social-Democratic Labour Party. Our reply to our opponents is—a
Social-Democratic Party which operates in a bourgeois society cannot
take part in politics without marching, in certain cases, _side by side_
with bourgeois democracy. The difference between us in this respect is
that we march side by side with the revolutionary and republican
bourgeoisie, without merging with it, whereas you march side by side
with the _liberal and the monarchist bourgeoisie,_ without merging with
it either. _That is how matters stand._

The tactical slogans you have formulated in the name of the Conference
coincide with the slogans of the “Constitutional-Democratic” Party,
i.e., _the party of the monarchist bourgeoisie;_ moreover, you have not
even noticed or realised this coincidence, thus actually following in
the _wake_ of the _Osvobozhdeniye fraternity._

The tactical slogans we have formulated in the name of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party coincide with the
slogans of the democratic-revolutionary and republican bourgeoisie. In
Russia this bourgeoisie and petty bourgeoisie have not yet formed
themselves into a big people’s party.^([1]) But only one who is utterly
ignorant of what is now taking place in Russia can doubt that elements
of such a party exist. We intend to guide (if the great Russian
revolution makes progress) not only the proletariat, organised by the
Social-Democratic Party, but also this petty bourgeoisie, which is
capable of marching side by side with us.

Through its resolution the Conference unconsciously _descends_ to the
level of the liberal and monarchist bourgeoisie. The Party Congress in
its resolution consciously _raises_ to its own level those elements of
the revolutionary democracy that are capable of waging a struggle and
not of acting as brokers.

Such elements are mostly to be found among the peasants. In classifying
the big social groups according to their political tendencies we can,
without danger of serious error, identify revolutionary and republican
democracy with the mass of the peasants—of course, in the same sense and
with the same reservations and implied conditions as we can identify the
working class with Social-Democracy. In other words, we can also
formulate our conclusions in the following terms: in a revolutionary
period the Conference in its _national-wide_^([2]) _political_ slogans
unconsciously _descends to the level of the mass of the landlords_. The
Party Congress in its national political slogans _raises the peasant
masses to the revolutionary level_. We challenge anyone who because of
this conclusion may accuse us of evincing a penchant for paradoxes, to
refute the proposition that if we are not strong enough to bring the
revolution to a successful conclusion, if the revolution terminates in a
“decisive victory” in the _Osvobozhdentsi_ sense, i.e., exclusively in
the form of a representative assembly convened by the tsar, which could
be called a constituent assembly only in derision—then this will be a
revolution in which the _landlord and big bourgeois_ element will
preponderate. On the other hand, if we are destined to live through a
really great revolution, if history prevents a “miscarriage” this time,
if we are strong enough to carry the revolution to a successful
conclusion, to a decisive victory, not in the _Osvobozhdeniye_ or the
new _Iskra_ sense of the word, then it will be a revolution in which the
peasant and proletarian element will preponderate.

Some people may, perhaps, interpret our admission that such a
preponderance is possible as a renunciation of the view that the
impending revolution will be bourgeois in character. This is very
likely, considering how this concept is misused in the _Iskra_. For this
reason it will not be at all superfluous to dwell on this question.

Notes

^([1]) The Socialist-Revolutionaries are a terrorist group of
intellectuals rather than the embryo of such a party, although the
objective significance of this group’s activities can be reduced to this
very task of achieving the aims of the revolutionary and republican
bourgeoisie. —_Lenin_

^([2]) We are not referring here to the special peasant slogans which
were dealt with in separate resolutions. —_Lenin_

 

6. From what Direction is the Proletariat Threatened with the Danger of Having its Hands Tied in the Struggle Against the Inconsistent Bourgeoisie?

Marxists are absolutely convinced of the bourgeois character of the
Russian revolution. What does this mean? It means that the democratic
reforms in the political system and the social and economic reforms,
which have become a necessity for Russia, do not in themselves imply the
undermining of capitalism, the undermining of bourgeois rule; on the
contrary, they will, for the first time, really clear the ground for a
wide and rapid, European, and not Asiatic, development of capitalism;
they will, for the first time, make it possible for the bourgeoisie to
rule as a class. The Socialist-Revolutionaries cannot grasp this idea,
for they are ignorant of the rudiments of the laws of development of
commodity and capitalist production; they fail to see that even the
complete success of a peasant insurrection, even the redistribution of
the whole of the land for the benefit of the peasants and in accordance
with their desires (“Black Redistribution” or something of that kind),
will not destroy capitalism at all, but will, on the contrary, give an
impetus to its development and hasten the class disintegration of the
peasantry itself. The failure to grasp this truth makes the
Socialist-Revolutionaries unconscious ideologists of the petty
bourgeoisie. Insistence on this truth is of enormous importance for
Social-Democracy, not only from the theoretical standpoint but also from
the standpoint of practical politics, for from it follows that the
complete class independence of the party of the proletariat in the
present “general democratic” movement is obligatory.

But it does not at all follow from this that a _democratic_ revolution
(bourgeois in its social and economic substance) is not of _enormous_
interest for the proletariat. It does not at all follow from this that
the democratic revolution cannot take place in a form advantageous
mainly to the big capitalist, the financial magnate and the
“enlightened” landlord, as well as in a form advantageous to the peasant
and to the worker.

The new-Iskraists thoroughly misunderstand the meaning and significance
of the category: bourgeois revolution. Through their arguments there
constantly runs the idea that a bourgeois revolution is a revolution
which can be advantageous only to the bourgeoisie. And yet nothing is
more erroneous than such an idea. A bourgeois revolution is a revolution
which does not go beyond the limits of the bourgeois, i.e., capitalist,
social and economic system. A bourgeois revolution expresses the need
for the development of capitalism, and far from destroying the
foundations of capitalism, it does the opposite, it broadens and deepens
them. This revolution therefore expresses the interests not only of the
working class, but of the entire bourgeoisie as well. Since the rule of
the bourgeoisie over the working class is inevitable under capitalism,
it is quite correct to say that a bourgeois revolution expresses the
interests not so much of the proletariat as of the bourgeoisie. But it
is entirely absurd to think that a bourgeois revolution does not express
the interests of the proletariat at all. This absurd idea boils down
either to the hoary Narodnik theory that a bourgeois revolution runs
counter to the interests of the proletariat, and that therefore we do
not need bourgeois political liberty; or to anarchism, which rejects all
participation of the proletariat in bourgeois politics, in a bourgeois
revolution and in bourgeois parliamentarism. From the standpoint of
theory, this idea disregards the elementary propositions of Marxism
concerning the inevitability of capitalist development where commodity
production exists. Marxism teaches that a society which is based on
commodity production, and which has commercial intercourse with
civilised capitalist nations, at a certain stage of its development,
itself, inevitably takes the road of capitalism. Marxism has irrevocably
broken with the ravings of the Narodniks and the anarchists to the
effect that Russia, for instance, can avoid capitalist development, jump
out of capitalism, or skip over it and proceed along some path other
than the path of the class struggle on the basis and within the
framework of this same capitalism.

All these principles of Marxism have been proved and explained over and
over again in minute detail in general and with regard to Russia in
particular. And from these principles it follows that the idea of
seeking salvation for the working class in anything save the further
development of capitalism is _reactionary_. In countries like Russia,
the working class suffers not so much from capitalism as from the
insufficient development of capitalism. The working class suffers not so
much from capitalism as from the insufficient development of capitalism.
The working class is therefore _decidedly interested_ in the broadest,
freest and most rapid development of capitalism. The removal of all the
remnants of the old order which are hampering the broad, free and rapid
development of capitalism is of decided advantage to the working class.
The bourgeois revolution is precisely a revolution that most resolutely
sweeps away the survivals of the past, the remnants of serfdom (which
include not only autocracy but monarchy as well) and most fully
guarantees the broadest, freest and most rapid development of
capitalism.

That is why a _bourgeois_ revolution is _in the highest degree
advantageous to the proletariat_. A bourgeois revolution is _absolutely_
necessary in the interests of the proletariat. The more complete and
determined, the more consistent the bourgeois revolution, the more
assured will be the proletarian struggle against the bourgeoisie for
Socialism. Only those who are ignorant of the rudiments of scientific
Socialism can regard this conclusion as new or strange, paradoxical. And
from this conclusion, among other things, follows the thesis that, _in a
certain sense_, a bourgeois revolution is _more advantageous_ to the
proletariat than to the bourgeoisie. This thesis is unquestionably
correct in the following sense: it is to the advantage of the
bourgeoisie to rely on certain remnants of the past as against the
proletariat, for instance, on the monarchy, the standing army, etc. It
is to the advantage of the bourgeoisie if the bourgeois revolution does
not too resolutely sweep away all the remnants of the past, but leaves
some of them, i.e., if this revolution is not fully consistent, if it is
not complete and if it is not determined and relentless.
Social-Democrats often express this idea somewhat differently by stating
that the bourgeoisie betrays its own self, that the bourgeoisie betrays
the cause of liberty, that the bourgeoisie is incapable of being
consistently democratic. It is of greater advantage to the bourgeoisie
if the necessary changes in the direction of bourgeois democracy take
place more slowly, more gradually, more cautiously, less resolutely, by
means of reforms and not by means of revolution; if these changes spare
the “venerable” institutions of serfdom (such as the monarchy) as much
as possible; if these changes develop as little as possible the
independent revolutionary activity, initiative and energy of the common
people, i.e., the peasantry and especially the workers, for otherwise it
will be easier for the workers, as the French say, “to hitch the rifle
from one shoulder to the other,” i.e., to turn against the bourgeoisie
the guns which the bourgeois revolution will place in their hands, the
liberty which the revolution will bring, the democratic institutions
which will spring up on the ground that is cleared of serfdom.

On the other hand, it is more advantageous for the working class if the
necessary changes in the direction of bourgeois democracy take place by
way of revolution and not by way of reform; for the way of reform is the
way of delay, of procrastination, of the painfully slow decomposition of
the putrid parts of the national organism. It is the proletariat and the
peasantry that suffer first of all and most of all from their
putrefaction. The revolutionary way is the way of quick amputation,
which is the least painful to the proletariat, the way of the direct
removal of the decomposing parts, the way of fewest concessions to and
least consideration for the monarchy and the disgusting, vile, rotten
and contaminating institutions which go with it.

So it is not only because of the censorship, not only “for fear of the
Jews,” that our bourgeois-liberal press deplores the possibility of a
revolutionary way, is afraid of revolution, tries to frighten the tsar
with the bogey of revolution, is anxious to avoid revolution, grovels
and toadies for the sake of miserable reforms as a basis for a reformist
way. This standpoint is shared not only by the Russkiye Vedomosti,^([5])
Syn Otechestva,^([6]) Nasha Zhizn^([7]) and Nashi Dni,^([8]) but also by
the illegal, uncensored _Osvobozhdeniye_. The very position the
bourgeoisie occupies as a class in capitalist society inevitably causes
it to be inconsistent in a democratic revolution. The very position the
proletariat occupies as a class compels it to be consistently
democratic. The bourgeoisie looks backward, fearing democratic progress,
which threatens to strengthen the proletariat. The proletariat has
nothing to lose but its chains, but with the aid of democracy it has the
whole world to gain. That is why the more consistent the bourgeois
revolution is in achieving its democratic changes, the less will it
limit itself to what is of advantage exclusively to the bourgeoisie. The
more consistent the bourgeois revolution, the more does it guarantee the
proletariat and the peasantry the benefits accruing from the democratic
revolution.

Marxism teaches the proletarian not to keep aloof from the bourgeois
revolution, not to be indifferent to it, not to allow the leadership of
the revolution to be assumed by the bourgeoisie but, on the contrary, to
take a most energetic part in it, to fight most resolutely for
consistent proletarian democracy, for carrying the revolution to its
conclusion. We cannot jump out of the bourgeois-democratic boundaries of
the Russian revolution, but we can vastly extend these boundaries, and
within these boundaries we can and must fight for the interests of the
proletariat, for its immediate needs and for the conditions that will
make it possible to prepare its forces for the future complete victory.
There is bourgeois democracy and bourgeois democracy. The Zemstvo
monarchist who favours an upper chamber, and who “asks” for universal
suffrage while secretly, on the sly, striking a bargain with tsarism for
a curtailed constitution, is also a bourgeois-democrat. And the peasant
who is fighting, arms in hand, against the landlords and the government
officials and with a “naïve republicanism” proposes “to send the tsar
packing”,^([1]) is also a bourgeois-democrat. There are
bourgeois-democratic regimes like the one in Germany and also in
England, like the one in Austria and also like those in America or
Switzerland. He would be a fine Marxist indeed, who in a period of
democratic revolution failed to see the difference between the degrees
of democracy, the difference of its various forms and confined himself
to “clever” remarks to the effect that, after all, this is “a bourgeois
revolution,” the fruits of a “bourgeois revolution.”

Our new-Iskraists are just such clever fellows flaunting their
shortsightedness. They confine themselves to disquisitions on the
bourgeois character of the revolution just when and where it is
necessary to be able to draw a distinction between
republican-revolutionary and monarchist-liberal bourgeois democracy, to
say nothing of the distinction between inconsistent bourgeois
democratism and consistent proletarian democratism. They are
satisfied—as if they had really become like the “man in the
muffler”^([9])—to converse dolefully about a “process of mutual struggle
of antagonistic classes,” when the question is one of giving _democratic
leadership_ in the present revolution, of emphasising _progressive
democratic_ slogans as distinguished from the treacherous slogans of Mr.
Struve and Co., of bluntly and straight forwardly stating the immediate
aims of the really revolutionary struggle of the proletariat and the
peasantry, as distinguished from the liberal haggling of the landlords
and factory owners. Such now is the gist of the matter, which you,
gentlemen, have missed: will our revolution result in a real, immense
victory, or merely in a wretched deal, will it go so far as the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry, or will it “peter out” in a liberal constitution _à la_
Shipov?

At first sight it may appear that in raising this question we are
deviating entirely from our subject. But this may appear to be so only
at first sight. As a matter of fact, it is precisely this question that
lies at the root of the difference in principle which has already become
clearly marked between the Social-Democratic tactics of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party and the tactics
initiated by the Conference of the new _Iskra_ supporters. The latter
have already taken not two but three steps back, resurrecting the
mistakes of Economism in solving problems that are incomparably more
complex, more important and more vital to the workers’ party, viz.,
questions of its tactics in time of revolution. That is why we must
analyse the question we have raised with all due attention.

The above-quoted section of the new-Iskraists resolution which we have
quoted above points to the danger of Social-Democracy tying its hands in
the struggle against the inconsistent policy of the bourgeoisie, of its
becoming dissolved in bourgeois democracy. The idea of this danger runs
like a thread through all the literature typical of the new _Iskra_, it
is the real pivot of the principle involved in our Party split (ever
since the elements of squabbling in this split were wholly eclipsed by
the elements of a turn towards Economism). And without any equivocation
we admit that this danger really exists, that just at the present time,
at the height of the Russian revolution, this danger has become
particularly grave. The pressing and extremely responsible duty that
devolves on all of us theoreticians or—as I should prefer to say of
myself— publicists of Social-Democracy, is to find out _from what
direction_ this danger actually threatens. For the source of our
disagreement is not a dispute as to whether such a danger exists, but
the dispute as to whether it is caused by the so-called _khvostism_ of
the “Minority” or the so-called revolutionism of the “Majority.”

To remove all misinterpretations and misunderstandings, let us first of
all note that the danger to which we are referring lies not in the
subjective, but in the objective aspect of the matter, not in the formal
position which Social-Democracy will take in the struggle, but in the
material outcome of the entire present revolutionary struggle. The
question is not whether this or that Social-Democratic group will want
to dissolve in bourgeois democracy or whether they are conscious of the
fact that they are merging. Nobody suggests that. We do not suspect any
Social-Democrat of harbouring such a desire, and this is not at all a
question of desires. Nor is it a question of whether this or that
Social-Democratic group will formally retain its separate identity,
individuality and independence of bourgeois democracy throughout the
course of the revolution. They may not only proclaim such “independence”
but even retain it formally, and yet _it may turn out_ that their hands
will nonetheless be tied in the struggle against the inconsistency of
the bourgeoisie. The final political result of the revolution may prove
to be that, in spite of the formal “independence” of Social-Democracy,
in spite of its complete organisational individuality as a separate
party, it will in fact not be independent, it will not be able to put
the imprint of its proletarian independence on the course of events,
will prove so weak that, on the whole and in the last analysis, its
“dissolving” in the bourgeois democracy will nonetheless be a historical
fact.

That is what constitutes the real danger. Now let us see from what
direction the danger threatens: from the fact that Social-Democracy as
represented by the new _Iskra_ is deviating to the Right—as we believe;
or from the fact that Social-Democracy as represented by the “Majority,”
the _Vperyod_, etc., is deviating to the Left—as the new-Iskraists
believe.

The answer to this question, as we have pointed out, depends on the
objective combination of the actions of the various social forces. The
character of these forces has been defined theoretically by the Marxian
analysis of Russian life; at the present time it is being defined in
practice by the open action of groups and classes in the course of the
revolution. Thus, the entire theoretical analysis made by the Marxists
long before the period we are now passing through, as well as all the
practical observations of the development of revolutionary events, show
that from the standpoint of objective conditions there are two possible
courses and outcomes of the revolution in Russia. A change in the
economic and political system in Russia along bourgeois-democratic lines
is inevitable and unavoidable. No power on earth can prevent such a
change. But the combined actions of the existing forces which are
effecting that change may result in one of two things, may bring about
one of two forms of that change. Either 1) the result will be a
“decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism,” or 2) the forces will
be inadequate for a decisive victory and the matter will end in a deal
between tsarism and the most “inconsistent” and most “self-seeking”
elements of the bourgeoisie. By and large all the infinite variety of
detail and combinations, which no one is able to foresee, lead to one or
the other.

Let us now consider these two outcomes, first, from the standpoint of
their social significance and, secondly, from the standpoint of the
position of Social-Democracy (its “dissolving” or “having its hands
tied”) in one or the other case.

What is a “decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism”? We have
already seen that in using this expression the new-Iskraists fail to
grasp even its immediate political significance. Still less do they seem
to understand the class essence of this concept. Surely, we Marxists
must not under any circumstances allow ourselves to be deluded by
_words_ such as “revolution” or “the great Russian revolution,” as do
many revolutionary democrats (of the Gapon type). We must be perfectly
clear in our minds as to what real social forces are opposed to
“tsarism” (which is a real force, perfectly intelligible to all) and are
capable of gaining a “decisive victory” over it. Such a force cannot be
the big bourgeoisie, the landlords, the factory owners, “society” which
follows the lead of the _Osvobozhdentsi_. We see that these do not even
want a decisive victory. We know that owing to their class position they
are incapable of waging a decisive struggle against tsarism; they are
too heavily fettered by private property, capital and land to enter into
a decisive struggle. They need tsarism with its bureaucratic, police and
military forces for use against the proletariat and the peasantry too
much to be able to strive for its destruction. No, the only force
capable of gaining “a decisive victory over tsarism,” is the people,
i.e., the proletariat and the peasantry, if we take the main, big forces
and distribute the rural and urban petty bourgeoisie (also part of “the
people”) between the two. “A decisive victory of the revolution over
tsarism” is the _revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the
proletariat and the peasantry_. Our new-Iskraists cannot escape from
this conclusion, which _Vperyod_ pointed out long ago. No one else is
capable of gaining a decisive victory over tsarism.

And such a victory will be precisely a dictatorship, i.e., it must
inevitably rely on military force, on the arming of the masses, on an
insurrection, and not on institutions of one kind or another,
established in a “lawful” or “peaceful” way. It can be only a
dictatorship, for the realisation of the changes which are urgently and
absolutely indispensable for the proletariat and the peasantry will call
forth the desperate resistance of the landlords, of the big bourgeoisie
and of tsarism. Without a dictatorship it is impossible to break down
that resistance and to repel the counter-revolutionary attempts. But of
course it will be a democratic, not a socialist dictatorship. It will
not be able (without a series of intermediary stages of revolutionary
development) to affect the foundations of capitalism. At best it may
bring about a radical redistribution of landed property in favour of the
peasantry, establish consistent and full democracy including the
formation of a republic, eradicate all the oppressive features of
Asiatic bondage, not only in village but also in factory life, lay the
foundation for a thorough improvement in the position of the workers and
for a rise in their standard of living, and—last but not least—carry the
revolutionary conflagration into Europe. Such a victory will by no means
as yet transform our bourgeois revolution into a socialist revolution;
the democratic revolution will not directly overstep the bounds of
bourgeois social and economic relationships; nevertheless, the
significance of such a victory for the future development of Russia and
of the whole world will be immense. Nothing will raise the revolutionary
energy of the world proletariat so much, nothing will shorten the path
leading to its complete victory to such an extent, as this decisive
victory of the revolution that has now started in Russia.

How far such a victory is probable, is another question. We are not in
the least inclined to be unreasonably optimistic on that score, we do
not for a moment forget the immense difficulties of this task, but since
we are out to fight we must desire victory and be able to point out the
right road to it. Tendencies capable of leading to such a victory
undoubtedly exist. True, our, Social-Democratic, influence on the masses
of the proletariat is as yet very, very inadequate; the revolutionary
influence on the mass of the peasantry is altogether insignificant; the
proletariat, and especially the peasantry, are still frightfully
scattered, backward and ignorant. But revolution unites quickly and
enlightens quickly. Every step in its development rouses the masses and
attracts them with irresistible force to the side of the revolutionary
program, as the only program that fully and consistently expresses their
real and vital interests.

According to a law of mechanics, every action produces an equal
reaction. In history also the destructive force of a revolution is to a
considerable degree dependent on how strong and protracted the
suppression of the striving for liberty had been, and how profound the
contradiction between the antediluvian “superstructure” and the living
forces of the present epoch. The international political situation, too,
is in many respects shaping itself in a way most advantageous for the
Russian revolution. The insurrection of the workers and peasants has
already commenced; it is sporadic, spontaneous, weak, but it
unquestionably and undoubtedly proves the existence of forces capable of
waging a decisive struggle and marching towards a decisive victory.

If these forces prove inadequate, tsarism will have time to conclude the
deal which is already being prepared on two sides, by Messrs. the
Bulygins on the one side, and Messrs. the Struves, on the other. Then
the whole thing will end in a curtailed constitution, or, if the worst
comes to the worst, even in a travesty of a constitution. This will also
be a “bourgeois revolution,” but it will be a miscarriage, a premature
birth, a mongrel. Social-Democracy entertains no illusions on that
score, it knows the treacherous nature of the bourgeoisie, it will not
lose heart or abandon its persistent, patient, sustained work of giving
the proletariat class training even in the most drab, humdrum days of
bourgeois-constitutional, “Shipov” bliss. Such an outcome would be more
or less similar to the outcome of almost all the democratic revolutions
in Europe during the nineteenth century, and our Party development would
then proceed along the difficult, hard, long, but familiar and beaten
track.

The question now arises: in which of these two possible outcomes will
Social-Democracy find its hands actually tied in the fight against the
inconsistent and self-seeking bourgeoisie, find itself actually
“dissolved,” or almost so, in bourgeois democracy?

It is sufficient to put this question clearly to have not a moment’s
difficulty in answering it.

If the bourgeoisie succeeds in frustrating the Russian revolution by
coming to terms with tsarism, Social-Democracy will find its hands
actually tied in the fight against the inconsistent bourgeoisie;
Social-Democracy will find itself dissolved “in bourgeois democracy” in
the sense that the proletariat will not succeed in putting its clear
imprint on the revolution, will not succeed in settling accounts with
tsarism in the proletarian or, as Marx once said, “in the plebeian” way.

If the revolution gains a decisive victory—then we shall settle accounts
with tsarism in the Jacobin, or, if you like, in the plebeian way. “The
whole French terrorism,” wrote Marx in 1848 in the famous _Neue
Rheinische Zeitung_, “was nothing but a plebeian manner of settling
accounts with the enemies of the bourgeoisie, with absolutism, feudalism
and philistinism” (see Marx, _Nachlass_, Mehring’s edition, Volume III,
p. 211).^([10]) Have those people who, in a period of a democratic
revolution, try to frighten the Social-Democratic workers in Russia with
the bogey of “Jacobinism” ever stopped to think of the significance of
these words of Marx?

The Girondists of contemporary Russian Social-Democracy, the new
_Iskra_-ists, do not merge with the _Osvobozhdentsi_, but in point of
fact they, by reason of the nature of their slogans, follow at the tail
of the latter. And the _Osvobozhdentsi_, i.e., the representatives of
the liberal bourgeoisie, wish to settle accounts with the autocracy
gently, in a reformist way, in a yielding manner, so as not to offend
the aristocracy, the nobles, the Court—cautiously, without breaking
anything—kindly and politely, as befits gentlemen in white gloves (like
the ones Mr. Petrunkevich borrowed from a bashi-bazouk to wear at the
reception of “representatives of the people”[?] held by Nicholas the
Bloody^([2]) . See _Proletary_, No. 5^([3]) ).

The Jacobins of contemporary Social-Democracy—the Bolsheviks, the
_Vperyodovtsi_, _Syezdovtsi_, _Proletartsi_ (e.g. supporters of the
_Vperyod_, the “Congress” group, or supporters of _Proletary_) — all
names given to the Bolsheviks, derived from their publication of the two
papers mentioned, and “_Syezdovtsi_” because they convened the Third
Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. or whatever we may call them—wish by their
slogans to raise the revolutionary and republican petty bourgeoisie, and
especially the peasantry, to the level of the consistent democratism of
the proletariat, which fully retains its individuality as a class. They
want the people, i.e., the proletariat and the peasantry, to settle
accounts with the monarchy and the aristocracy in the “plebeian way,”
ruthlessly destroying the enemies of liberty, crushing their resistance
by force, making no concessions whatever to the accursed heritage of
serfdom, of Asiatic barbarism and human degradation.

This, of course, does not mean that we necessarily propose to imitate
the Jacobins of 1793, to adopt their views, program, slogans and methods
of action. Nothing of the kind. Our program is not an old one, it is a
new one—the minimum program of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour
Party. We have a new slogan: the revolutionary-democratic dictatorship
of the proletariat and the peasantry. We shall also have, if we live to
see a real victory of the revolution, new methods of action, in harmony
with the nature and aims of the working-class party that is striving for
a complete socialist revolution. By our comparison we merely want to
explain that the representatives of the progressive class of the
twentieth century, of the proletariat, i.e., the Social-Democrats, are
divided into two wings (the opportunist and the revolutionary) similar
to those into which the representatives of the progressive class of the
eighteenth century, the bourgeoisie, were divided, i.e., the Girondists
and the Jacobins.

Only in the event of a complete victory of the democratic revolution
will the proletariat have its hands free in the struggle against the
inconsistent bourgeoisie, only in that event will it not become
“dissolved” in bourgeois democracy, but will leave its proletarian or
rather proletarian-peasant imprint on the whole revolution.

In a word, in order to avoid finding itself with its hands tied in the
struggle against the inconsistent bourgeois democrats, the proletariat
must be sufficiently class conscious and strong to rouse the peasantry
to revolutionary consciousness, to direct its attack, and thereby to
pursue the line of consistent proletarian democratism independently.

This is how matters stand with regard to the question, so ineptly dealt
with by the new _Iskra_group, of the danger of our hands being tied in
the struggle against the inconsistent bourgeoisie. The bourgeoisie will
always be inconsistent. There is nothing more naïve and futile than
attempts to set forth conditions and points^([4]) , which if satisfied,
would enable us to consider that the bourgeois democrat is a sincere
friend of the people. Only the proletariat can be a consistent fighter
for democracy. It may become a victorious fighter for democracy only if
the peasant masses join its revolutionary struggle. If the proletariat
is not strong enough for this, the bourgeoisie will be at the head of
the democratic revolution and will impart to it an inconsistent and
self-seeking nature. Nothing short of a revolutionary-democratic
dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry can prevent this.

Thus, we arrive at the indubitable conclusion that it is precisely the
new _Iskra_ tactics, by its objective significance, that are _playing
into the hands of the bourgeois democrats_. Preaching organisational
diffusion that goes to the length of plebiscites, the principle of
compromise and the divorcement of Party literature from the Party,
belittling the aims of armed insurrection, confusing the popular
political slogans of the revolutionary proletariat with those of the
monarchist bourgeoisie, distorting the requisites for a “decisive
victory of the revolution over tsarism”—all this taken together
constitutes that very policy of _khvostism_ in a revolutionary period
which perplexes the proletariat, disorganises it, confuses its
understanding and belittles the tactics of Social-Democracy, instead of
pointing out the only way to victory and of rallying all the
revolutionary and republican elements of the people to the proletariat’s
slogan.

*     *  *

To bear out this conclusion, reached by us through analysis of the
resolution, let us approach this same question from other angles. Let us
see, first, how in the Georgian _Sotsial-Demokrat_ a naïve and outspoken
Menshevik illustrates the new-_Iskra_. Secondly, let us see who is
actually making use of the new _Iskra_ slogans in the present political
situation.

Notes

^([1]) See the _Osvobozbdeniye_, No. 71, page 337, footnote 2. —_Lenin_

^([2]) A reference to the audience granted to the Zemstvo deputation by
Nicholas II on June 6, 1905. The deputation handed in a petition with
the request to convene representatives of the people in order to
establish a “renewed constitution”. The petition contained neither the
demand for universal, direct and equal suffrage by secret ballot, nor
the demand for guaranteed free elections. —_Lenin_

^([3]) “‘Revolutionaries’ in Kid Gloves”, 1905. See present edition.
Volume 8, pp. 526-30.—_Ed_.

^([4]) As was attempted by Starover in his resolution, annulled by the
Third Congress,^([11]) and as is attempted by the Conference in an
equally bad resolution. —_Lenin_

^([5]) PLACEHOLDER

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

^([8]) PLACEHOLDER

^([9]) _The man in the muffler_–the chief character in Chekhov’s story
of the same name, a man typifying the narrow-minded philistine who
abhors all innovations or initiative.

^([10]) Lenin is referring to the book _Aus demm literarische,. Nachlass
von Karl Marx, Friedrich Engels und Ferdinand Lassalle. Heraus gegeben
von Franz Mshring,_ Bd. III, Stuttgart 1902, S. 211. See K. Marx and F.
Engels, _Selected Works_, Moscow 1958, Vol. I, P. 67

^([11]) The reference is to the resolution tabled by Starover (pseudonym
of the Menshevik A. N. Potresov) on the attitude towards the liberals,
which was adopted at the Second Congress of the R.S.D.L.P., and was
criticised by Lenin in the article “Working-Class and Bourgeois
Democracy” (see present edition, Vol. 8, pp. 72-82).

 

7. The Tactics of “Eliminating The Conservatives from the Government”

The article in the organ of the Tiflis Menshevik “Committee”
(_Sotsial-Demokrat_, No. 1) to which we have just referred is entitled
“The Zemsky Sobor and Our Tactics.” Its author has not yet entirely
forgotten our program; he advances the slogan of a republic, but this is
how he discusses tactics:

  “It is possible to point to two ways of achieving this goal” (a
  republic): “either completely ignore the Zemsky Sobor that is being
  convened by the government and defeat the government by force of arms,
  form a revolutionary government and convene a constituent assembly, or
  declare the Zemsky Sobor the centre of our actions, influencing its
  composition and activity by force of arms and either forcibly
  compelling it to declare itself a constituent assembly or convening a
  constituent assembly through it. These two tactics differ very sharply
  from one another. Let us see which of them is more advantageous to
  us.”

This is how the Russian new-Iskraists set forth the ideas that were
subsequently incorporated in the resolution we have analysed. Note that
this was written before the battle of Tsushima,^([8]) when the Bulygin
“scheme” had not yet seen the light of the day. Even the liberals were
losing patience and expressing their lack of confidence in the pages of
the legal press; but a new _Iskra_-ist Social-Democrat proved more
credulous than the liberals. He declares that the Zemsky Sobor “is being
convened” and trusts the tsar so much that he proposes to make this as
yet non-existent Zemsky Sobor (or, possibly, “State Duma” or “Advisory
Legislative Assembly”?) the centre of our actions. Being more outspoken
and straightforward than the authors of the resolution adopted at the
Conference, our Tiflisian does not put the two “tactics” (which he
expounds with inimitable naïveté) on a par but declares that the second
is more “advantageous.” Just listen:

  “The first tactics. As you know, the coming revolution is a bourgeois
  revolution, i.e., its purpose is to effect such changes in the present
  system as are of interest not only to the proletariat but to the whole
  of bourgeois society. All classes are opposed to the government, even
  the capitalists themselves. The militant proletariat and the militant
  bourgeoisie are in a certain sense marching together and jointly
  attacking the autocracy from different sides. The government is
  completely isolated and lacks public sympathy. For this reason it is
  very easy to destroy it. The Russian proletariat as a whole is not yet
  sufficiently class conscious and organised to be able to carry out the
  revolution by itself. And even if it were able to do so, it would
  carry through a proletarian (socialist) revolution and not a bourgeois
  revolution. Hence, it is in our interest that the government remain
  without allies, that it be unable to disunite the opposition, unable
  to ally the bourgeoisie to itself and leave the proletariat
  isolated....”

So, it is in the interests of the proletariat that the tsarist
government shall not be able to disunite the bourgeoisie and the
proletariat! Is it not by mistake that this Georgian organ is called
_Sotsial-Demokrat_ instead of _Osvobozhdeniye_? And note its peerless
philosophy of democratic revolution! Is it not obvious that this poor
Tiflisian is hopelessly confused by the pedantic _khvostist_
interpretation of the concept “bourgeois revolution”? He discusses the
question of the possible isolation of the proletariat in a democratic
revolution and _forgets_ ... forgets about a trifle ... about the
peasantry! of the possible allies of the proletariat he knows and
favours the landowning Zemstvo-ists and is not aware of the peasants.
And this in the Caucasus! Well, were we not right when we said that by
its method of reasoning the new _Iskra_ was sinking to the level of the
monarchist bourgeoisie instead of raising the revolutionary peasantry to
the position of our ally?

  “... Otherwise the defeat of the proletariat and the victory of the
  government is inevitable. This is just what the autocracy is striving
  for. In its Zemsky Sobor it will undoubtedly attract to its side the
  representatives of the nobility, of the Zemstvos, the cities, the
  universities and similar bourgeois institutions. It will try to
  appease them with petty concessions and thereby reconcile them to
  itself. Strengthened in this way, it will direct all its blows against
  the working people who will have been isolated. It is our duty to
  prevent such an unfortunate outcome. But can this be done of the first
  method? Let us assume that we paid no attention whatever to the Zemsky
  Sobor, but started to prepare for insurrection ourselves, and one fine
  day came out in the streets armed and ready for battle. The result
  would be that we would be confronted not with one but with two
  enemies: the government and the Zemsky Sobor. While we were preparing,
  they would manage to come to terms, enter into an agreement with one
  another, draw up a constitution advantageous to themselves and divide
  power between them. These tactics are of direct advantage to the
  government, and we must reject them in the most energetic fashion....”

Now this is frank! We must resolutely reject the “tactics” of preparing
an insurrection because “meanwhile” the government would come to terms
with the bourgeoisie! Can one find in the old literature of the most
rabid “Economism” anything that would even approximate such a disgrace
to revolutionary Social-Democracy? That insurrections and outbreaks of
workers and peasants are occurring, first in one place and then in
another, is a fact. The Zemsky Sobor, however, is a Bulygin promise. And
the _Sotsial-Demokrat_ of the city of Tiflis decides: to reject the
tactics of preparing an insurrection and to wait for a “centre of
influence”—the Zemsky Sobor....

  “...The second tactics, on the contrary, consist in placing the Zemsky
  Sobor under our surveillance, in not giving it the opportunity to act
  according to its own will and enter into an agreement with the
  government.^([1])

  “We support the Zemsky Sobor to the extent that it fights the
  autocracy, and we fight it in those cases when it becomes reconciled
  with the autocracy. By energetic interference and force we shall cause
  a split among the deputies^([2]) , rally the radicals to our side,
  eliminate the conservatives from the government and thus put the whole
  Zemsky Sobor on the path of revolution. Thanks to such tactics the
  government will always remain isolated, the opposition strong and the
  establishment of a democratic system will thereby be facilitated.”

Well, well! Let anyone now say that we exaggerate the new _Iskra_-ists’
turn to the most vulgar semblance of Economism. This is positively like
the famous powder for exterminating flies: you catch the fly, sprinkle
it with the powder and the fly will die. Split the deputies of the
Zemsky Sobor by _force_, “eliminate the conservatives from the
government”—and the _whole_ Zemsky Sobor will take _the path of
revolution_. . . . No “Jacobin” armed insurrection of any sort, but just
like that, in genteel, almost parliamentary fashion, “influencing” _the
members of the Zemsky Sobor_.

Poor Russia! It has been said that she always wears the old-fashioned
bonnets that Europe discards. We have no parliament as yet, even Bulygin
has not yet promised one, but we have any amount of parliamentary
cretinism.^([9])

  “. . . How should this interference be effected? First of all, we
  shall demand that the Zemsky Sobor be convened on the basis of
  universal and equal suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot.
  Simultaneously with the announcement^([3]) of this method of election,
  complete freedom to carry on the election campaign, i.e., freedom of
  assembly, of speech and of the press, the inviolability of the
  electors and the candidates and the release of all political prisoners
  must be made law.^([4]) The elections themselves must be fixed as late
  as possible so that we have sufficient time to inform and prepare the
  people. And since the drafting of the regulations governing the
  convocation of the Sobor has been entrusted to a commission headed by
  Bulygin, Minister of the Interior, we should also exert pressure on
  this commission and on its members.^([5]) If the Bulygin Commission
  refuses to satisfy our demands^([6]) and grants suffrage only to
  property owners, then we must interfere in these elections and, by
  revolutionary means, force the voters to elect progressive candidates
  and in the Zemsky Sobor demand a constituent assembly. Finally, we
  must, by all possible measures: demonstrations, strikes and
  insurrection if need be, compel the Zemsky Sobor to convene a
  constituent assembly or declare itself to be such. The armed
  proletariat must constitute itself the defender of the constituent
  assembly, and both together^([7]) will march forward to a democratic
  republic.

  “Such are the Social-Democratic tactics, and they alone will secure us
  victory.”

Let not the reader imagine that this incredible nonsense is simply a
maiden attempt at writing on the part of some new _Iskra_ adherent with
no authority or influence. No, this is what is stated in the _organ_ of
an entire committee of new _Iskra_-ists, the Tiflis Committee. More than
that. This nonsense has been _openly endorsed by the_ “_Iskra_” in No.
100 of which we read the following about that issue of the
_Sotsial-Demokrat_ :

“_The first issue is edited in a lively and talented manner. The
experienced hand of a capable editor and writer is perceptible. . . . It
may be said with all confidence that the newspaper will brilliantly
carry out the task it has set itself_.”

Yes! If that task is clearly to show all and sundry the utter
ideological decay of new _Iskra_, then it has indeed been carried out
“brilliantly.” No one could have expressed the new _Iskra_ degradation
to liberal bourgeois opportunism in a more “lively, talented and
capable” manner.

Notes

^([1]) By what means can the Zemstvoists be deprived of their own will?
Perhaps by the use of a special sort of litmus paper? —_Lenin_

^([2]) Heavens! This is certainly rendering tactics “profound”! There
are no forces available to fight in the streets, but it is possible “to
split the deputies” “by force.” Listen, comrade from Tiflis, one may
prevaricate, but one should know the limit.... —_Lenin_

^([3]) In _Iskra?_ —_Lenin_

^([4]) By Nicholas? —_Lenin_

^([5]) So this is what is meant by the tactic of “eliminating the
conservatives from the government”! —_Lenin_

^([6]) But surely such a thing cannot happen if we follow this correct
and profound tactic! —_Lenin_

^([7]) Both the armed proletariat and the conservatives “eliminated from
the government”? —_Lenin_

^([8]) PLACEHOLDER

^([9]) PLACEHOLDER

 

8. _Osvobozhdeniyeism_ and New _Iskra_ Trends

Let us now proceed to another striking confirmation of the political
meaning of new-_Iskra_ trend.

In a splendid, remarkable and most instructive article, entitled “How to
Find Oneself” (_Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 71), Mr. Struve wages war against
the “programmatic revolutionism” of our extreme parties. Mr. Struve is
particularly displeased with me personally.^([1]) Mr. Struve could not
please me more: I could not wish for a better ally in the fight against
the renascent Economism of the new-Iskraists and the utter lack of
principle displayed by the “Socialist-Revolutionaries.” On some other
occasion we shall relate how Mr. Struve and the _Osvobozhdeniye_ proved
in practice how utterly reactionary are the “amendments” to Marxism made
in the draft program of the Socialist-Revolutionaries. We have already
repeatedly^([2]) spoken about how Mr. Struve rendered me honest,
faithful and real service every time he approved of the new-Iskraists
_in principle_ and we shall say so once more now.

Mr. Struve’s article contains a number of very interesting statements,
which we can note here only in passing. He intends “to create Russian
democracy by relying on class collaboration and not on class struggle,”
in which case “the socially privileged intelligentsia” (something in the
nature of the “cultured nobility” to which Mr. Struve makes obeisance
with the grace of a truly high-society . . . lackey) will bring the
weight of its “social position” (the weight of its moneybags) to this
“non-class” party. Mr. Struve expresses the desire to show the youth the
worthlessness “of the hackneyed radical opinion that the bourgeoisie has
become frightened and has sold out the proletariat and the cause of
liberty.” (We welcome this desire with all our heart. Nothing will
confirm the correctness of this Marxian “hackneyed” opinion better than
a war waged against it by Mr. Struve. Please, Mr. Struve, don’t
pigeonhole this splendid plan of yours!)

For the purposes of our subject it is important to note the _practical_
slogans against which this politically sensitive representative of the
Russian bourgeoisie, who is so responsive to the slightest change in the
weather, is fighting at the present time. First, he is fighting against
the slogan of republicanism. Mr. Struve is firmly convinced that this
slogan is “incomprehensible and foreign to the masses of the people” (he
forgets to add: comprehensible, but not of advantage to the
bourgeoisie!). We should like to see what reply Mr. Struve would get
from the workers in our study circles and at our mass meetings! Or are
the workers not the people? And the peasants? They are given to what Mr.
Struve calls “naïve republicanism” (“to kick out the tsar”)—but the
liberal bourgeoisie believes that _naïve_ republicanism will be replaced
not by enlightened republicanism but by enlightened monarchism! _Ça
dépend_, Mr. Struve; it will depend on circumstances. Neither tsarism
nor the bourgeoisie can help opposing a radical improvement in the
condition of the peasantry at the expense of the landed estates, whereas
the working class cannot help assisting the peasantry in this respect.

Secondly, Mr. Struve assures us that “in a civil war the attacking party
always proves to be in the wrong.” This idea verges closely on the
above-mentioned trends of the new _Iskra_ ideas. We will not say, of
course, that in civil war it is _always_ advantageous to attack; no,
sometimes defensive tactics are obligatory _for a time_. But to apply a
proposition like the one Mr. Struve has made to Russia in 1905 means
precisely displaying a little of the “hackneyed radical opinion” (“the
bourgeoisie takes fright and betrays the cause of liberty”). Whoever now
refuses to attack the autocracy and reaction, whoever is not making
preparations for such an attack, whoever is not advocating it, takes the
name of adherent of the revolution in vain.

Mr. Struve condemns the slogans: “secrecy” and “rioting” (a riot being
“an insurrection in miniature”). Mr. Struve spurns both the one and the
other—and he does so from the standpoint of “approaching the masses.” We
should like to ask Mr. Struve whether he can point to any passage in,
for instance, _What Is To Be Done?_—the work of an extreme revolutionary
from his standpoint—which advocates rioting. As regards “secrecy” is
there really much difference between, for example, us and Mr. Struve?
Are we not both working on “illegal” newspapers which are being smuggled
into Russia “secretly” and which serve the “secret” groups of either the
Osvobozhdeniye League or the R.S.D.L.P.? Our workers’ mass meetings are
often held “secretly” —that sin does exist. But what about the meetings
of the gentlemen of the Osvobozhdeniye League? Is there any reason why
you should brag, Mr. Struve, and look down upon the despised partisans
of despised secrecy?

True, the supplying of arms to the workers demands strict secrecy. On
this point Mr. Struve is rather more outspoken. Just listen: “As regards
armed insurrection, or a revolution in the technical sense, only mass
propaganda in favour of a democratic program can create the
social-psychological conditions for a general armed insurrection. Thus,
even from the point of view that an armed insurrection is the
_inevitable_ consummation of the present struggle for emancipation—a
view I do not share—the permeation of the masses with ideas of
democratic reform is a most fundamental and most necessary task.”

Mr. Struve tries to evade the issue. He speaks of the inevitability of
an insurrection instead of speaking about its necessity for the victory
of the revolution. The insurrection—unprepared, spontaneous,
sporadic—has already begun. No one can positively vouch that it will
develop into an entire and integral popular armed insurrection, for that
depends on the state of the revolutionary forces (which can be fully
gauged only in the course of the struggle itself), on the behaviour of
the government and the bourgeoisie, and on a number of other
circumstances which it is impossible to estimate exactly. There is no
point in speaking about inevitability, in the sense of absolute
certainty with regard to some definite event, as Mr. Struve does. What
you must discuss, if you want to be a partisan of the revolution is
whether insurrection is _necessary for the victory_ of the revolution,
whether it is necessary to proclaim it vigorously, to advocate and make
immediate and energetic preparations for it. Mr. Struve cannot fail to
understand this difference: he does not, for instance, obscure the
question of the necessity of universal suffrage—which is indisputable
for a democrat—by raising the question of whether its attainment is
inevitable in the course of the present revolution—which is debatable
and of no urgency for people engaged in political activity. By evading
the issue of the necessity of an insurrection, Mr. Struve expresses the
inner most essence of the political position of the liberal bourgeoisie.
In the first place, the bourgeoisie would prefer to come to terms with
the autocracy rather than crush it; secondly, the bourgeoisie in any
case thrusts the armed struggle upon the shoulders of the workers. This
is the _real_ meaning of Mr. Struve’s evasiveness. That is why he _backs
out_ of the question of the necessity of an insurrection towards the
question of the “social-psychological conditions” for it, of preliminary
“propaganda.” Just as the bourgeois windbags in the Frankfurt Parliament
of 1848 engaged in drawing up resolutions, declarations and decisions,
in “mass propaganda” and in preparing the “social-psychological
conditions” at a time when it was a matter of repelling the armed force
of the government, when the movement “led to the necessity” for an armed
struggle, when verbal persuasion alone (which is a hundredfold necessary
during the preparatory period) became banal, bourgeois inactivity and
cowardice—so also Mr. Struve evades the question of insurrection,
screening himself behind _phrases_. Mr. Struve vividly shows us what
many Social-Democrats stubbornly fail to see, namely, that a
revolutionary period differs from ordinary, everyday preparatory periods
in history in that the temper, excitement and convictions of the masses
must and do reveal themselves in _action_.

Vulgar revolutionism fails to see that the word is also a deed; this
proposition is indisputable when applied to history _generally_, or to
those periods of history when no open political mass actions take place,
and when they can not be replaced or artificially evoked by putsches of
any sort. _Khvostist_ revolutionaries fail to understand that—when a
revolutionary period has started, when the old “superstructure” has
cracked from top to bottom, when open political action on the part of
the classes and masses who are creating a new superstructure for
themselves has become a fact, when civil war has begun—then, to confine
oneself to “words” _as of old_, and fail to advance the _direct slogan_
to pass to “deeds,” still to try avoid deeds by pleading the need for
“psychological conditions” and “propaganda” in general, is apathy,
lifelessness, pedantry, or else betrayal of the revolution and treachery
to it. The Frankfurt windbags of the democratic bourgeoisie are a
memorable historical example of just such treachery, or of just such
pedantic stupidity.

Would you like an explanation of this difference between vulgar
revolutionism and the _khvostism_ of revolutionaries by an example taken
from the history of the Social Democratic movement in Russia? We shall
give you such an explanation. Call to mind the years 1901 and 1902,
which are so recent but which already seem ancient history to us today.
Demonstrations had begun. The protagonists of vulgar revolutionism
raised a cry about “storming” (_Rabocheye Dyelo_^([4])) “bloodthirsty
leaflets” were issued (of Berlin origin, if my memory does not fail me),
attacks were made on the “literature writing” and armchair nature of the
idea of conducting agitation on a national scale through a newspaper
(Nadezhdin).^([5]) On the other hand, the _khvostism_ of revolutionaries
was revealed in preaching that “the economic struggle is the _best_
means of political agitation.” What was the attitude of the
revolutionary Social-Democrats? They attacked both these trends. They
condemned flash in-the-pan methods and the cries about storming, for it
was or should have been obvious to all that open mass action was a
matter of the days to come. They condemned _khvostism_ and bluntly
issued the slogan _even_ of a popular armed insurrection, not in the
sense of a direct appeal (Mr. Struve would not discover any appeals to
“riots” in our utterances of that period), but in the sense of a
_necessary_ deduction, in the sense of “propaganda” (about which Mr.
Struve has bethought himself only now—our honourable Mr. Struve is
always several years behind the times), in the sense of preparing those
very “social-psychological conditions” about which the representatives
of the bewildered, huckstering bourgeoisie are now holding forth “sadly
and inappropriately.” _At that time_ propaganda and agitation, agitation
and propaganda, were really pushed to the fore by the objective state of
affairs. _At that time_ the work of publishing an all-Russian political
newspaper, the weekly issuance of which was regarded as an ideal, could
be proposed (and was proposed in _What Is To Be Done?_) as the
touchstone of the work of preparing for an insurrection. _At that time_
the slogans advocating mass agitation _instead_ of direct armed action,
preparation of the social-psychological conditions for insurrection
_instead of_ flash-in-the-pan methods, were the only correct slogans for
the revolutionary Social-Democratic movement. At _the present time_ the
slogans have been superseded by events, the movement has left them
behind, they have become tatters, rags fit only to cloth the hypocrisy
of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ and of the new _Iskra_ tailism!

Or perhaps I am mistaken? Perhaps the revolution has not yet begun?
Perhaps the time for open political action of classes has not yet
arrived? Perhaps there is still no civil war, and the criticism of
weapons should not as yet be the _necessary_ and obligatory successor,
heir, trustee and wielder of the weapon of criticism?

Look around, poke your head out of your study and look into the street
for an answer. Has not the government itself started civil war by
shooting down hosts of peaceful and unarmed citizens everywhere? Are not
the armed Black Hundreds acting as “arguments” of the autocracy? Has not
the bourgeoisie—even the bourgeoisie—recognised the need for a citizens’
militia? Does not Mr. Struve himself, the ideally moderate and
punctilious Mr. Struve, say (alas, he says so only to evade the issue!)
that “the open nature of revolutionary action” (that’s the sort of
fellows we are today!) “is now one of the most important conditions for
exerting an educational influence upon the masses of the people”?

Those who have eyes to see can have no doubt as to how the question of
armed insurrection must be presented by the partisans of revolution at
the present time. Just take a look at the _three_ ways in which this
question has been presented in the organs of the free press which are at
all capable of influencing the _masses_.

Presentation one. The resolution of the Third Congress of the Russian
Social-Democratic Labour Party.^([3]) It is publicly acknowledged and
declared that the general democratic revolutionary movement _has already
brought about the necessity_ of an armed insurrection. The organisation
of the proletariat for an insurrection has been placed on the order of
the day as one of the essential, principal and _indispensable_ tasks of
the Party. Instructions are issued to adopt the _most energetic_
measures to arm the proletariat and to ensure the possibility of
directly leading the insurrection.

The second presentation. An article in the _Osvobozhdeniye_, containing
a statement of principles, by the “leader of the Russian
constitutionalists” (as Mr. Struve was recently described by such an
influential organ of the European bourgeoisie as the _Frankfurter
Zeitung_^([6])), or the leader of the Russian progressive bourgeoisie.
He does not share the opinion that an insurrection is inevitable. Secret
activity and riots are the specific methods of irrational revolutionism.
Republicanism is a method of stunning. The question of armed
insurrection is really a mere technical question, whereas “the
fundamental and most necessary task” is to carry on mass propaganda and
to prepare the social-psychological conditions.

The third presentation. The resolution of the new _Iskra_-ist
Conference. Our task is to prepare an insurrection. A planned
insurrection is out of the question. Favourable conditions for an
insurrection are created by the disorganisation of the government, by
our agitation, and by our organisation. Only then “can technical
military preparations acquire more or less serious significance.”

And is that all? Yes, that is all. The new _Iskra_-ist leaders of the
proletariat still do not know whether insurrection has become a
necessity. It is still not clear to them whether the task of organising
the proletariat for direct battle has become an urgent one. It is not
necessary to urge the adoption of the most energetic measures; it is far
more important (in 1905, and not in 1902) to explain in general outlines
under what conditions these measures “may” acquire “more or less
serious” significance....

Do you see now, comrades of the new _Iskra_, where your turn to
Martynovism has led you? Do you realise that your political philosophy
has proved to be a rehash of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ philosophy?—that
(against your will and with out your being aware of it) you are
following at the tail of the monarchist bourgeoisie? Is it clear to you
now that, while repeating what you have learned by rote and attaining
perfection in sophistry, you have lost sight of the fact that—in the
memorable words of Peter Struve’s memorable article—“the open nature of
revolutionary _action_ is now one of the most important conditions for
exerting an educational influence upon the masses of the people”?

Notes

^([1]) “In comparison with the revolutionism of Messrs. Lenin and
associates, the revolutionism of the West-European Social-Democracy of
Bebel, and even of Kautsky, is opportunism; but the foundations of even
this already toned down revolutionism have been undermined and washed
away by history.” A most irate thrust. Only Mr. Struve is mistaken in
thinking that it is possible to pile everything on to me, as if I were
dead. It is sufficient for me to issue a challenge to Mr. Struve, which
he will never be able to accept. When and where did I call the
“revolutionism of Bebel and Kautsky” opportunism? When and where did I
ever claim to have created any sort of special trend in International
Social-Democracy _not identical_ with the trend of Bebel and Kautsky?
When and where have there been brought to light differences between me,
on the one hand, and Bebel and Kautsky, on the other—differences even
slightly approximating in seriousness the differences between Bebel and
Kautsky, for instance, on the agrarian question in Breslau?^([7]) Let Mr
Struve try to answer these three questions.—_Lenin_

To our readers we say: The liberal bourgeoisie _everywhere_ and always
has recourse to the method of assuring its adherents in a given country
that the Social-Democrats of that country are the most unreasonable,
whereas their comrades in a neighbouring country are “good boys.” The
German bourgeoisie has held up those “good boys” of French Socialists as
models for the Bebels and the Kautskys _hundreds of times_. The French
bourgeoisie quite recently pointed to the “good boy” Bebel as a model
for the French Socialists. It is an old trick Mr. Struve! You will find
only children and ignoramuses swallowing that bait. The complete
unanimity of international revolutionary Social-Democracy on all major
questions of program and tactics is a most incontrovertible
fact.—_Lenin_

^([2]) Let us remind the reader that the article “What Should Not Be
Done?” (_Iskra_, No. 52) was hailed with noise and clamour by the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ as a “noteworthy turn” towards concessions to the
opportunists. The trends of the principles behind the new _Iskra_ ideas
were especially lauded by the _Osvobozbdeniye_ in an item on the split
among the Russian Social-Democrats. Commenting on Trotsky’s pamphlet,
“Our Political Tasks,” the _Osvobozhdeniye_ printed out the similarity
between the ideas of this author and what was once written and said by
the _Rabocheye Dyelo_-ists Krichevsky, Martynov, Akimov (see the leaflet
entitled “An Obliging Liberal” published by the _Vperyod_). The
_Osvobozhdeniye_ welcomed Martynov’s pamphlet on the two dictatorships
(see the item in the _Vperyod_, No. 9). Finally Starover’s belated
complaints about the old slogan of the old _Iskra_, “first draw a line
of demarcation and then unite,” met with special sympathy on the part of
the _Osvobozbdeniye_.—_Lenin_

^([3]) The following is the text in full:

“_Whereas_

“1. the proletariat, being, by virtue of its very position, the most
advanced and the only consistently revolutionary class, is for that very
reason called upon to play the leading part in the general democratic
revolutionary movement in Russia;

“2. this movement has already brought about the necessity of an armed
insurrection;

“3. the proletariat will inevitably take a most energetic part in this
insurrection, this participation determining the fate of the revolution
in Russia;

“4. the proletariat can play the leading part in this revolution only if
it is welded into a united and independent political force under the
banner of the Social-Democratic Labour Party, which is to guide its
struggle not only ideologically but practically as well;

“5. it is only by fulfilling this part that the proletariat can be
assured of the most favourable conditions for the struggle for Socialism
against the propertied classes of a bourgeois-democratic Russia;

“Therefore the Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. recognises that the task
of organising the proletariat for direct struggle against the autocracy
through armed insurrection is one of the most important and pressing
tasks of the Party in the present revolutionary period.

“The Congress therefore resolves to instruct all the Party
organisations:

“a) to explain to the proletariat by means of propaganda and agitation
not only the political importance, but also the practical organisational
aspect of the impending armed insurrection;

“b) in this propaganda and agitation to explain the part played by mass
political strikes, which may be of great importance at the beginning and
in the very process of the insurrection;

“c) to adopt the most energetic measures to arm the proletariat and also
to draw up a plan for the armed insurrection and for direct leadership
of the latter, establishing for this purpose, to the extent that it is
necessary, special groups of Party functionaries.”

[Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–Ed.] —_Lenin_

^([7]) Differences of opinion were revealed during the discussion of the
draft agrarian programme at the Breslau Congress of the German
Social-Democratic Party, 1895.

^([4]) PLACEHOLDER

^([5]) The reference is to Nadezhdin’s press attack on the plan of the
Leninist _Iskra_ (Nadezhdin was the pseudonym of Y. 0. Zelensky). Lenin
criticised this attack as far back as 1902, in his _What Is To Be
Done?_.

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

 

9. What Does Being A Party of Extreme Opposition In Time of Revolution Mean?

Let us return to the resolution on a provisional government. We have
shown that the tactics of the new-Iskraists do not push the revolution
forward—which they may have wanted to make possible by their
resolution—but back. We have shown that it is precisely these tactics
that _tie the hands_ of Social-Democracy in the struggle against the
inconsistent bourgeoisie and do not safeguard it against being dissolved
in bourgeois democracy. Naturally, the false premises of the resolution
lead to the false conclusion that: “Therefore, Social-Democracy must not
set itself the aim of seizing or sharing power in the provisional
government, but must remain the party of extreme revolutionary
opposition.” Consider the first half of this conclusion, which is part
of a statement of aims. Do the new-Iskraists declare the aim of
Social-Democratic activity to be a decisive victory of the revolution
over tsarism? They do. They are unable correctly to formulate the
requisites for a decisive victory and stray into the _Osvobozhdeniye_
formulation, but they do set themselves the aforementioned aim. Further:
do they connect a provisional government with insurrection? Yes, they do
so plainly, by stating that a provisional government “will emerge from a
victorious popular insurrection.” Finally, do they set themselves the
aim of leading the insurrection? Yes, they do. Like Mr. Struve, they do
not admit that an insurrection is an urgent necessity, but at the same
time, unlike Mr. Struve, they say that “Social-Democracy strives to
_subject_ it” (the insurrection) “to its influence and _leadership_ and
to use it in the interests of the working class.”

How nicely this hangs together, does it not? We set ourselves the _aim_
of subjecting the insurrection of both the proletarian and
_non-proletarian_ masses to our influence and our leadership, and of
using it in our interests. Hence, we set ourselves the aim of leading,
in the insurrection, both the proletariat and the revolutionary
bourgeoisie and petty bourgeoisie (“the non-proletarian groups”), i.e.,
of “_sharing_” the leadership of the insurrection between the
Social-Democracy and the revolutionary bourgeoisie. We set ourselves the
aim of securing victory for the insurrection, which is to lead to the
establishment of a provisional government (“which will emerge from a
victorious popular insurrection”). _Therefore_. . . therefore we must
not set ourselves the aim of seizing power or of sharing it in a
provisional revolutionary government!!

Our friends cannot dovetail their arguments. They vacillate between the
standpoint of Mr. Struve, who is evading the issue of an insurrection,
and the standpoint of revolutionary Social-Democracy, which calls upon
us to undertake this urgent task. They vacillate between anarchism,
which on principle condemns all participation in a provisional
revolutionary government as treachery to the proletariat, and Marxism,
which demands such participation on condition that the Social-Democratic
Party exercises the leading influence in the insurrection.^([1]) They
have no independent position whatever: neither that of Mr. Struve, who
wants to come to terms with tsarism and is therefore compelled to resort
to evasions and subterfuges on the question of insurrection, nor that of
the anarchists, who condemn all action “from above” and all
participation in a bourgeois revolution. The new-Iskraists confuse a
deal with tsarism with a victory over tsarism. They want to take part in
a bourgeois revolution. They have gone somewhat beyond Martynov’s _Two
Dictatorships_. They even consent to lead the insurrection of the
people—in order to renounce that leadership immediately after victory is
won (or, perhaps, immediately before the victory?), i.e., _in order not
to avail themselves of the fruits of victory_ but to turn all these
fruits over _entirely to the bourgeoisie_. This is what they call “using
the insurrection in the interests of the working class....”

There is no need to dwell on this muddle any longer. It will be more
useful to examine how this muddle _originated_ in the formulation which
reads: “to remain the party of extreme revolutionary opposition.”

This is one of the familiar propositions of international revolutionary
Social-Democracy. It is a perfectly correct proposition. It has become a
commonplace for all opponents of revisionism or opportunism in
parliamentary countries. It has become generally accepted as the
legitimate and necessary rebuff to “parliamentary cretinism,”
Millerandism, Bernsteinism,^([2]) and the Italian reformism of the
Turati brand. Our good new-Iskraists have learned this excellent
proposition by heart and are zealously applying it . . . _quite
inappropriately_. Categories of the parliamentary struggle are
introduced into resolutions written for conditions in which no
parliament exists. The concept “opposition,” which has become the
reflection and the expression of a political situation in which no one
seriously speaks of an insurrection, is senselessly applied to a
situation in which insurrection has _begun_ and in which all the
supporters of the revolution are thinking and talking about leadership
in it. The desire to “_stick to_” old methods, i.e., action only “from
below,” is expressed with pomp and clamour _precisely at a time_ when
the revolution has confronted us with the necessity, in the event of the
insurrection being victorious, of acting from above.

No, our new-Iskraists are decidedly out of luck! Even when they
formulate a correct Social-Democratic proposition they don’t know how to
apply it correctly. They failed to take into consideration that in a
period in which a revolution has begun, when there is no parliament,
when there is civil war, when insurrectionary outbreaks occur, the
concepts and terms of parliamentary struggle are changed and transformed
into their opposites. They failed to take into consideration the fact
that, under the circumstances referred to amendments are moved by means
of street demonstrations, interpolations are introduced by means of
offensive action by armed citizens, opposition to the government is
effected by forcibly overthrowing the government.

Like the well-known hero of our folklore, who repeated good advice just
when it was inappropriate, our admirers of Martynov repeat the lessons
of peaceful parliamentarism just at a time when, as they themselves
state, actual hostilities have commenced. There is nothing more
ridiculous than this pompous emphasis of the slogan “extreme opposition”
in a resolution which begins by referring to a “decisive victory of the
revolution” and to a “popular insurrection”! Try to visualise,
gentlemen, what it means to be the “extreme opposition” in a period of
insurrection. Does it mean exposing the government or deposing it? Does
it mean voting against the government or defeating its armed forces in
open battle? Does it mean refusing the government replenishments for its
exchequer or the revolutionary seizure of this exchequer in order to use
it for the requirements of the uprising, to arm the workers and peasants
and to convoke a constituent assembly? Are you not beginning to
understand, gentlemen, that the term “extreme opposition” expresses only
negative actions—to expose, to vote against, to refuse? Why is this so?
Because this term applies only to the parliamentary struggle and,
moreover, to a period when no one makes “decisive victory” the immediate
object of the struggle. Are you not beginning to understand that things
undergo a cardinal change in this respect from the moment the
politically oppressed people launch a determined attack along the whole
front in desperate struggle for victory?

The workers ask us: Is it necessary energetically to take up the urgent
business of insurrection? What is to be done to make the incipient
insurrection victorious? What use should be made of the victory? What
program can and should then be applied? The new _Iskra_-ists, who are
making Marxism more profound, answer: We must remain the party of
extreme revolutionary opposition. . . . Well, were we not right in
calling these knights past masters in philistinism?

Notes

^([1]) See _Proletary_, No. 3, “On the Provisional Revolutionary
Government,” article two. —_Lenin_

^([2]) PLACEHOLDER

 

10. “Revolutionary Communes” and the Revolutionary-Democratic Dictatorship of the Proletariat and the Peasantry

The Conference of the new-Iskraists did not keep to the anarchist
position into which the new _Iskra_ had talked itself (only “from
below,” not “from below and from above”). The absurdity of admitting the
possibility of an insurrection and not admitting the possibility of
victory and participation in a provisional revolutionary government was
too glaring. The resolution therefore introduced certain reservations
and restrictions into the solution of the question proposed by Martynov
and Martov. Let us consider these reservations as stated in the
following section of the resolution:

“These tactics” (“to remain the party of extreme revolutionary
opposition”) “do not, of course, in any way exclude the expediency of a
partial and episodic seizure of power and the establishment of
revolutionary communes in one or another city, in one or another
district, exclusively for the purpose of helping to spread the
insurrection and of disrupting the government.”

That being the case, it means that in principle they admit the
possibility of action not only from below, but also from above. It means
that the proposition laid down in L. Martov’s well-known article in the
_Iskra_ (No. 93) is discarded and that the tactics of _Vperyod_, i.e.,
not only “from below,” but also “from above,” are acknowledged as
correct.

Further, the seizure of power (even if partial, episodic, etc.)
obviously presupposes the participation not only of Social-Democrats and
not only of the proletariat. This follows from the fact that it is not
only the proletariat that is interested and takes an active part in a
democratic revolution. This follows from the fact that the insurrection
is a “popular” one, as is stated in the beginning of the resolution we
are discussing, that “non-proletarian groups” (the words used in the
Conference resolution on the uprising), i.e., the bourgeoisie, also take
part in it. Hence, the principle that any participation of Socialists in
a provisional revolutionary government jointly with the petty
bourgeoisie is treachery to the working class _was thrown overboard by
the Conference_, which is what the _Vperyod_ [Lenin’s articles
“Social-Democracy and the Provisional Revolutionary Government”, and
“The Revolutionary-Democratic Dictatorship of the Proletariat and the
Peasantry” ] sought to achieve. “Treachery” does not cease to be
treachery because the action which constitutes it is partial, episodic,
local, etc. Hence, the parallel drawn between the participation in a
provisional revolutionary government and vulgar Jaurèsism _was thrown
overboard_ by the Conference, which is what the _Vperyod_ sought to
achieve.^([4]) A government does not cease to be a government because
its power does not extend to many cities but is confined to a single
city, does not extend to many districts but is confined to a single
district; nor because of the name that is given to it. Thus, _the
formulation of the principles of this question_ which the new _Iskra_
tried to give _was discarded by the Conference_.

Let us see whether the restrictions imposed by the Conference on the
formation of revolutionary governments and participation in them, which
is now admitted in principle, are reasonable. What difference there is
between the concept “episodic” and the concept “provisional”^([1]) we do
not know. We are afraid that this “new” and foreign word is merely a
screen for lack of clear thinking. It _seems_ “more profound,” but
actually it is only more obscure and confused. What is the difference
between the “expediency” of a partial “seizure of power” in a city or
district, and participation in a provisional revolutionary government of
the entire state? Do not “cities” include a city like St. Petersburg,
where the events of January 9 took place? Do not districts include the
Caucasus, which is bigger than many a state? Will not the problems
(which at one time vexed the new _Iskra_) of what to do with the
prisons, the police, public funds, etc., confront us the moment we
“seize power” in a single city, let alone in a district? No one will
deny, of course, that if we lack sufficient forces, if the insurrection
is not wholly successful, or if the victory is indecisive, it is
possible that provisional revolutionary governments will be set up in
separate localities, in individual cities and the like. But what is the
point of such an assumption, gentlemen? Do not you yourselves speak in
the beginning of the resolution about a “decisive victory of the
revolution,” about a “victorious popular insurrection”?? Since when have
the Social-Democrats taken over the job of the anarchists: to divide the
attention and the aims of the proletariat, to direct its attention to
the “partial” instead of the general, the single, the integral and
complete? While presupposing the “seizure of power” in a city, you
yourselves speak of “spreading the insurrection”—to another city, may we
venture to think? to all cities, may we dare to hope? Your conclusions,
gentlemen, are as unsound and haphazard, as contradictory and confused
as your premises. The Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. gave an
exhaustive and clear answer to the question of a provisional
revolutionary government in general. And this answer covers all cases of
local provisional governments as well. The answer given by the
Conference however, by artificially and arbitrarily singling out a
_part_ of the question, merely _evades_ (but unsuccessfully) the issue
as a whole, and creates confusion.

What does the term “revolutionary communes” mean? Does it differ from
the term “provisional revolutionary government,” and, if so, in what
respect? The Conference gentlemen themselves do not know. Confusion of
revolutionary thought leads them, as very often happens, to
_revolutionary phrase-mongering_. Yes, the use of the words
“revolutionary commune” in a resolution passed by representatives of
Social-Democracy is revolutionary phrase-mongering and nothing else.
Marx more than once condemned such phrase-mongering, when “fascinating”
terms of the _bygone past_ were used to hide the tasks of the future. In
such cases a fascinating term that has played its part in history
becomes futile and pernicious trumpery, a child’s rattle. We must give
the workers and the whole people a clear and unambiguous explanation as
to _why_ we want a provisional revolutionary government to be set up,
and _exactly what changes_ we shall accomplish, if we exercise decisive
influence on the government, on the very morrow of the victory of the
popular insurrection which has already commenced. These are the
questions that confront political leaders.

The Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. gave perfectly clear answers to
these questions and drew up a complete program of these changes—the
minimum program of our Party. The word “commune,” however, is not an
answer at all; it only serves to confuse people by the distant echo of a
sonorous phrase, or empty rhetoric. The more we cherish the memory of
the Paris Commune of 1871, for instance, the less permissible is it to
refer to it offhand, without analysing its mistakes and the special
conditions attending it. To do so would be to follow the absurd example
of the Blanquists—whom Engels ridiculed—who (in 1874, in their
“Manifesto”) paid homage to every act of the Commune.^([5]) What reply
will a “Conference” give to a worker who asks him about _this_
“revolutionary commune” that is mentioned in the resolution? He will
only be able to tell him that this is the name, known in history, of a
workers’ government that was unable to, and could not at that time,
distinguish between the elements of a democratic revolution and those of
a socialist revolution, that confused the tasks of fighting for a
republic with the tasks of fighting for Socialism, that was unable to
carry out the task of launching an energetic military offensive against
Versailles, that made a mistake in not seizing the Bank of France, etc.
In short, whether in your answer you refer to the Paris Commune or to
some other commune, your answer will be: it was a government _such as
ours should not be_. A fine answer, indeed! Does it not testify to
pedantic moralising and impotence on the part of a revolutionary who
says nothing about the practical program of the Party and in
appropriately begins to give lessons in history in a resolution? Does
this not reveal the very mistake which they unsuccessfully accuse us of
having committed, i.e., of confusing a democratic revolution with a
socialist revolution, between which none of the “communes” was able to
distinguish?

Extending the insurrection and the disorganising the government are
presented as the “exclusive” aim of the provisional government. (so in
appropriately termed a “commune”). Taken in its literal sense, the word
“exclusively” eliminates all other aims; it is an echo of the absurd
theory of “only from below.” Such elimination of other aims is another
instance of short-sightedness and lack of reflection. A “revolutionary
commune,” i.e., a revolutionary government, even if only in a single
city, will inevitably have to administer (even if provisionally,
“partly, episodically”) _all_ the affairs of state, and it is the height
of folly to hide one’s head under one’s wing and refuse to see this.
This government will have to enact an eight-hour working day, establish
workers’ inspection of factories, institute free universal education,
introduce the election of judges, set up peasant committees, etc.; in a
word, it will certainly have to carry out a number of reforms. To
designate these reforms as “helping to spread the insurrection” would be
playing with words and deliberately causing greater confusion in a
matter which requires absolute clarity.

*     *  *

The concluding part of the new _Iskra_-ists’ resolution does not provide
any new material for a criticism of the trends of principles of
“Economism” which has revived in our Party, but it illustrates from a
somewhat different angle, what has been said above.

Here is that part:

“Only in one event should Social-Democracy, on its own initiative,
direct its efforts towards seizing power and holding it as long as
possible—namely, in the event of the revolution spreading to the
advanced countries of Western Europe, where conditions for the
achievement of Socialism have already reached a certain”(?) “degree of
maturity. In that event the limited historical scope of the Russian
revolution can be considerably widened and the possibility of entering
the path of socialist reforms will arise.

“By framing its tactics in accordance with the view that, during the
whole period of the revolution, the Social-Democratic Party will retain
the position of extreme revolutionary opposition to all the governments
that may succeed one another in the course of the revolution,
Social-Democracy will best be able to prepare itself to utilise
governmental power if it falls” (??) “into its hands.”

The basic idea here is the one that the _Vperyod_ has repeatedly
formulated, stating that we must not be afraid (as is Martynov) of a
complete victory for Social-Democracy in a democratic revolution, i.e.,
of a revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry, for such a victory will enable us to rouse Europe, and the
socialist proletariat of Europe, after throwing off the yoke of the
bourgeoisie, will in its turn help us to accomplish the socialist
revolution. But see how this idea is worsened in the new _Iskra_-ists’
rendering of it. We shall not dwell on details—on the absurd assumption
that power could “fall” into the hands of a class-conscious party which
considers seizure of power harmful tactics; on the fact that in Europe
the conditions for Socialism have reached not a certain degree of
maturity, but are already mature; on the fact that our Party program
does not speak of socialist changes at all, but only of a socialist
revolution. Let us take the principal and basic difference between the
idea presented by the _Vperyod_ and that presented in the resolution.
The _Vperyod_ set the revolutionary proletariat of Russia an active aim:
to win the battle for democracy and to use this victory for carrying the
revolution into Europe. The resolution fails to grasp this connection
between our “decisive victory” (not in the new _Iskra_ sense) and the
revolution in Europe, and therefore it speaks not about the tasks of the
proletariat, not about the prospects of _its_ victory, but about one of
the possibilities in general: “in the event of the revolution
spreading....” The _Vperyod_ pointedly and definitely indicated—and this
was incorporated in the resolution of the Third Congress of the Russian
Social-Democratic Labour Party—how “governmental power” can and must “be
utilised” in the interests of the proletariat, bearing in mind what can
be achieved immediately, at the given stage of social development, and
what must first be achieved as a democratic prerequisite of the struggle
for Socialism. Here, also, the resolution hopelessly drags at the tail
when it states: “will be able to prepare itself to utilise,” but fails
to say _how_ it will be able, _how_ it will prepare itself, and to
utilise _for what_? We have no doubt, for instance, that the
new-Iskraists may be “able to prepare themselves to utilise” the leading
position in the Party; but the point is that the way they have utilised,
their preparation up till now, do not hold out much hope of possibility
being transformed into reality. . . .

The _Vperyod_ quite definitely stated wherein lies the real “possibility
of holding power”—namely, in the revolutionary-democratic dictatorship
of the proletariat and the peasantry, in their joint mass strength,
which is capable of outweighing all the forces of counterrevolution, in
the inevitable concurrence of their interests in _democratic_ changes.
Here, too, the resolution of the Conference gives us nothing positive,
it merely evades the question. Surely, the possibility of holding power
in Russia must be determined by the composition of the social forces in
Russia itself, by the circumstances of the democratic revolution which
is now taking place in our country. A victory of the proletariat in
Europe (it is still somewhat of a far cry between carrying the
revolution into Europe and the victory of the proletariat) will give
rise to a desperate counter-revolutionary struggle on the part of the
Russian bourgeoisie—yet the resolution of the new-Iskraists does not say
a word about this counter-revolutionary force, the importance of which
has been appraised in the resolution of the Third Congress of the
R.S.D.L.P. If in our fight for a republic and democracy we could not
rely upon the peasantry as well as on the proletariat, the prospect of
our “holding power” would be hopeless. But if it is not hopeless, if a
“decisive victory of the revolution over tsarism” opens up such a
possibility, then we must point to it, we must actively call for its
transformation into reality and issue practical slogans not only _for
the contingency_ of the revolution being carried into Europe, but also
_for the purpose_ of carrying it there. The reference made by the
_khvostist_ Social-Democrats to the “limited historical scope of the
Russian revolution” merely serves to cover up their limited
understanding of the aims of this democratic revolution and of the
leading role of the proletariat in this revolution!

One of the objections raised to the slogan of “the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry” is that dictatorship presupposes a “single will” (_Iskra_,
No. 95), and that there can be no single will of the proletariat and the
petty bourgeoisie. This objection is unsound, for it is based on an
abstract, “metaphysical” interpretation of the term “single will.” There
can be a single will in one respect and not a single will in another.
The absence of unity on questions of Socialism and in the struggle for
Socialism does not preclude singleness of will on questions of democracy
and in the struggle for a republic. To forget this would be tantamount
to forgetting the logical and historical difference between a democratic
and a socialist revolution. To forget this would be tantamount to
forgetting the character of the democratic revolution as a revolution
_of the whole people_: if it is “of the whole people” it means that
there is “singleness of will” precisely in so far as this revolution
satisfies the common needs and requirements of the whole people. Beyond
the bounds of democracy there can be no question of the proletariat and
the peasant bourgeoisie having a single will. Class struggle between
them is inevitable; but it is in a democratic republic that this
struggle will be the most thoroughgoing and widespread struggle of the
people _for Socialism_. Like everything else in the world, the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry has a past and a future. Its past is autocracy, serfdom,
monarchy and privilege. In the struggle against this past, in the
struggle against counterrevolution, a “single will” of the proletariat
and the peasantry is possible, for here there is unity of interests.

Its future is the struggle against private property the struggle of the
wage worker against the employer the struggle for Socialism. Here
singleness of will is impossible.^([2]) Here our path lies not from
autocracy to a republic but from a petty-bourgeois democratic republic
to Socialism.

Of course, in actual historical circumstances, the elements of the past
become interwoven with those of the future, the two paths cross. Wage
labour, with its struggle against private property, exists under the
autocracy as well; it is generated even under serfdom. But this does not
in the least prevent us from drawing a logical and historical dividing
line between the major stages of development. We all draw a distinction
between bourgeois revolution and socialist revolution, we all absolutely
insist on the necessity of drawing a most strict line between them; but
can it be denied that individual, particular elements of the two
revolutions become interwoven in history? Have there not been a number
of socialist movements and attempts at establishing Socialism in the
period of democratic revolutions in Europe? And will not the future
socialist revolution in Europe still have to do a very great deal that
has been left undone in the field of democracy?

A Social-Democrat must never for a moment forget that the proletariat
will inevitably have to wage the class struggle for Socialism even
against the most democratic and republican bourgeoisie and petty
bourgeoisie. This is beyond doubt. Hence the absolute necessity of a
separate, independent, strictly class party of Social-Democracy. Hence
the temporary nature of our tactics of “striking jointly” with the
bourgeoisie and the duty of keeping a strict watch “over our ally, as
over an enemy,” etc. All this is also beyond the slightest doubt. But it
would be ridiculous and reactionary to deduce from this that we must
forget, ignore or neglect these tasks which, although transient and
temporary, are vital at the present time. The fight against the
autocracy is a temporary and transient task of the Socialists, but to
ignore or neglect this task in any way would be tantamount to betraying
Socialism and rendering a service to reaction. The
revolutionary-Democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry is unquestionably only a transient, temporary aim of the
Socialists, but to ignore this aim in the period of a democratic
revolution would be downright reactionary.

Concrete political aims must be set in concrete circumstances. All
things are relative, all things flow and all things change. The program
of the German Social-Democratic Party does not contain the demand for a
republic. The situation in Germany is such that this question can in
practice hardly be separated from the question of Socialism (although
even as regards Germany, Engels, in his comments on the draft of the
Erfurt Program in 1891, warned against belittling the importance of a
republic and of the struggle for a republic!).^([6]) In the Russian
Social-Democratic Party the question of eliminating the demand for a
republic from its program and agitation has never even arisen, for in
our country there can be no talk of an indissoluble connection between
the question of a republic and the question of Socialism. It was quite
natural for a German Social-Democrat of 1898 not to put the special
question of a republic in the forefront, and this evokes neither
surprise nor condemnation. But a German Social-Democrat who in 1848
would have left the question of a republic in the shade would have been
a downright traitor to the revolution. There is no such thing as
abstract truth. Truth is always concrete.

The time will come when the struggle against the Russian autocracy will
end and the period of democratic revolution will be over in Russia; then
it will be ridiculous to talk about “singleness of will” of the
proletariat and the peasantry, about a democratic dictatorship, etc.
When that time comes we shall attend directly to the question of the
socialist dictatorship of the proletariat and deal with it at greater
length. But at present the party of the advanced class cannot but strive
most energetically for a decisive victory of the democratic revolution
over tsarism. And a decisive victory means nothing else than the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry.

Note^([7])

1) We would remind the reader that in the polemics between the _Iskra_
and the _Vperyod_, the former referred among other things to Engels’
letter to Turati, in which Engels warned the (future) leader of the
Italian reformists not to confuse the democratic with the socialist
revolution.^([8]) The impending revolution in Italy—wrote Engels about
the political situation in Italy in 1894—will be a petty-bourgeois,
democratic and not a socialist revolution. The _Iskra_ reproached the
_Vperyod_ with having departed from the principle laid down by Engels.
This reproach was unjustified, because the _Vperyod_ (No. 14)^([3])
fully acknowledged, on the whole, the correctness of Marx’s theory of
the difference between the three main forces in the revolutions of the
nineteenth century. According to this theory, the following forces take
a stand against the old order, against the autocracy, feudalism,
serfdom: 1) the liberal big bourgeoisie,
2) the radical petty bourgeoisie,
3) the proletariat. The first fights for nothing more than a
constitutional monarchy; the second, for a democratic republic; the
third, for a socialist revolution. To confuse the petty-bourgeois
struggle for a complete democratic revolution with the proletarian
struggle for a socialist revolution spells political bankruptcy for a
Socialist. Marx’s warning to this effect is quite justified. But it is
precisely for this very reason that the slogan “revolutionary communes”
is erroneous, because the very mistake committed by the communes that
have existed in history is that they confused the democratic revolution
with the socialist revolution. On the other hand, our slogan—a
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry—fully safeguards us against this mistake. While recognising
the uncontestably bourgeois nature of the revolution, which is incapable
of _directly_ overstepping the bounds a mere democratic revolution, our
slogan _pushes forward_ this particular revolution and strives to mould
it into forms most advantageous to the proletariat; consequently, it
strives to make the very most of the democratic revolution in order to
attain the greatest success in the further struggle of the proletariat
for Socialism.

Notes

^([1]) The first word was in scholarly use at the term, while the second
was, and still is, colloquial Russian.—_Tr_.

^([2]) The development of capitalism, more widespread and rapid in
conditions of liberty, will inevitably soon put an end to singleness of
will; the earlier counter-revolution and reaction are crushed.—_Lenin_

^([3]) “Social-Democracy and the Provisional Revolutionary Government”,
1905. See present edition, Vol. 8, pp. 275-92.–_Ed_.

^([4]) PLACEHOLDER

^([5]) Lenin is refering to the programme published in 1874 by the
London Blanquist group of former members of the Paris Commune (see F.
Engels, “Flüchtlingslitcratur. II. Programm der blanqui stischen
Kommunefluichtlinge”, _Internationajes aus dem Voiksstaot,_ Berlin 1957,
S. 47-56).

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

^([8]) See K. Marx and F. Engels, _Selected Correspondence,_ Moscow 1953
pp. 551-55

 

11. A Cursory Comparison Between Several of the Resolutions of the Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. and Those of the “Conference”

The question of the provisional revolutionary government is the pivot of
the tactical questions of the Social-Democratic movement at the present
time. It is neither possible nor necessary to dwell in as great detail
on the other resolutions of the Conference. We shall confine ourselves
merely to indicating briefly a few points which confirm the difference
in principle, analysed above, between the tactical trends of the
resolutions of the Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P. and those of the
Conference resolutions.

Take the question of the attitude towards the tactics of the government
on the eve of the revolution. Once again you will find a comprehensive
answer to this question in one of the resolutions of the Third Congress
of the R.S.D.L.P. This resolution takes into consideration all the
multifarious conditions and tasks of the particular moment: the exposure
of the hypocrisy of the government’s concessions, the utilisation of
“travesties of popular representation,” the achievement by revolutionary
means of the urgent demands of the working class (the principal one
being the eight-hour working day), and, finally, resistance to the Black
Hundreds. In the Conference resolutions this question is scattered over
several sections: “resistance to the dark forces of reaction” is
mentioned only in the preamble of the resolution on the attitude to
other parties. Participation in elections to representative bodies is
considered separately from the question of “compromises” between tsarism
and the bourgeoisie. Instead of calling for the achievement of an
eight-hour working day by revolutionary means, a special resolution,
with the high-sounding title “On the Economic Struggle,” merely repeats
(after high-flown and very stupid phrases about “the central place
occupied by the labour question in the public life of Russia”) the old
slogan of agitation for “the legislative institution of an eight-hour
working day.” The inadequacy and the belatedness of this slogan at the
present time are too obvious to require proof.

The question of open political action. The Third Congress takes into
consideration the impending _radical_ change in our activity. Secret
activity and the development of the secret apparatus must on no account
be abandoned: this would be playing into the hands of the police and be
of the utmost advantage to the government. But at the same time we
cannot start too soon thinking about open action as well. Expedient
forms of such action and, consequently, special apparatus—less
secret—must be _prepared_ immediately for this purpose. The legal and
semi-legal societies must be made use of with a view to transforming
them, as far as possible, into bases of the future open
Social-Democratic Labour Party in Russia.

Here too the Conference divides up the question, and fails to issue any
integral slogans. There bobs up as a separate point the ridiculous
instruction to the Organisation Commission to see to the “placing” of
its legally functioning publicists. There is the wholly absurd decision
“to subordinate to its influence the democratic newspapers that set
themselves the aim of rendering assistance to the working-class
movement.” This is the professed aim of all our legal liberal
newspapers, nearly all of which are of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ trend. Why
should not the editors of the _Iskra_ make a start themselves in
carrying out their advice and give us an example of how to subject the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ to Social-Democratic influence? ... Instead of the
slogan of utilising the legally existing unions for the purpose of
establishing bases for the Party, we are given, first, particular advice
about the “trade” unions only (that all Party members must join them)
and, secondly, advice to guide “the revolutionary organisations of the
workers” = “organisations not officially constituted” = “revolutionary
workers’ clubs.” How these “clubs” come to be classed as unofficially
constituted organisations, what these “clubs” really are—goodness only
knows. Instead of definite and clear instructions from a supreme Party
body, we have some jottings of ideas and the rough drafts of publicists.
We get no complete picture of the beginning of the Party’s transition to
an entirely new basis in all its work.

The “peasant question” was presented by the Party Congress and by the
Conference in entirely different ways. The Congress drew up a resolution
on the “attitude to the peasant movement,” the Conference on “work among
the peasants.” In the one case prime importance is attached to the task
of guiding the widespread revolutionary-democratic movement in the
general national interests of the fight against tsarism. In the other
instance, the question is reduced to mere “work” among a particular
section of society. In the one case, a central practical slogan for our
agitation is advanced, calling for the immediate organisation of
revolutionary peasant committees in order to carry out all the
democratic changes. In the other, a “demand for the organisation of
committees” is to be presented to a constituent assembly. Why must we
wait for this constituent assembly? Will it really be constituent? Will
it be stable without the preliminary and simultaneous establishment of
revolutionary peasant committees? All these questions are ignored by the
Conference. All its decisions reflect the general idea which we have
traced—namely, that in the bourgeois revolution we must do only our
special work, without setting ourselves the aim of leading the entire
democratic movement and of doing this independently. Just as the
Economists constantly harped on the idea that the Social-Democrats
should concern themselves with the economic struggle, leaving it to the
liberals to take care of the political struggle, so the new-Iskraists
keep harping in all their discussions on the idea that we should creep
into a modest corner out of the way of the bourgeois revolution, leaving
it to the bourgeoisie to do the active work of carrying out the
revolution.

Finally, we cannot but note also the resolution on the attitude toward
other parties. The resolution of the Third Congress of the R.S.D.L.P.
speaks of exposing all the limitations and inadequacies of the bourgeois
movement for emancipation, without entertaining the naïve idea of
enumerating every possible instance of such limitation from congress to
congress or of drawing a line of distinction between bad bourgeois and
good bourgeois. The Conference, repeating the mistake made by Starover,
persistently searched for such a line, developed the famous “litmus
paper” theory. Starover started from a very good idea: to put the
strictest possible terms to the bourgeoisie. Only he forgot that any
attempt to separate in advance the bourgeois democrats who are worthy of
approval, agreements, etc., from those who are unworthy leads to a
“formula” which is immediately thrown overboard by the development of
events and which introduces confusion into the proletarian class
consciousness. The emphasis is shifted from real unity in the struggle
to declarations, promises, slogans. Starover was of the opinion that
“universal and equal suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot” was
such a radical slogan. But before two years elapsed the “litmus paper”
proved its worthlessness, the slogan of universal suffrage was taken
over by the _Osvobozbdentsi_, who not only came no closer to
Social-Democracy as a result of this, but, on the contrary, tried by
means of this very slogan to mislead the workers and divert them from
Socialism.

Now the new-Iskraists are setting “terms” that are even “stricter,” they
are “demanding” from the enemies of tsarism “energetic and unequivocal”
(!?) “support of every determined action of the organised proletariat,”
etc., up to and including “active participation in the self-armament of
the people.” The line has been drawn much further—but nonetheless this
line is again already obsolete, it revealed its worthlessness at once.
Why, for instance, is there no slogan of a republic? How is it that the
Social-Democrats—in the interest of “relentless revolutionary war
against all the foundations of the system of social estates and the
monarchy”—“demand” from the bourgeois democrats anything you like except
a fight for a republic?

That this question is not mere captiousness, that the mistake of the
new-Iskraists is of most vital political significance is proved by the
“Russian Liberation League” (see _Proletary_, No. 4).^([1]) These
“enemies of tsarism” will fully meet all the “requirements” of the new
_Iskra_ supporters. And yet we have shown that the spirit of
_Osvobozhdeniye_ reigns in the program (or lack of program) of this
“Russian Liberation League” and that the _Osvobozhdentsi_ can easily
take it in tow. The Conference, however, declares in the concluding
section of the resolution that “Social-Democracy will continue to oppose
the _hypocritical friends of the people_, all those political parties
which, though they display a liberal and democratic banner, refuse to
render genuine support to the revolutionary struggle of the
proletariat.” The “Russian Liberation League” not only does not refuse
this support but offers it most insistently. Is that a guarantee that
the leaders of this League are not “hypocritical friends of the people,”
even though they are _Osvobozhdentsi_?

You see: by inventing “terms” in advance and presenting “demands” which
are ludicrous by reason of their grim impotence, the new-Iskraists
immediately put themselves in a ridiculous position. Their terms and
demands immediately prove inadequate when it comes to gauging living
realities. Their chase after formulae is hopeless, for no formula can
embrace all the various manifestations of hypocrisy, inconsistency and
limitations of the bourgeois democrats. It is not a matter of “litmus
paper,” of forms, or written and printed demands, nor is it a matter of
drawing, in advance, a line of distinction between hypocritical and
sincere “friends of the people”; it is a matter of real unity in the
struggle, of unabating criticism by Social-Democrats of every
“uncertain” step taken by bourgeois democracy. What is needed for a
“genuine consolidation of all the social forces interested in democratic
change” is not the “points” over which the Conference laboured so
assiduously and so vainly, but the ability to put forward genuinely
revolutionary slogans. For this slogans are needed that will raise the
revolutionary and republican bourgeoisie to the level of the proletariat
and not reduce the aims of the proletariat to the level of the
monarchist bourgeoisie. For this the most energetic participation in the
insurrection and not sophist evasions of the urgent task of armed
insurrection is needed.

Notes

^([1]) _Proletary_, No. 4, which appeared on June 4, 1905, contained a
lengthy article entitled “A New Revolutionary Labour League” . The
article gives the contents of the appeals issued by this league which
assumed the name of “Russian Liberation League” and which set itself the
aim of convening a constituent assembly with the aid of an armed
insurrection. Further, the article defines the attitude of the
Social-Democrats to such non-Party leagues. How far this league really
existed, and what its fate was in the revolution is absolutely unknown
to us. [Author’s note to the 1907 edition.–_Ed_.] —_Lenin_

 

12. Will the Sweep of the Democratic Revolution be Diminished if the Bourgeoisie Recoils from it?

The foregoing lines were already written when we received a copy of the
resolutions adopted by the Caucasian Conference of the new _Iskra_
supporters, published by the _Iskra_. Better material than this _pour la
bonne bouche_ (for dessert) we could not even have invented.

The editors of the _Iskra_ quite justly remark: “On the fundamental
question of tactics, the Caucasian Conference also arrived at a decision
_analogous_” (in truth!) “to the one adopted by the All-Russian
Conference” (i.e., of the new _Iskra_-ists). “The question of the
attitude of Social-Democracy towards a provisional revolutionary
government has been settled by the Caucasian comrades in the spirit of
most outspoken opposition to the new method advocated by the _Vpeyod_
group and by the delegates of the so-called Congress who joined it.” “It
must be admitted that the formulation of the tactics of the proletarian
party in a bourgeois revolution as given by the Conference is _very
apt_.”

What is true is true. No one could have given a more “apt” formulation
of the fundamental error of the new _Iskra_-ists. We shall quote this
formulation in full, indicating in parentheses first the blossoms and
then the fruit presented at the end.

Here is the resolution of the Caucasian Conference of new-Iskraists on a
provisional revolutionary government:

“Whereas we consider it to be our task to take advantage of the
revolutionary situation to render more profound” (of course! They should
have added: “_à la_ Martynov!”) “the Social-Democratic consciousness of
the proletariat” (only to render the consciousness more profound, and
not to win a republic? What a “profound” conception of revolution 1)
“and in order to secure for the Party fullest freedom to criticise the
nascent bourgeois-state system” (it is not our business to secure a
republic! Our business is only to secure freedom of criticism. Anarchist
ideas give rise to anarchist language: “bourgeois-state” system!), “the
Conference declares against the formation of a Social-Democratic
provisional government and joining such a government” (recall the
resolution passed by the Bakunists ten months before the Spanish
revolution and referred to by Engels: see the _Proletary_, No. 3),^([2])
"and considers it to be the most expedient course to exercise pressure
from without" (from below and not from above) “upon the bourgeois
provisional government in order to secure a feasible measure” (?!) “of
democratisation of the state system. The Conference believes that the
formation of a provisional government by Social-Democrats, or their
joining such a government, would lead, on the one hand, to the masses of
the proletariat becoming disappointed in the Social-Democratic Party and
abandoning it because the Social-Democrats, in spite of the fact that
they had seized power, would not be able to satisfy the pressing needs
of the working class, including the establishment of Socialism” (a
republic is not a pressing need! The authors, in their innocence, do not
notice that they are speaking a purely anarchist language, as if they
were repudiating participation in bourgeois revolutions!), “and, on the
other hand, _would cause the bourgeois classes to recoil from the
revolution and diminish its sweep.”_

That is the crux of the matter. That is where anarchist ideas become
interwoven (as is constantly the case among the West-European
Bernsteinians also) with the purest opportunism. Just think of it: not
to join a provisional government because this will cause the bourgeoisie
to recoil from the revolution and thus diminish the sweep of the
revolution! Here, indeed, we have the new _Iskra_ philosophy in its
complete, pure and consistent form: the revolution is a bourgeois
revolution, therefore we must bow down to bourgeois philistinism and
make way for it. If we are guided, even in part, even for a moment, by
the consideration that our participation may cause the bourgeoisie to
recoil, we thereby simply yield leadership in the revolution entirely to
the bourgeois classes. We thereby place the proletariat entirely under
the tutelage of the bourgeoisie (while retaining complete “freedom of
criticism”!!), compelling the proletariat to be meek and mild so as not
to cause the bourgeoisie to recoil. We emasculate the most vital needs
of the proletariat, namely, its political needs—which the Economists and
their epigones have never properly understood—so as not to cause the
bourgeoisie to recoil. We completely abandon the field of revolutionary
struggle for the achievement of democracy to the extent required by the
proletariat for the field of bargaining with the bourgeoisie, betraying
our principles, betraying the revolution to purchase the bourgeoisie’s
voluntary consent (“that it might not recoil”).

In two brief lines, the Caucasian new-Iskraists managed to express the
quintessence of the tactics of betrayal of the revolution and of
converting the proletariat into a wretched appendage of the bourgeois
classes. The tendency, which we traced above to the mistakes of the new
_Iskra_-ists, now stands out before us as a clear and definite
principle, viz., to drag at the tail of the monarchist bourgeoisie.
Since the establishment of a republic would cause (and is already
causing: Mr. Struve, for example) the bourgeoisie to recoil, therefore,
down with the fight for a republic. Since every resolute and consistent
democratic demand of the proletariat always and everywhere in the world
causes the bourgeoisie to recoil, therefore, hide in your lairs,
comrades and fellow workers, act only from without, do not dream of
using the instruments and weapons of the “bourgeois-state” system in the
interests of the revolution, and reserve for yourselves “freedom to
criticize”!

The fundamental fallacy of their very conception of the term “bourgeois
revolution” has come to the surface. The Martynov or new _Iskra_
“conception” of this term leads straight to a betrayal of the cause of
the proletariat to the bourgeoisie.

Those who have forgotten the old Economism, those who do not study it or
remember it, will find it difficult to under stand the present echo of
Economism. Recall the Bernsteinian _Credo_.^([3]) From “purely
proletarian” views and programs, people arrived at the conclusion: we,
the Social-Democrats, must concern ourselves with economics, with the
real cause of labour, with freedom to criticise all political chicanery,
with rendering Social-Democratic work really more profound. Politics are
for the liberals. God save us from dropping into “revolutionism”: that
will cause the bourgeoisie to recoil. Those who read the whole _Credo_
over again or the Supplement to No. 9 of the _Rabochaya Mysl_ (September
1899)^([4]) will be able to follow this entire line of reasoning.

Today we have the same thing, only on a large scale, applied to an
appraisal of the whole of the “great” Russian revolution—alas, already
vulgarised and reduced to a travesty in advance by the theoreticians of
orthodox philistinism! We, the Social-Democrats, must concern ourselves
with freedom of criticism, with rendering class consciousness more
profound, with action from without. They, the bourgeois classes, must
have freedom to act, a free field for revolutionary (read: liberal)
leadership, freedom to put through “reforms” from above.

These vulgarizers of Marxism have never pondered over what Marx said
about the need of substituting the criticism of weapons for the weapon
of criticism.^([5]) Taking the name of Marx in vain, they, in actual
fact, draw up resolutions on tactics wholly in the spirit of the
Frankfurt bourgeois windbags, who freely criticised absolutism and
rendered democratic consciousness more profound, but failed to
understand that the time of revolution is the time of action, of action
both from above and from below. Having converted Marxism into pedantry,
they have made the ideology of the advanced, most determined and
energetic revolutionary class the ideology of its most undeveloped
strata, which shrink from the difficult revolutionary-democratic tasks
and leave it to Messrs. the Struves to take care of these democratic
tasks.

If the bourgeois classes recoil from the revolution because the
Social-Democrats join the revolutionary government, they will thereby
“diminish the sweep” of the revolution.

Listen to this, Russian workers: The sweep of the revolution will be
mightier if it is carried out by Messrs. the Struves, who are not
frightened away by the Social-Democrats and who want, not victory over
tsarism, but to come to terms with it. The sweep of the revolution will
be mightier if, of the two possible outcomes which we have outlined
above, the first eventuates, i.e., if the monarchist bourgeoisie comes
to terms with the autocracy concerning a “constitution” _à la_ Shipov!

Social-Democrats who write such disgraceful things in resolutions
intended for the guidance of the whole Party, or who approve of such
“apt” resolutions, are so blinded by their pedantry, which has utterly
eroded the living spirit out of Marxism, that they do not see how these
resolutions convert all their other fine words into mere
phrase-mongering. Take any of their articles in the _Iskra_, or take
even the notorious pamphlet written by our celebrated Martynov—you will
read there about a _popular_ insurrection, about carrying the revolution
to _completion_, about striving to rely upon the _common people_ in the
fight against the inconsistent bourgeoisie. But then all these excellent
things become miserable phrase-mongering immediately you accept or
approve of the idea that “the sweep of the revolution” will be
“diminished” as a consequence of the alienation of the bourgeoisie. One
of two things, gentlemen: either we, together with the people, must
strive to carry out the revolution and win a complete victory over
tsarism _in spite of_ the inconsistent, self-seeking and cowardly
bourgeoisie, or we do not accept this “in spite of,” we fear lest the
bourgeoisie “recoil” from the revolution, in which case we betray the
proletariat and the people to the bourgeoisie—to the inconsistent,
self-seeking and cowardly bourgeoisie.

Don’t try to misinterpret what I have said. Don’t start howling that you
are being accused of deliberate treachery. No, you have always been
crawling and have at last crawled into the mire as unconsciously as the
Economists of old, drawn inexorably and irrevocably down the inclined
plane of making Marxism “more profound” to anti-revolutionary, soulless
and lifeless “philosophising.”

Have you ever considered, gentlemen, what real social forces determine
“the sweep of the revolution”? Let us leave aside the forces of foreign
politics, of international combinations, which have turned out very
favourably for us at the present time, but which we all leave out of our
discussion, and rightly so, inasmuch as we are concerned with the
question of the internal forces of Russia. Look at these internal social
forces. Aligned against the revolution are the autocracy, the imperial
court, the police, the bureaucracy, the army and the handful of high
nobility. The deeper the indignation of the people grows, the less
reliable become the troops, and the more the bureaucracy wavers.
Moreover, the bourgeoisie, on the whole, is now in favour of the
revolution, is zealously making speeches about liberty, holding forth
more and more frequently in the name of the people, and even in the name
of the revolution.^([1]) But we Marxists all know from theory and from
daily and hourly observation of our liberals, Zemstvo people and
_Orvobozhdentsi_, that the bourgeoisie is inconsistent, self-seeking and
cowardly in its support of the revolution. The bourgeoisie, in the mass,
will inevitably turn towards counterrevolution, towards the autocracy,
against the revolution and against the people, immediately its narrow,
selfish interests are met, immediately it “recoils” from consistent
democracy (_and it is already recoiling from it_!). There remains the
“people,” that is, the proletariat and the peasantry: the proletariat
alone can be relied on to march to the end, for it is going far beyond
the democratic revolution. That is why the proletariat fights in the
front ranks for a republic and contemptuously rejects silly and unworthy
advice to take care not to frighten away the bourgeoisie. The peasantry
includes a great number of semi-proletarian as well as petty-bourgeois
elements. This causes it also to be unstable and compels the proletariat
to unite in a strictly class party. But the instability of the peasantry
differs radically from the instability of the bourgeoisie, for at the
present time the peasantry is interested not so much in the absolute
preservation of private property as in the confiscation of the landed
estates, one of the principal forms of private property. While this does
not make the peasantry become socialist or cease to be petty-bourgeois,
it is capable of becoming a wholehearted and most radical adherent of
the democratic revolution. The peasantry will inevitably become such if
only the progress of revolutionary events, which is enlightening it, is
not checked too soon by the treachery of the bourgeoisie and the defeat
of the proletariat. Subject to this condition, the peasantry will
inevitably become a bulwark of the revolution and the republic, for only
a completely victorious revolution can give the peasantry _everything_
in the sphere of agrarian reforms—_everything_ that the peasants desire,
of which they dream, and of which they truly stand in need (not for the
abolition of capitalism as the “Socialist-Revolutionaries” imagine, but)
in order to emerge from the mire of semi-serfdom, from the gloom of
oppression and servitude, in order to improve their living conditions as
much as it is possible to improve them under the system of commodity
production.

Moreover, the peasantry is attached to the revolution not only by the
prospect of radical agrarian reform but by its general and permanent
interests. Even in fighting the proletariat the peasantry stands in need
of democracy, for only a democratic system is capable of giving exact
expression to its interests and of ensuring its predominance as the
mass, as the majority. The more enlightened the peasantry becomes (and
since the war with Japan it is becoming enlightened much more rapidly
than those who are accustomed to measure enlightenment by the school
standard suspect), the more consistently and determinedly will it favour
a thoroughgoing democratic revolution; for, unlike the bourgeoisie, it
has nothing to fear from the supremacy of the people, but, on the
contrary, stands to gain by it. A democratic republic will become the
ideal of the peasantry as soon as it begins to free itself from its
naïve monarchism, because the enlightened monarchism of the bourgeois
stock-jobbers (with an upper chamber, etc.) implies for the peasantry
the same disfranchisement and the same down-troddenness and ignorance as
it suffers from today, only slightly glossed over with the varnish of
European constitutionalism.

That is why the bourgeoisie as a class naturally and inevitably strives
to come under the wing of the liberal-monarchist party, while the
peasantry, in the mass, strives to come under the leadership of the
revolutionary and republican party. That is why the bourgeoisie is
incapable of carrying the democratic revolution to its consummation,
while the peasantry is capable of doing so, and we must exert all our
efforts to help it to do so.

It may be objected: but this requires no proof, this is all ABC; all
Social-Democrats understand this perfectly well. But that is not so. It
is not understood by those who can talk about “the sweep” of the
revolution being “diminished” because the bourgeoisie will fall away
from it. Such people repeat the words of our agrarian program that they
have learned by rote without understanding their meaning, for otherwise
they would not be frightened by the concept of the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry, which inevitably follows from the entire Marxian world
outlook and from our program; otherwise they would not restrict the
sweep of the great Russian revolution to the limits to which the
bourgeoisie is prepared to go. Such people defeat their abstract Marxian
revolutionary phrases by their concrete anti-Marxian and
anti-revolutionary resolutions.

Those who really understand the role of the peasantry in a victorious
Russian revolution would not dream of saying that the sweep of the
revolution would be diminished if the bourgeoisie recoiled from it. For,
as a matter of fact, the Russian revolution will begin to assume its
real sweep, will really assume the widest revolutionary sweep possible
in the epoch of bourgeois-democratic revolution, only when the
bourgeoisie recoils from it and when the masses of the peasantry come
out as active revolutionaries side by side with the proletariat. In
order that it may be consistently carried to its conclusion, our
democratic revolution must rely on such forces as are capable of
paralysing the inevitable inconsistency of the bourgeoisie (i.e.,
capable precisely of “causing it to recoil from the revolution,” which
the Caucasian adherents of _Iskra_ fear so much because of their lack of
judgement).

_The proletariat must carry to completion the democratic revolution, by
allying to itself the mass of the peasantry in order to crush by force
the resistance of the autocracy and_ _to paralyse the instability of the
bourgeoisie. The proletariat must accomplish the socialist revolution,
by allying to itself the mass of the semi-proletarian elements of the
population in order to crush by force the resistance of the bourgeoisie
and to paralyse the instability of the peasantry and the petty
bourgeoisie_. Such are the tasks of the proletariat which the
new-Iskraists present so narrowly in all their arguments and resolutions
about the sweep of the revolution.

One circumstance, however, must not be forgotten, although it is
frequently lost sight of in discussions about the “sweep” of the
revolution. It must not be forgotten that the point at issue is not the
difficulties this problem presents, but the road along which we must
seek and attain its solution. The point is not whether it is easy or
difficult to make the sweep of the revolution mighty and invincible, but
how we must act in order to make this sweep more powerful. It is
precisely on the fundamental nature of our activity, on the direction it
should take, that our views differ. We emphasise this because careless
and unscrupulous people too frequently confuse two different questions,
namely, the question of the direction in which the road leads, i.e., the
selection of one of two different roads, and the question of how easily
the goal can be reached, or of how near the goal is on the given road.

We have not dealt with this last question at all in the foregoing
because it has not evoked any disagreement or divergency in the Party.
But it goes without saying that the question itself is extremely
important and deserves the most serious attention of all
Social-Democrats. It would be a piece of unpardonable optimism to forget
the difficulties which accompany the task of drawing into the movement
the masses not only of the working class, but also of the peasantry.
These difficulties have more than once been the rock against which the
efforts to carry a democratic revolution to completion have been
wrecked; and it was the inconsistent and self-seeking bourgeoisie which
triumphed most of all, because it “made capital” in the shape of
monarchist protection against the people, and at the same time
“preserved the virginity” of liberalism . . . or of the _Osvobozhdeniye_
trend. But difficult does not mean impossible. The important thing is to
be convinced that the path chosen is the correct one, and this
conviction will multiply a hundred-fold the revolutionary energy and
revolutionary enthusiasm which can perform miracles.

The depth of the rift among present-day Social-Democrats on the question
of the path to be chosen can be seen at once by comparing the Caucasian
resolution of the new-Iskraists with the resolution of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party. The Congress
resolution says: the bourgeoisie is inconsistent, it will certainly try
to deprive us of the gains of the revolution. Therefore, make more
energetic preparations for the fight, comrades and fellow workers! Arm
yourselves, win the peasantry to your side! We shall not surrender our
revolutionary gains to the self-seeking bourgeoisie without a fight. The
resolution of the Caucasian new-Iskraists says: the bourgeoisie is
inconsistent, it may recoil from the revolution. Therefore, comrades and
fellow workers, please do not think of joining a provisional government,
for, if you do, the bourgeoisie will certainly recoil, and the sweep of
the revolution will thereby be diminished!

One side says: advance the revolution forward, to its consummation, in
spite of the resistance or the passivity of the inconsistent
bourgeoisie.

The other side says: do not think of carrying the revolution to
completion independently, for if you do, the inconsistent bourgeoisie
will recoil from it.

Are these not two diametrically opposite paths? Is it not obvious that
one set of tactics absolutely excludes the other? That the first tactics
are the only correct tactics of revolutionary Social-Democracy, while
the second are in fact purely _Osvobozhdeniye_ tactics?

Notes

^([1]) Of interest in this connection is Mr. Struve's open letter to
Jaurès recently published by the latter in L’Humanité^([6]) and by Mr.
Struve in the _Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 72. —_Lenin_

^([2]) 36. Lenin has in view the article “On the Provisional
Revolutionary Government” (see present edition, Vol. 8, pp. 461-81), and
also the article by F. Engels, _Die Bakunisten an der Arbeit.
Denkschrift über den Aufstand in Spanien im Sommmer 1873,_ in which he
criticises the Bakuninist resolution Lenin is referring to (see _Der
Volksstaat,_ Nos. 105, 106, 107, 1873).

^([3]) PLACEHOLDER

^([4]) PLACEHOLDER

^([5]) 39. The reference is to Marx’s words in his _Zur Kritik der lie
gelsehien Rechtsphilosophie,_ MEGA, 1. Abt., Bd. 1, S. 614.

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

 

13. Conclusion. Dare We Win?

People who are superficially acquainted with the state of affairs in
Russian Social-Democracy, or who judge as mere onlookers without knowing
the whole history of our internal Party struggle since the days of
Economism, very often also dismiss the disagreements on tactics which
have now become crystallised, especially after the Third Congress, with
the simple argument that there are two natural, inevitable and quite
reconcilable trends in every Social-Democratic movement. One side, they
say, lays special emphasis on the ordinary, current, everyday work, on
the necessity of developing propaganda and agitation, of preparing
forces, deepening the movement, etc., while the other side lays emphasis
on the militant, general political, revolutionary tasks of the movement,
points to the necessity of armed insurrection, advances the slogans: for
a revolutionary-democratic dictatorship, for a provisional revolutionary
government. Neither one side nor the other should exaggerate, they say;
extremes are bad, both here and there (and, generally speaking,
everywhere in the world), etc., etc.

The cheap truisms of worldly (and “political” in quotation marks)
wisdom, which such arguments undoubtedly contain, too often cover up a
failure to understand the urgent and acute needs of the Party. Take the
differences on tactics that now exist among the Russian
Social-Democrats. of course, the special emphasis laid on the everyday,
routine aspect of the work, such as we observe in the new _Iskra_-ist
arguments about tactics, could not in itself present any danger and
could not give rise to any divergence of opinion regarding tactical
slogans. But the moment you compare the resolutions of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party with the
resolutions of the Conference this divergence becomes strikingly
obvious.

What, then, is the trouble? The trouble is that, in the first place, it
is not enough to point abstractly to the two currents in the movement
and to the harmfulness of extremes. One must know concretely what the
given movement is suffering from at the given time, what constitutes the
real political danger to the Party at the present time. Secondly, one
must know what real political forces are profiting by this or that
tactical slogan—or perhaps by the absence of this or that slogan. To
listen to the new _Iskra_-ists, one would arrive at the conclusion that
the Social-Democratic Party is threatened with the danger of throwing
overboard propaganda and agitation, the economic struggle and criticism
of bourgeois democracy, of becoming inordinately absorbed in military
preparations, armed attacks, the seizure of power, etc. Actually,
however, real danger is threatening the Party from an entirely different
quarter. Anyone who is at all closely familiar with the state of the
movement, anyone who follows it carefully and thoughtfully, cannot fail
to see the ridiculous side of the new _Iskra_’s fears. The entire work
of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party has already been fully
moulded into firm, immutable forms which absolutely guarantee that our
main attention will be fixed on propaganda and agitation, impromptu and
mass meetings, on the distribution of leaflets and pamphlets, assisting
in the economic struggle and championing the slogans of that struggle.
There is not a single Party committee, not a single district committee,
not a single central delegates’ meeting or a single factory group where
ninety-nine per cent of all the attention, energy and time are not
always and constantly devoted to these functions, which have become
firmly established ever since the middle of the ’nineties. Only those
who are entirely unfamiliar with the movement are ignorant of this. Only
very naïve or ill-informed people can be taken in by the new
_Iskra_-ists’ repetition of stated truths when it is done with an air of
great importance.

The fact is that not only is no excessive zeal displayed among us with
regard to the tasks of insurrection, to the general political slogans
and to the matter of leading the entire popular revolution, but, on the
contrary, it is _backwardness_ in this very respect that stands out most
strikingly, constitutes our weakest spot and a real danger to the
movement, which may degenerate, and in some places is degenerating, from
one that is revolutionary in deeds into one that is revolutionary in
words. Among the many, many hundreds of organisations, groups and
circles that are conducting the work of the Party you will not find a
single one which has not from its very inception conducted the kind of
everyday work about which the wiseacres of the new _Iskra_ now talk with
the air of people who have discovered new truths. On the other hand, you
will find only an insignificant percentage of groups and circles that
have understood the tasks an armed insurrection entails, which have
begun to carry them out, and have realised the necessity of leading the
entire popular revolution against tsarism, the necessity of advancing
for that purpose certain definite progressive slogans and no other.

We are incredibly behind in our progressive and genuinely revolutionary
tasks, in very many instances we have not even become conscious of them;
here and there we have failed to notice the strengthening of
revolutionary bourgeois democracy owing to our backwardness in this
respect. But the writers in the new _Iskra_, turning their backs on the
course of events and on the requirements of the times, keep repeating
insistently: Don’t forget the old! Don’t let yourselves be carried away
by the new! This is the principal and unvarying leitmotif of all the
important resolutions of the Conference; whereas in the Congress
resolutions you just as unvaryingly read: while confirming the old (and
without stopping to chew it over and over, for the very reason that it
is old and has already been settled and recorded in literature, in
resolutions and by experience), we put forward a new task, draw
attention to it, issue a new slogan, and demand that the genuinely
revolutionary Social-Democrats immediately set to work to put it into
effect.

That is how matters really stand with regard to the question of the two
trends in Social-Democratic tactics. The revolutionary period has called
forth new tasks, which only the totally blind can fail to see. And some
Social-Democrats unhesitatingly recognise these tasks and place them on
the order of the day, declaring: the armed insurrection brooks no delay,
prepare yourselves for it immediately and energetically, remember that
it is indispensable for a decisive victory, issue the slogans of a
republic, of a provisional government, of a revolutionary-democratic
dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry. Others, however, draw
back, mark time, write prefaces instead of giving slogans; instead of
pointing to the new while confirming the old, they chew this old
tediously and at great length, inventing pretexts to avoid the new,
unable to determine the conditions for a decisive victory or to issue
the slogans which alone are in line with the striving to attain complete
victory.

The political result of this _khvostism_ stares us in the face. The
fable about a rapprochement between the “majority” of the Russian
Social-Democratic Labour Party and the revolutionary bourgeois democracy
remains a fable which has not been confirmed by a single political fact,
by a single important resolution of the “Bolsheviks” or a single act of
the Third Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party. On the
other hand, the opportunist, monarchist bourgeoisie, as represented by
the _Osvobozhdeniye_, has long been _welcoming_ the trends of the
“principles” of new _Iskra_-ism and now it is actually running its mill
with their grist, is adopting their catchwords and “ideas” directed
against “secrecy” and “riots,” against exaggerating the “technical” side
of the revolution, against openly proclaiming the slogan of armed
insurrection, against the “revolutionism” of extreme demands, etc., etc.
The resolution of a whole conference of “Menshevik” Social-Democrats in
the Caucasus, and the endorsement of that resolution by the editors of
the new _Iskra_, sums it all up politically in an unmistakable way: lest
the bourgeoisie recoil if the proletariat takes part in a
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship! This puts it in a nutshell. This
gives the finishing touch to the transformation of the proletariat into
an appendage of the monarchist bourgeoisie. The _political meaning_ of
the _khvostism_ of the new _Iskra_ is thereby proved in fact, not by a
casual declaration of some individual, but by a resolution especially
endorsed by a whole trend.

Anyone who ponders over these facts will understand the real
significance of the stock reference to the two sides and the two trends
in the Social-Democratic movement. For a study of these trends on a
large scale, take Bernsteinism. The Bernsteinians have been dinning into
our ears in exactly the same way that it is they who understand the true
needs of the proletariat, the tasks connected with the growth of its
forces, with rendering the entire activity more profound, with preparing
the elements of a new society, with propaganda and agitation! Bernstein
says: we demand a frank recognition of what is, thus sanctifying a
“movement” _without_ “final aims,” sanctifying defensive tactics only,
preaching the tactics of fear “lest the bourgeoisie recoil.” The
Bernsteinians also raised an outcry against the “Jacobinism” of the
revolutionary Social-Democrats, against the “publicists” who fail to
understand the “initiative of the workers,” etc., etc. In reality, as
everyone knows, the revolutionary Social-Democrats have never even
thought of abandoning the everyday, petty work, the mustering of forces,
etc., etc. All they demanded was a clear understanding of the final aim,
a clear presentation of the revolutionary tasks; they wanted to raise
the semi-proletarian and semi-petty-bourgeois strata to the
revolutionary level of the proletariat, not to reduce this level to that
of opportunist considerations such as “lest the bourgeoisie recoil.”
Perhaps the most vivid expression of this rift between the intellectual
opportunist wing and the proletarian revolutionary wing of the Party was
the question: _durfen wir siegen_? “Dare we win?” Is it permissible for
us to win? Would it not be dangerous for us to win? Ought we to win?
This question, which seems so strange at first sight, was raised,
however, and had to be raised, because the opportunists were afraid of
victory, were frightening the proletariat away from it, were predicting
that trouble would come of it, were ridiculing the slogans that
straightforwardly called for it.

The same fundamental division into an intellectual-opportunist and
proletarian-revolutionary trend exists also among us, with the very
material difference, however, that here we are faced with the question
of a democratic revolution, and not of a socialist revolution. The
question “dare we win?” which seems so absurd at first sight, has been
raised among us also. It was raised by Martynov in his _Two
Dictatorships_, in which he prophesied dire misfortune if we prepare
well for and carry out an insurrection quite successfully. The question
has been raised in all the new _Iskra_ literature dealing with a
provisional revolutionary government, and all the time persistent though
futile efforts have been made to liken Millerand’s participation in a
bourgeois-opportunist government to Varlin’s^([1]) participation in a
petty-bourgeois revolutionary government. It is embodied in a
resolution: “lest the bourgeoisie recoil.” And although Kautsky, for
instance, now tries to wax ironical and says that our dispute about a
provisional revolutionary government is like dividing the skin of a bear
before the bear has been killed, this irony only proves that even clever
and revolutionary Social-Democrats are liable to put their foot in it
when they talk about something they know of only by hearsay. German
Social-Democracy is not yet so near to killing its bear (carrying out a
socialist revolution), but the dispute as to whether we “dare” kill the
bear was of enormous importance from the point of view of principles and
of practical politics. Russian Social-Democrats are not yet so near to
being strong enough to “kill their bear” (to carry out a democratic
revolution), but the question as to whether we “dare” kill it is of
extreme importance for the whole future of Russia and for the future of
Russian Social-Democracy. An army cannot be energetically and
successfully mustered and led unless we are sure that we “dare” win.

Take our old Economists. They too howled that their opponents were
conspirators, Jacobins (see the _Rabocheye Dyelyo_, especially No. 10,
and Martynov’s speech in the debate on the program at the Second
Congress), that by plunging into politics they were divorcing themselves
from the masses, that they were losing sight of the fundamentals of the
working-class movement, ignoring the initiative of the workers, etc.,
etc. In reality these supporters of the “initiative of the workers” were
opportunist intellectuals who tried to foist on the workers their own
narrow and philistine conception of the tasks of the proletariat. In
reality the opponents of Economism, as everyone can see from the old
_Iskra_, did not neglect or push into the background any of the aspects
of Social-Democratic work, nor did they in the least forget the economic
struggle; but they were able at the same time to present the urgent and
immediate political tasks in their full scope and they opposed the
transformation of the workers’ party into an “economic” appendage of the
liberal bourgeoisie.

The Economists had learned by rote that politics are based on economics
and “understood” this to mean that the political struggle should be
reduced to the level of the economic struggle. The new-Iskraists have
learned by rote that the economic basis of the democratic revolution is
the bourgeois revolution, and “understood” this to mean that the
democratic aims of the proletariat should be degraded to the level of
bourgeois moderation, to the limits beyond which “the bourgeoisie will
recoil.” On the pretext of rendering their work more profound, on the
pretext of rousing the initiative of the workers and pursuing a purely
class policy, the Economists were actually delivering the working class
into the hands of the liberal-bourgeois politicians, i.e., were leading
the Party along a path which objectively meant exactly that. On the same
pretexts, the new-Iskraists are actually betraying the interests of the
proletariat in the democratic revolution to the bourgeoisie, i.e., are
leading the Party along a path which objectively means exactly that. The
Economists thought that leadership in the political struggle was no
concern of the Social-Democrats but properly the business of the
liberals. The new-Iskraists think that the active conduct of the
democratic revolution is no concern of the Social-Democrats but properly
the business of the democratic bourgeoisie, for, they argue, if the
proletariat takes the leading and pre-eminent part it will “diminish the
sweep” of the revolution.

In short, the new-Iskraists are the epigones of Economism, not only in
their origin at the Second Party Congress, but also in the manner in
which they now present the tactical tasks of the proletariat in the
democratic revolution. They, too, constitute an intellectual-opportunist
wing of the Party. In the sphere of organisation they made their debut
with the anarchist individualism of intellectuals and finished with
“disorganisation-as-a-process,” fixing in the “Rules”^([2]) [The “_Rules
of Organisation_” adopted at the Geneva Menshevik Conference in 1905]
adopted by the Conference the separation of the Party’s publishing
activities from the Party organisation, an indirect and practically
four-stage system of elections, a system of Bonapartist plebiscites
instead of democratic representation, and finally the principle of
“agreements” between the part and the whole. In Party tactics they
continued to slide down the same inclined plane. In the “plan of the
Zemstvo campaign” they declared that speeches to Zemstvo-ists were “the
highest type of demonstration,” finding only two active forces on the
political scene (on the eve of January 9!)—the government and the
democratic bourgeoisie. They made the pressing problem of arming “more
profound” by substituting for the direct and practical slogan of an
appeal to arm, the slogan: arm the people with a burning desire to arm
themselves. The tasks connected with an armed insurrection, with the
establishment of a provisional government and with a
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship have now been distorted and
blunted by them in their official resolutions. “Lest the bourgeoisie
recoil”—this final chord of their last resolution throws a glaring light
on the question of where their path is leading the Party.

The democratic revolution in Russia is a bourgeois revolution by reason
of its social and economic content. But a mere repetition of this
correct Marxian proposition is not enough. It must be properly
understood and properly applied in political slogans. In general, all
political liberties that are founded on present-day, i.e., capitalist,
relations of production are bourgeois liberties. The demand for liberty
expresses primarily the interests of the bourgeoisie. Its
representatives were the first to raise this demand. Its supporters have
everywhere used the liberty they acquired like masters, reducing it to
moderate and meticulous bourgeois doses, combining it with the most
subtle methods of suppressing the revolutionary proletariat in peaceful
times and with brutally cruel methods in stormy times.

But only the rebel Narodniks, the anarchists and the “Economists” could
deduce from this that the struggle for liberty should be rejected or
disparaged. These intellectual-philistine doctrines could be foisted on
the proletariat only for a time and against its will. The proletariat
always realised instinctively that it needed political liberty, needed
it more than anyone else, despite the fact that its immediate effect
would be to strengthen and to organise the bourgeoisie. The proletariat
expects to find its salvation not by avoiding the class struggle but by
developing it, by widening it, increasing its consciousness, its
organisation and determination. Whoever degrades the tasks of the
political struggle transforms the Social-Democrat from a tribune of the
people into a trade union secretary. Whoever degrades the proletarian
tasks in a democratic bourgeois revolution transforms the
Social-Democrat from a leader of the people’s revolution into a leader
of a free labour union.

Yes, the _people’s_ revolution. Social-Democracy has fought, and is
quite rightly fighting against the bourgeois-democratic abuse of the
word “people.” It demands that this word shall not be used to cover up
failure to understand the class antagonisms within the people. It
insists categorically on the need for complete class independence for
the party of the proletariat. But it divides the “people” into
“classes,” not in order that the advanced class may become shut up
within itself, confine itself to narrow aims and emasculate its activity
for fear that the economic rulers of the world will recoil, but in order
that the advanced class, which does not suffer from the halfheartedness,
vacillation and indecision of the intermediate classes, may with all the
greater energy and enthusiasm fight for the cause of the whole of the
people, at the head of the whole of the people.

That is what the present-day new-Iskraists so often fail to understand
and why they substitute for active political slogans in the democratic
revolution a mere pedantic repetition of the word “class,” parsed in all
genders and cases!

The democratic revolution is a bourgeois revolution. The slogan of a
Black Redistribution, or “land and liberty”—this most widespread slogan
of the peasant masses, down trodden and ignorant, yet passionately
yearning for light and happiness—is a bourgeois slogan. But we Marxists
should know that there is not, nor can there be, any other path to real
freedom for the proletariat and the peasantry, than the path of
bourgeois freedom and bourgeois progress. We must not forget that there
is not, nor can there be, at the present time, any other means of
bringing Socialism nearer, than complete political liberty, than a
democratic republic, than the revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of
the proletariat and the peasantry. As the representatives of the
advanced and only revolutionary class, revolutionary without
reservations, doubts or looking back, we must present to the whole of
the people, as widely, as boldly and with the utmost initiative
possible, the tasks of the democratic revolution. To degrade these tasks
in theory means making a travesty of Marxism, distorting it in
philistine fashion, while in practical politics it means delivering the
cause of the revolution into the hands of the bourgeoisie, which will
inevitably recoil from the task of consistently carrying out the
revolution. The difficulties that lie on the road to the complete
victory of the revolution are very great. No one will be able to blame
the representatives of the proletariat if, having done everything in
their power, their efforts are defeated by the resistance of the
reaction, the treachery of the bourgeoisie and the ignorance of the
masses. But everybody and the class-conscious proletariat above all,
will condemn Social-Democracy if it curtails the revolutionary energy of
the democratic revolution and dampens revolutionary ardour because it is
afraid to win, because it is actuated by the consideration: lest the
bourgeoisie recoil.

Revolutions are the locomotives of history, said Marx.^([3]) [In The
Class Struggles in France] Revolutions are the festivals of the
oppressed and the exploited. At no other time are the masses of the
people in a position to come forward so actively as creators of a new
social order as at a time of revolution. At such times the people are
capable of performing miracles, if judged by the narrow, philistine
scale of gradual progress. But the leaders of the revolutionary parties
must also make their aims more comprehensive and bold at such a time, so
that their slogans shall always be in advance of the revolutionary
initiative of the masses, serve as a beacon, reveal to them our
democratic and socialist ideal in all its magnitude and splendour and
show them the shortest and most direct route to complete, absolute and
decisive victory. Let us leave to the opportunists of the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ bourgeoisie the task of inventing roundabout,
circuitous paths of compromise out of fear of the revolution and of the
direct path. If we are compelled by force to drag ourselves along such
paths, we shall be able to fulfil our duty in petty, everyday work also.
But let ruthless struggle first decide the choice of the path. We shall
be traitors to and betrayers of the revolution if we do not use this
festive energy of the masses and their revolutionary ardour to wage a
ruthless and self-sacrificing struggle for the direct and decisive path.
Let the bourgeois opportunists contemplate the future reaction with
craven fear. The workers will not be frightened either by the thought
that the reaction promises to be terrible or by the thought that the
bourgeoisie proposes to recoil. The workers are not looking forward to
striking bargains, are not asking for sops; they are striving to crush
the reactionary forces without mercy, i.e., to set up the
_revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry_.

Of course, greater dangers threaten the ship of our Party in stormy
times than in periods of the smooth “sailing” of liberal progress, which
means the painfully slow sweating of the working class by its
exploiters. of course, the tasks of the revolutionary-democratic
dictatorship are a thousand times more difficult and more complicated
than the tasks of an “extreme opposition” or of the exclusively
parliamentary struggle. But whoever can deliberately prefer smooth
sailing and the path of safe “opposition” in the present revolutionary
situation had better abandon Social-Democratic work for a while, had
better wait until the revolution is over, until the festive days have
passed, when humdrum everyday life starts again and his narrow routine
standards no longer strike such an abominably discordant note, or
constitute such an ugly distortion of the tasks of the advanced class.

At the head of the whole of the people, and particularly of the
peasantry—for complete freedom, for a consistent democratic revolution,
for a republic! At the head of all the toilers and the exploited—for
Socialism! Such must in practice be the policy of the revolutionary
proletariat, such is the class slogan which must permeate and determine
the solution of every tactical problem, every practical step of the
workers’ party during the revolution.

*     *  *

Notes

^([1]) PLACEHOLDER

^([2]) PLACEHOLDER

^([3]) PLACEHOLDER

 

Epilogue

Once Again _Osvobozhdeniye_ Trend, Once Again New _Iskra_ trend

Numbers 71-72 of the _Osvobozhdeniye_ and Nos. 102-103 of the _Iskra_
provide a wealth of additional material on the question to which we have
devoted Chapter 8 of our pamphlet. Since it is quite impossible to make
use of the whole of this rich material here, we shall confine ourselves
to the most important points only: firstly, to the kind of “realism” in
Social-Democracy that _Osvobozhdeniye_ praises and why the latter must
praise it; secondly, to the relationship between the concepts revolution
and dictatorship.

 

I. What Do The Bourgeois Liberal Realists Praise The Social-Democratic “Realists” For?

The articles entitled “The Split in Russian Social-Democracy” and “The
Triumph of Common Sense” (_Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 72) set forth the
opinion on Social-Democracy held by the representatives of the liberal
bourgeoisie, an opinion which is of remarkable value for class-conscious
proletarians. We cannot too strongly recommend every Social-Democrat to
read these articles in full and to ponder over every sentence in them.
We shall reproduce first of all the most important propositions
contained in both these articles.

  “It is fairly difficult,” writes the _Osvobozbdeniye_, “for an outside
  observer to grasp the real political meaning of the disagreements that
  have split the Social-Democratic Party into two factions. A definition
  of the ‘Majority’ faction as the more radical and unswerving, as
  distinct from the ‘Minority’ which allows of certain compromises in
  the interests of the cause would not be quite exact, and in any case
  would not provide an exhaustive characterisation. At any rate the
  traditional dogmas of Marxian orthodoxy are observed by the Minority
  faction with even greater zeal perhaps than by the Lenin faction. The
  following characterisation would appear to us to be more accurate. The
  fundamental political temper of the ’Majority’ is abstract
  revolutionism, rebellion for the sake of rebellion, an eagerness to
  stir up insurrection among the popular masses by any and every means
  and to seize power immediately in their name; to a certain extent this
  brings the ’Leninists’ close to the Socialist-Revolutionaries and
  overshadows in their minds the idea of the class struggle with the
  idea of a Russian revolution involving the whole people; while
  abjuring in practice much of the narrow-mindedness of the
  Social-Democratic doctrine, the ’Leninists’ are, on the other hand,
  thoroughly imbued with the narrow-mindedness of revolutionism,
  renounce all practical work except the preparation of an immediate
  insurrection, ignore on principle all forms of legal and semi-legal
  agitation and every species of practically useful compromise with
  other oppositional trends. The Minority, on the contrary, while
  steadfastly adhering to the doctrine of Marxism, at the same time
  preserves the realistic elements of the Marxian world outlook. The
  fundamental idea of this faction is to oppose the interests of the
  ’proletariat’ to the interests of the bourgeoisie. But, on the other
  hand, the struggle of the proletariat is conceived—of course within
  certain bounds dictated by the immutable dogmas of Social-Democracy—in
  realistically sober fashion, with a clear realisation of all the
  concrete conditions and aims of this struggle. Neither of the two
  factions pursues its basic point of view quite consistently, for in
  their ideological and political activity they are bound by the strict
  formulae of the Social Democratic catechism, which keep the
  ’Leninists’ from becoming unswerving rebels, after the fashion of
  some, at least, of the Socialist-Revolutionaries, and the
  ’_Iskra_-ists’ from becoming the practical leaders of the real
  political movement of the working class.”

  And, after quoting the contents of the most important resolutions, the
  _Osvobozbdeniye_ writer goes on to illustrate his general “thoughts,”
  with several concrete remarks about them. In comparison with the Third
  Congress, he says, “the Minority Conference takes a totally different
  attitude towards armed insurrection.” “In connection with the attitude
  towards armed insurrection,” there is a difference in the respective
  resolutions on a provisional government. “A similar difference is
  revealed in relation to the workers’ trade unions. The ’Leninists’ do
  not say a single word in their resolution about this most important
  starting point in the political education and organisation of the
  working class. The Minority, on the other hand, drew up a very weighty
  resolution.” With regard to the liberals, both factions, he says, are
  unanimous, but the Third Congress “repeats almost word for word
  Plekhanov’s resolution on the attitude towards the liberals adopted at
  the Second Congress and rejects Starover’s resolution adopted by the
  same Congress, which was more favourably inclined towards the
  liberals.” Although the Congress and the Conference resolutions on the
  peasant movement coincide on the whole, "the ‘Majority’ lays more
  emphasis on the idea of the revolutionary confiscation of the
  landlords’ estates and other land, while the ‘Minority’ wants to make
  the demand for democratic state and administrative reforms the basis
  of its agitation.”

  Finally, the _Osvobozhdeniye_ cites from the _Iskra_, No. 100, a
  Menshevik resolution, the main clause of which reads as follows: “In
  view of the fact that at the present time underground work alone does
  not secure adequate participation of the masses in Party life and in
  some degree leads to the masses as such being contrasted to the Party
  as an illegal organisation, the latter must assume leadership of the
  trade union struggle of the workers on a legal basis, strictly linking
  up this struggle with the Social-Democratic tasks.” Commenting on this
  resolution the _Osvobozhdeniye_ exclaims: “We heartily welcome this
  resolution as a triumph of common sense, as evidence that a definite
  section of the Social-Democratic Party is beginning to see the light
  with regard to tactics.”

The reader now has before him all the essential opinions of the
_Osvobozhdeniye_. It would, of course, be the greatest mistake to regard
these opinions as correct in the sense that they correspond to objective
truth. Every Social-Democrat will easily detect mistakes in them at
every step. It would be naïve to forget that these opinions are
thoroughly permeated with the interests and the points of view of the
liberal bourgeoisie, and that accordingly they are utterly biased and
tendentious. They reflect the views of the Social-Democrats in the same
way as objects are reflected in a concave or convex mirror. But it would
be an even greater mistake to forget that in the final analysis these
bourgeois-distorted opinions reflect the real interests of the
bourgeoisie, which, as a class, undoubtedly understands correctly which
trends in Social-Democracy are advantageous, close, akin and agreeable,
and which trends are harmful, distant, alien and antipathetic to it. A
bourgeois philosopher or a bourgeois publicist can never understand
Social-Democracy properly, neither Menshevik nor Bolshevik
Social-Democracy. But if he is at all a sensible publicist, his class
instinct will not deceive him, and he will always grasp the significance
for the bourgeoisie of one or another trend in the Social-Democratic
movement, on the whole correctly, although he may present it in a
distorted way. That is why the class instinct of our enemy, his class
opinion, is always deserving of the most serious attention of every
class-conscious proletarian.

What, then, does the class instinct of the Russian bourgeoisie, as
expressed by the _Osvobozhdentsi_, tell us?

It quite definitely expresses its satisfaction with the trend
represented by the new _Iskra_, praises it for its realism,
sober-mindedness, the triumph of common sense, the seriousness of its
resolutions, its beginning to see the light on questions of tactics, its
practicalness, etc.—and it expresses dissatisfaction with the trend of
the Third Congress, censures it for its narrow-mindedness,
revolutionism, its rebel spirit, its repudiation of practically useful
compromises, etc. The class instinct of the bourgeoisie suggests to it
exactly what has been repeatedly proved with the help of most precise
facts in our literature, namely, that the new-Iskraists are the
opportunist and their opponents the revolutionary wing of the
present-day Russian Social-Democratic movement. The liberals cannot but
sympathise with the trend of the former, and cannot but censure the
trend of the latter. The liberals, being the ideologists of the
bourgeoisie, perfectly well understand the advantages to the bourgeoisie
of “practicalness, sober-mindedness and seriousness” on the part of the
working class, i.e., of actually restricting its field of activity
within the boundaries of capitalism, reforms, the trade union struggle,
etc. Dangerous and terrible to the bourgeoisie is the “revolutionary
narrow-mindedness” of the proletariat and its endeavour in order to
promote its own class aims to win the leadership in a popular Russian
revolution.

That this is the real meaning of the word “realism” as employed by the
_Osvobozhdeniye_ is evident among other things from the way it was used
previously by the _Osvobozhdeniye_ and Mr. Struve. The _Iskra_ itself
could not but admit that _this_ was the meaning of the
_Osvobozhdeniye_’s “realism.” Take, for instance, the article entitled
“It Is High Time!” in the supplement to the _Iskra_, No. 73-74. The
author of this article (a consistent exponent of the views of the
“Marsh” at the Second Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour
Party) frankly expressed the opinion that “at the Congress Akimov played
the part of the ghost of opportunism rather than of its real
representative.” And the editors of the _Iskra_ were forthwith obliged
to correct the author of the article “It Is High Time!” by stating in a
note:

  “We cannot agree with this opinion. Comrade Akimov’s views on the
  programme bear the clear imprint of opportunism, which fact is
  admitted even by the _Osvobozhdeniye_ critic, who—in one of its recent
  issues—stated that Comrade Akimov is an adherent of the ’realist’—
  read: revisionist—tendency.”

Thus the _Iskra_ itself is perfectly aware that the _Osvobozhdeniye_’s
“realism” is simply opportunism and nothing else. If in attacking
“liberal realism” (_Iskra_, No. 102) the _Iskra_ now says nothing about
how _it was praised by the liberals_ for its realism, the explanation of
this circumstance is that such praise is harder to swallow than any
censure. Such praise (which the _Osvobozhdeniye_ uttered not by mere
chance and not for the first time) actually proves the affinity between
liberal realism and those tendencies of Social-Democratic “realism”
(read: opportunism) that run through every resolution of the
new-Iskraists as a result of the mistaken character of their whole
tactical line.

Indeed, the Russian bourgeoisie has already fully revealed its
inconsistency and egoism in the “popular” revolution—has revealed it in
Mr. Struve’s arguments, by the whole tone and content of the numerous
liberal newspapers, and by the nature of the political utterances of the
bulk of the Zemstvo-ists, the bulk of the intellectuals and in general
of all the adherents of Messrs. Trubetskoy, Petrunkevich, Rodichev and
Co. of course, the bourgeoisie does not always clearly understand, but
in general and on the whole, its class instinct enables it to grasp
perfectly well that, on the one hand, the proletariat and the “people”
are useful for its revolution as cannon fodder, as a battering-ram
against the autocracy, but that, on the other hand, the proletariat and
the revolutionary peasantry will be terribly dangerous to it if they win
a “decisive victory over tsarism” and carry the democratic revolution to
completion. That is why the bourgeoisie strains every effort to induce
the proletariat to be content with a “modest” role in the revolution, to
be more sober-minded, practical and realistic, to be guided in its
activities by the principle, “lest the bourgeoisie recoil.”

The bourgeois intellectuals know full well that they will not be able to
get rid of the working-class movement. That is why they do not come out
against the working-class movement, they do not come out against the
class struggle of the proletariat—no, they even pay lip service to the
right to strike, to a genteel class struggle, understanding the
working-class movement and the class struggle in the Brentano or
Hirsch-Duncker sense. In other words they are fully prepared to “yield”
to the workers the right to strike and to organise in trade unions
(which in fact has already been almost won by the workers themselves),
provided the workers renounce their “rebelliousness,” their
“narrow-minded revolutionism,” their hostility to “practically-useful
compromises,” their claims and aspirations to put on the “popular
Russian revolution,” the imprint of _their_ class struggle, the imprint
of proletarian consistency, proletarian determination and “plebeian
Jacobinism.” That is why the bourgeois intellectuals all over Russia
exert every effort, resort to thousands of ways and means—books,^([1])
lectures, speeches, talks, etc., etc.—to imbue the workers with the
ideas of (bourgeois) sober-mindedness, (liberal) practicalness,
(opportunist) realism, (Brentano) class struggle, (Hirsch-Duncker) trade
unions,^([2]) etc. The latter two slogans are particularly convenient
for the bourgeois of the “constitutional-democratic” party, or the party
of “liberation,” since outwardly they coincide with the Marxian slogans,
since with a few small omissions and some slight distortions they can
easily be confused with and sometimes even passed off as
Social-Democratic slogans. For instance, the legal liberal newspaper
_Rassvyet_ (which we will try some day to discuss in greater detail with
the readers of the _Proletary_) frequently says such “bold” things about
the class struggle, about the possible deception of the proletariat by
the bourgeoisie, about the working-class movement, about the initiative
of the proletariat, etc., etc., that the inattentive reader or an
unenlightened worker might easily be led to believe that its
“social-democratism” is genuine. Actually, however, it is a bourgeois
imitation of social-democratism, an opportunist distortion and
perversion of the concept class struggle.

At the bottom of the whole of this gigantic (in breadth of influence on
the masses) bourgeois subterfuge lies the tendency to reduce the
working-class movement mainly to a trade union movement, to keep it as
far away as possible from an independent (i.e., revolutionary and
directed towards a democratic dictatorship) policy, to “overshadow in
the minds of the workers the idea of a Russian revolution involving the
whole people with the idea of the class struggle.”

As the reader will perceive, we have turned the _Osvobozhdeniye_
formulation upside down. This is an excellent formulation that
excellently expresses the two views of the role of the proletariat in a
democratic revolution: the bourgeois view and the Social-Democratic
view. The bourgeoisie wants to confine the proletariat to the trade
union movement and thereby to “overshadow in its mind the idea of a
Russian revolution involving the whole people with the idea of the
(_Brentano_) class struggle”—which is wholly in the spirit of the
Bernsteinian authors of the _Credo_, who overshadowed in the minds of
the workers the idea of political struggle with the idea of a “purely
working-class” movement. Social-Democracy, however, wants, on the
contrary, to develop the class struggle of the proletariat to the point
where the latter will take the leading part in the popular Russian
revolution, i.e., will lead this revolution to a the
democratic-dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry.

The revolution in our country is one that involves the whole people,
says the bourgeoisie to the proletariat. Therefore, you, as a separate
class, must confine yourselves to your class struggle, must in the name
of “common sense” devote your attention mainly to the trade unions, and
their legalisation, must consider these trade unions as “the most
important starting point in your political education and organisation,”
must in a revolutionary situation draw up for the most part “serious”
resolutions like the new _Iskra_ resolution, must pay careful heed to
resolutions that are “more favourably inclined towards the liberals,”
must show preference for leaders who display a tendency to become
“practical leaders of the real political movement of the working class,”
must “preserve the realistic elements of the Marxian world outlook” (if
you have unfortunately already become infected with the “strict
formulae” of this “unscientific” catechism).

The revolution in our country is one involving the whole people,
Social-Democracy says to the proletariat. Therefore, you, as the most
progressive and the only thoroughly revolutionary class, must strive not
only to take the most active part, but also the leading, part in it.
Therefore, you must not confine yourselves to narrowly conceived limits
of the class struggle, meaning mainly the trade union movement, but, on
the contrary, you must strive to widen the limits and the content of
your class struggle to _include_ not only _all_ the aims of the present,
democratic, Russian revolution of the whole of the people, but the aims
of the subsequent socialist revolution as well. Therefore, while not
ignoring the trade union movement, while not refusing to take advantage
of even the slightest legal possibilities, you must, in a revolutionary
period, put in the forefront the tasks of armed insurrection and the
formation of a revolutionary army and a revolutionary government as
being the only way to the complete victory of the people over tsarism,
to the winning of a democratic republic and real political liberty.

It would be superfluous to speak about the half-hearted and inconsistent
stand, which, naturally, is so pleasing to the bourgeoisie, that the new
_Iskra_ resolutions took on this question because of their mistaken
“line.”

Notes

^([1]) Cf. Prokopovich, _The Labour Question in Russia_ —_Lenin_

^([2]) PLACEHOLDER

 

II. Comrade Martynov Again Renders the Question “More Profound”

Let us pass on to Martynov’s articles in Nos. 102 and 103 of the
_Iskra_. We shall, of course, make no reply to Martynov’s attempts to
prove the incorrectness of our and the correctness of his interpretation
of a number of citations from Engels and Marx. These attempts are so
trivial, Martynov’s subterfuges so obvious and the question so clear
that it would be of no interest to dwell on this point again. Every
thinking reader will be able easily to see through the simple wiles
employed by Martynov in his retreat all along the line, particularly
when the complete translations of Engels’ pamphlet _The Bakunists at
Work_ and Marx’s _Address of the Central Council to the Communist
League_ of March 1850,^([4]) on which a group of collaborators of the
_Proletary_ are now working, are published. A single quotation from
Martynov’s article will suffice to make his retreat clear to the reader.

“The _Iskra_ admits,” says Martynov in No. 103, “that the establishment
of a provisional government is one of the possible and expedient ways of
furthering the revolution, and denies the expediency of the
participation of Social-Democrats in a _bourgeois_ provisional
government, precisely in the interests of a complete seizure, in the
future, of the state machine for a socialist revolution.” In other
words, the _Iskra_ now admits the absurdity of all its fears concerning
the responsibility of a revolutionary government for the exchequer and
the banks, concerning the danger and impossibility of taking over the
“prisons,” etc. But the _Iskra_ is only muddling things as of old,
confusing the democratic with the socialist dictatorship. This muddle is
unavoidable, it is a means to cover up the retreat.

But among the muddleheads of the new _Iskra_ Martynov stands out as a
muddleheaded of the first order, as a muddlehead of talent, if we may so
express it. Confusing the question by his laborious efforts to render it
“more profound,” he almost invariably “arrives at” new formulations
which show up splendidly the entire falsity of the stand he has taken.
You will remember how in the days of Economism he rendered Plekhanov
“more profound” and created the formulation: “economic struggle against
the employers and the government.” It would be difficult to find in all
the literature of the Economists a more apt expression of the entire
falsity of this trend. It is the same today. Martynov zealously serves
the new _Iskra_ and almost every time he opens his mouth he furnishes us
with new and excellent material for an evaluation of the new _Iskra_’s
false position. In No. 102 he says that Lenin “has imperceptibly
substituted the concept dictatorship for that of revolution” (p. 3, col.
2).

As a matter of fact all the accusations levelled at us by the
new-Iskraists can be reduced to this one. And how grateful we are to
Martynov for this accusation! What an invaluable service he renders us
in the struggle against the new _Iskra_ ideas by formulating his
accusation in this way! We must positively beg the editors of the
_Iskra_ to let Martynov loose against us more often for the purpose of
rendering the attacks on the _Proletary_ “more profound” and for a
“truly principled” formulation of these attacks. For the more Martynov
strains to argue on the plane of principles the worse his arguments
appear, and the more clearly he reveals the gaps in the new _Iskra_
ideas, the more successfully he performs on himself and on his friends
the useful pedagogical operation: _reductio ad absurdum_ (reducing the
principles of the new _Iskra_ to absurdity).

The _Vperyod_ and the _Proletary_ “substitute” the term dictatorship for
that of revolution. The _Iskra_ does not want such a “substitution.”
Just so, most esteemed Comrade Martynov! You have unwittingly stated a
great truth. With this new formulation you have confirmed our contention
that the _Iskra_ is dragging at the tail of the revolution, is straying
into an _Osvobozhdeniye_ formulation of its tasks, whereas the _Vperyod_
and the _Proletary_ are issuing slogans that lead the democratic
revolution forward.

You don’t understand this, Comrade Martynov? In view of the importance
of the question we shall try to give you a detailed explanation.

The bourgeois character of the democratic revolution expresses itself,
among other things, in the fact that a number of classes, groups and
sections of society which take their stand entirely on the recognition
of private property and commodity production and are incapable of going
beyond these bounds, are led by force of circumstances to recognise the
uselessness of the autocracy and of the whole feudal order in general,
and join in the demand for liberty. The bourgeois character of _this_
liberty, which is demanded by “society” and advocated in a flood of
words (and words only!) by the landowners and the capitalists, is
manifesting itself more and more clearly. At the same time the radical
difference between the struggle of the workers and the struggle of the
bourgeoisie for liberty, between proletarian and liberal democratism,
also becomes more obvious. The working class and its class-conscious
representatives are marching forward and pushing this struggle forward,
not only without fearing to carry it to completion, but striving to go
far beyond the uttermost limits of the democratic revolution. The
bourgeoisie is inconsistent and self-seeking, and accepts the slogans of
liberty only in part and hypocritically. All attempts to draw a
particular line or to draw up particular “points” (like the points in
Starover’s or the Conferencers’ resolution) beyond which begins this
hypocrisy of the bourgeois friends of liberty, or, if you like, this
betrayal of liberty by its bourgeois friends, are inevitably doomed to
failure; for the bourgeoisie, caught between two fires (the autocracy
and the proletariat), is capable of changing its position and slogans by
a thousand ways and means, of adapting itself by moving an inch to the
Left or an inch to the Right, constantly bargaining and dickering. The
task of proletarian democratism is not to invent such lifeless “points,”
but unceasingly to criticise the developing political situation, to
expose the ever new and unforeseeable inconsistencies and betrayals on
the part of the bourgeoisie.

Recall the history of Mr. Struve’s political pronouncements in the
illegal press, the history of Social-Democracy’s war with him, and you
will see clearly how these tasks were carried out by Social-Democracy,
the champion of proletarian democratism. Mr. Struve began with a purely
Shipov slogan: “Rights and an Authoritative Zemstvo” (see my article in
the _Zarya_, “The Persecutors of the Zemstvo and the Hannibals of
Liberalism”^([1])). Social-Democracy exposed him and pushed him in the
direction of a definitely constitutionalist program. When this “pushing”
took effect, thanks to the particularly rapid progress of revolutionary
events, the struggle shifted to the next question of democracy: not only
a constitution in general, but one providing for universal and equal
suffrage, direct elections and secret ballot. When we “captured” this
new position from the “enemy” (the adoption of universal suffrage by the
Osvobozhdeniye League) we began to press further; we showed up the
hypocrisy and falsity of a two-chamber system, and the fact that
universal suffrage had not been fully recognised by the
_Osvobozhdentsi_; we pointed to their _monarchism_ and showed up the
huckstering nature of their democratism, or, in other words, the
_bartering away_ of the interests of the great Russian revolution by
these _Osvobozhderiye_ heroes of the moneybags.

Finally, the savage obstinacy of the autocracy, the enormous progress of
the civil war and the hopelessness of the position into which the
monarchists have led Russia have begun to penetrate even the thickest
skulls. The revolution has become a _fact_. It is no longer necessary to
be a revolutionary to acknowledge the revolution. The autocratic
government has actually been and is disintegrating in the sight of all.
As has justly been remarked in the legal press by a certain liberal (Mr.
Gredeskul), actual insubordination to this government has set in.
Despite all its apparent strength the autocracy has proved impotent; the
events attending the developing revolution have simply begun to brush
aside this parasitic organism which is rotting alive. Compelled to base
their activity (or, to put it more correctly, their political
wire-pulling) on relationships as they are actually taking shape, the
liberal bourgeois _have begun to see the necessity of recognising the
revolution_. They do so not because they are revolutionaries, but
despite the fact that they are not revolutionaries. They do so of
necessity and against their will, angrily glaring at the successes of
the revolution, they blame the autocracy for the revolution because it
does not want to strike a bargain, but wants a life-and-death struggle.
Born hucksters, they hate struggle and revolution, but circumstances
force them to tread the ground of revolution, for there is no other
ground under their feet.

We are witnessing a highly instructive and highly comical spectacle. The
bourgeois liberal prostitutes are trying to drape themselves in the toga
of revolution. The _Osvobozhdentsi_—_risum teneatis, amici_!^([2])—the
_Osvobozhdentsi_ are beginning to speak in the name of the revolution!
The _Osvobozhdentsi_ are beginning to assure us that they “do not fear
revolution” (Mr. Struve in the _Osvobozhdeniye_, No. 72)!!! The
_Osvobozhdentsi_ are voicing their claims “to be at the head of the
revolution”!!!

This is an exceptionally significant phenomenon that characterises not
only the progress of bourgeois liberalism, but even more so the progress
of the real successes of the revolutionary movement, which has
_compelled_ recognition. Even the bourgeoisie is beginning to feel that
it is more to its advantage to take its stand on the side of the
revolution—so shaky is the autocracy. On the other hand, this
phenomenon, which testifies to the fact that the entire movement has
risen to a new and higher plane, also sets us new and higher tasks. The
recognition of the revolution by the bourgeoisie cannot be sincere,
irrespective of the personal integrity of this or that bourgeois
ideologist. The bourgeoisie cannot help introducing selfishness and
inconsistency, the bargaining spirit and petty reactionary tricks even
into this higher stage of the movement. We must now formulate the
immediate _concrete_ tasks of the revolution _differently_, in the name
of our program and in amplification of our program. What was adequate
yesterday is _inadequate today_. Yesterday, perhaps, the demand for the
recognition of the revolution was adequate as an advanced democratic
slogan. Today this is not enough. The revolution has forced even Mr.
Struve to recognise it. The advanced class must now define exactly _the
very content_ of the urgent and pressing tasks of this revolution. While
recognising the revolution, Messrs. the Struves again and again expose
their asses’ ears and strike up the old song about the possibility of a
peaceful outcome, about _Nicholas_ calling on the _Osvobozhdentsi_ to
take power, etc., etc. The _Osvobozhdentsi_ recognise the revolution in
order the more safely for themselves to conjure it away, to betray it.
It is our duty at the present time to show the proletariat and the whole
people the inadequacy of the slogan: “Revolution”; we must show how
necessary it is to have a dear and unambiguous, consistent and
determined definition of _the very content_ of the revolution. And this
definition is provided by the one slogan that is capable of correctly
expressing a “decisive victory” of the revolution, the slogan: for the
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry.^([5])

The misuse of terms is a most common practice in politics. The term
“Socialist,” for example, has often been appropriated by the supporters
of English bourgeois liberalism (“We are all Socialists now,”^([3]) said
Harcourt), by the supporters of Bismarck, and by the friends of Pope Leo
XIII. The term “revolution” also fully lends itself to misuse and at a
certain stage in the development of the movement such misuse is
inevitable. When Mr. Struve began to speak in the name of revolution I
involuntarily remembered Thiers. A few days before the February
revolution, this monstrous gnome, this most consummate expression of the
political corruption of the bourgeoisie, scented the approach of a
popular storm, and so he announced from the parliamentary tribune: that
he was _of the party of revolution_! (See Marx’s The Class Struggles in
France,^([6]) 1848-50.) The political significance of _Osvobozhdeniye_’s
turn to the party of revolution is _quite identical_ with that of
Thiers. The fact that the Russian Thiers are talking about their
belonging to the party of revolution shows that the slogan revolution
has become inadequate, meaningless and defines no tasks: for the
revolution has become a fact, and the most diverse elements are flocking
to its side.

Indeed, what is revolution from the Marxist point of view? The violent
break-up of the obsolete political superstructure, the contradiction
between which and the new relations of production caused its collapse at
a certain moment. The contradiction between the autocracy and the entire
structure of capitalist Russia, all the requirements of her
bourgeois-democratic development, has now caused its collapse, all the
more severe owing to the lengthy period in which this contradiction was
artificially sustained. The superstructure is cracking at every joint,
it is yielding to pressure, it is growing weaker. The people, through
the representatives of the most diverse classes and groups, must now, by
its own efforts, build a new superstructure for itself. At a certain
stage of development the uselessness of the old superstructure becomes
obvious to all. The revolution is recognised by all. The task now is to
define _which_ classes must build the new superstructure, and _how_ they
are to build it. If this is not defined, the slogan revolution is empty
and meaningless at the present time; for the feebleness of the autocracy
makes “revolutionaries” even of the Grand Dukes and of the Moskovskiye
Vyedomosti!^([7]) If this is not defined there can be no talk about the
advanced democratic tasks of the advanced class. This definition is
given in the slogan: the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and
the peasantry. This slogan defines the classes upon which the new
“builders” of the new superstructure can and must rely, the character of
the new superstructure (a “democratic” as distinct from a socialist
dictatorship), and how it is to be built (dictatorship, i.e., the
violent suppression of violent resistance, arming the revolutionary
classes of the people). Whoever now refuses to recognise this slogan of
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship, the slogan of a revolutionary
army, of a revolutionary government, of revolutionary peasant
committees, either hopelessly fails to understand the tasks of the
revolution, is unable to define the new and higher tasks that are called
forth by the present situation, or is deceiving the people, betraying
the revolution, misusing the slogan “revolution.”

The former case applies to Comrade Martynov and his friends. The latter
applies to Mr. Struve and the whole of the “constitutional-democratic”
Zemstvo party.

Comrade Martynov was so shrewd and smart that he hurled the charge of
“substituting” the term dictatorship for that of revolution just at the
time when the development of the revolution called for a definition of
its tasks by the slogan dictatorship! Actually, Comrade Martynov again
had the misfortune to remain at the tail end, to get stranded at the
penultimate stage, to _find himself on the level_, _of
Osvobozhdeniye_-ism, for it is precisely to the political stand of
_Osvobozhdeniye_, i.e., to the interests of the liberal monarchist
bourgeoisie, that recognition of “revolution” (in words) and refusal to
recognise the democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry (i.e., revolution in deeds) now corresponds. The liberal
bourgeoisie, through the mouth of Mr. Struve, is now expressing itself
in favour of revolution. The class-conscious proletariat, through the
mouths of the revolutionary Social-Democrats, is demanding the
dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry. And here the wiseacre
of the new _Iskra_ intervenes in the controversy and yells: don’t dare
“substitute” the term dictatorship for that of revolution! Well, is it
not true that the false stand taken by the new-Iskraists dooms them to
be constantly dragging along at the tail of _Osvobozhdeniye_-ism?

We have shown that the _Osvobozhdentsi_ are ascending (not without
encouraging prods by the Social-Democrats) step by step in the matter of
recognising democracy. At first the issue in the dispute between us was:
the Shipov system (rights and an authoritative Zemstvo) or
constitutionalism? Then it was: limited suffrage or universal suffrage?
Later: recognition of the revolution or a stock-jobber’s bargain with
the autocracy? Finally, now it is: recognition of the revolution without
the dictatorship of the proletariat and the peasantry or recognition of
the demand for a dictatorship of these classes in the democratic
revolution? It is possible and probable that Messrs. the
_Osvobozhdentsi_ (whether the present ones or their successors in the
Left wing of the bourgeois democrats makes no difference) will ascend
another step, i.e., recognise in time (perhaps by the time Comrade
Martynov goes up one more step) the slogan of dictatorship also. This
will inevitably be so if the Russian revolution continues to forge ahead
successfully and achieves a decisive victory. What will be the position
of Social-Democracy then? The complete victory of the present revolution
will mark the end of the democratic revolution and the beginning of a
determined struggle for a socialist revolution. The satisfaction of the
demands of the present-day peasantry, the utter rout of reaction, and
the winning of a democratic republic will mark the complete end of the
revolutionism of the bourgeoisie and even of the petty bourgeoisie—will
mark the beginning of the real struggle of the proletariat for
Socialism. The more complete the democratic revolution, the sooner, the
more widespread, the purer and the more determined will be the
development of this new struggle. The slogan of a “democratic”
dictatorship expresses the historically limited nature of the present
revolution and the necessity of a new struggle on the basis of the new
order for the complete emancipation of the working class from all
oppression and all exploitation. In other words: when the democratic
bourgeoisie or petty bourgeoisie ascends another step, when not only the
revolution but the complete victory of the revolution becomes an
accomplished fact, we shall “substitute” (perhaps amid the horrified
cries of new, future, Martynovs) for the slogan of the democratic
dictatorship, the slogan of a socialist dictatorship of the proletariat,
i.e., of a complete socialist revolution.

Notes

^([1]) First published in 1901. See present edition, Vol. 5, pp.
31-80.–Ed. —_Lenin_

^([2]) Restrain your laughter, friends! —_Lenin_

^([3]) These words are in English in the original.–Ed.—_Lenin_

^([4]) Engels’s article, “The Bakunists at Work. Review of the Uprising
in Spain in the Summer of 1873” was translated into Russian under
Lenin’s editorship and in 1905 was published in Geneva by the Central
Committee of the R.S.D.L.P. in the form of a pamphlet. A second edition
came out in 1906 in St. Petersburg.

Written by Marx and Engels in March 1850, the Address to the Central
Committee to the Communist League was published in Russian in 1906 as a
supplement to the pamphlet _The Cologne Communist Trial_, brought out by
the Molot Publishers in St. Petersburg.

^([5]) PLACEHOLDER

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

 

III. The Vulgar Bourgeois Representation of Dictatorship and Marx’s View of It

Mehring^([4]) tells us in his notes to Marx’s articles from the _Neue
Rheinische Zeitung_ of 1848 that he published, that one of the
reproaches levelled at this newspaper by bourgeois publications was that
it had allegedly demanded “the immediate introduction of a dictatorship
as the sole means of achieving democracy” (Marx, _Nachlass_, Volume III,
p. 53). From the vulgar bourgeois standpoint the terms dictatorship and
democracy are mutually exclusive. Failing to understand the theory of
class struggle, and accustomed to seeing in the political arena the
petty squabbling of the various bourgeois circles and coteries, the
bourgeois conceives dictatorship to mean the annulment of all the
liberties and guarantees of democracy, tyranny of every kind, and every
sort of abuse of power in the personal interests of a dictator. In
essence, it is precisely this vulgar bourgeois view that is manifested
in the writings of our Martynov, who winds up his “new campaign” in the
new _Iskra_ by attributing the partiality of the _Vperyod_ and the
_Proletary_ for the slogan of dictatorship to Lenin’s “passionate desire
to try his luck” (_Iskra_, No. 103, p. 3, col. 2). In order to explain
to Martynov the meaning of the term class dictatorship as distinct from
personal dictatorship, and the tasks of a democratic dictatorship as
distinct from those of a socialist dictatorship, it would not be amiss
to dwell on the views of the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_.

“Every provisional organisation of the state after a revolution,” wrote
the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ on September 14, 1848, “requires a
dictatorship, and an energetic dictatorship at that. From the very
beginning we have reproached Camphausen” (the head of the Ministry after
March 8, 1848) “for not acting dictatorially, for not having immediately
smashed up and eliminated the remnants of the old institutions. And
while Herr Camphausen was lulling himself with constitutional illusions,
the defeated party (i.e., the party of reaction) strengthened its
positions in the bureaucracy, and in the army, and here and there even
began to venture upon open struggle.”^([5])

These words, Mehring justly remarks, sum up in a few propositions all
that was propounded in detail in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ in long
articles on the Camphausen Ministry. What do these words of Marx tell
us? That a provisional revolutionary government must act dictatorially
(a proposition which the _Iskra_ was totally unable to grasp since it
was fighting shy of the slogan: dictatorship) and that the task of such
a dictatorship is to destroy the remnants of the old institutions (which
is precisely what was clearly stated in the resolution of the Third
Congress of the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party about the
struggle against counterrevolution, and what was omitted in the
resolution of the Conference, as we showed above). Thirdly, and lastly,
it follows from these words that Marx castigated the bourgeois democrats
for entertaining “constitutional illusions” in a period of revolution
and open civil war. The meaning of these words becomes particularly
obvious from the article in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ of June 6,
l848. “A Constituent National Assembly,” wrote Marx, “must first of all
be an active, revolutionary-active assembly. The Frankfurt Assembly,
however, is busying itself with school exercises in parliamentarism
while allowing the government to act. Let us assume that this learned
assembly succeeds after mature consideration in working out the best
possible agenda and the best possible constitution. But what is the use
of the best possible agenda and of the best possible constitution, if
the German governments have in the meantime placed the bayonet on the
agenda?”^([6])

That is the meaning of the slogan: dictatorship. We can judge from this
what Marx’s attitude would have been towards resolutions which call a
“decision to organise a constituent assembly” a decisive victory, or
which invite us to “remain the party of extreme revolutionary
opposition”!

Major questions in the life of nations are settled only by force. The
reactionary classes themselves are usually the first to resort to
violence, to civil war; they are the first to “place the bayonet on the
agenda,” as the Russian autocracy has been doing systematically and
undeviatingly everywhere ever since January 9. And since such a
situation has arisen, since the bayonet has really become the main point
on the political agenda, since insurrection has proved to be imperative
and urgent—constitutional illusions and school exercises in
parliamentarism become only a screen for the bourgeois betrayal of the
revolution, a screen to conceal the fact that the bourgeoisie is
“recoiling” from the revolution. It is therefore the slogan of
dictatorship that the genuinely revolutionary class must advance.

On the question of the tasks of this dictatorship Marx wrote, already in
the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ [of June 6, l848]: “The National Assembly
should have acted dictatorially against the reactionary attempts of the
obsolete governments; the force of public opinion in its favour would
then have been so strong as to shatter all bayonets.... But this
Assembly bores the German people instead of carrying the people with it
or being carried away by it [them].”^([7]) In Marx’s opinion, the
National Assembly should have “eliminated from the regime actually
existing in Germany everything that contradicted the principle of the
sovereignty of the people,” then it should have “consolidated the
revolutionary ground on which it stands in order to make the sovereignty
of the people, won by the revolution, secure against all attacks.”^([8])

Thus, the tasks which Marx set before a revolutionary government or
dictatorship in 1848 amounted in substance primarily to a _democratic_
revolution: defence against counterrevolution and the actual elimination
of everything that contradicted the sovereignty of the people. This is
nothing else than a revolutionary-democratic dictatorship.

To proceed: which classes, in Marx’s opinion, could and should have
achieved this task (actually to exercise to the full the principle of
the sovereignty of the people and to beat off the attacks of the
counterrevolution)? Marx speaks of the “people.” But we know that he
always ruthlessly combated the petty-bourgeois illusions about the unity
of the “people” and about the absence of a class struggle within the
people. In using the word “people,” Marx did not thereby gloss over
class distinctions, but combined definite elements that were capable of
carrying the revolution to completion.

After the victory of the Berlin proletariat on March 18, wrote the _Neue
Rheinische Zeitung_[of June 14, 1848], the results of the revolution
proved to be twofold: “On the one hand the arming of the people, the
right of association, the sovereignty of the people actually attained;
on the other hand, the preservation of the monarchy and the
Camphausen-Hansemann Ministry, i.e., the government of representatives
of the big bourgeoisie. Thus, the revolution had two series of results,
which had inevitably to diverge. The people had achieved victory, it had
won liberties of a decisive democratic nature, but the direct power
passed not into its hands, but into those of the big bourgeoisie. In a
word, the revolution was not completed. The people allowed the big
bourgeois to form a ministry, and the big bourgeois immediately
displayed their strivings by offering an alliance to the old Prussian
nobility and bureaucracy. Arnim, Canitz and Schwerin joined the
Ministry.

“_The upper bourgeoisie, ever anti-revolutionary, concluded a defensive
end offensive alliance with the reaction out of fear of the people, that
is to say, the workers and the democratic bourgeoisie_.” (Our
italics.)^([9])

Thus, not only a “decision to organise a constituent assembly,” but even
its actual convocation is insufficient for a decisive victory of the
revolution! Even after a partial victory in an armed struggle (the
victory of the Berlin workers over the troops on March 18, 1848) an
“incomplete” revolution, a revolution “that has not been carried to
completion,” is possible. On what, then, does its completion depend? It
depends on whose hands the immediate rule passes into, whether into the
hands of the Petrunkeviches and Rodichevs, that is to say, the
Camphausens and the Hansemanns, or into the hands of the _people_, i.e.,
the workers and the democratic bourgeoisie. In the first case the
bourgeoisie will possess power, and the proletariat “freedom of
criticism.” freedom to “remain the party of extreme revolutionary
opposition.” Immediately after the victory, the bourgeoisie will
conclude an alliance with the reaction (this would inevitably happen in
Russia too, if, for example, the St. Petersburg workers gained only a
partial victory in street fighting with the troops and left it to
Messrs. Petrunkeviches and Co. to form a government). In the second
case, a revolutionary-democratic dictatorship, i.e., the complete
victory of the revolution, would be possible.

It now remains to define more precisely what Marx really meant by
“democratic bourgeoisie” (_demokratische Bürgerschaft_), which together
with the workers he called the people, in contradistinction to the big
bourgeoisie.

A clear answer to this question is supplied by the following passage
from an article in the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ of July 30, 1848:
“...The German revolution of 1848 is only a parody of the French
revolution of 1789.

“On August 4, 1789, three weeks after the storming of the Bastille, the
French people in a single day prevailed over all the feudal burdens.

“On July 11, 1848, four months after the March barricades, the feudal
burdens prevailed over the German people. Teste Gierke cum
Hansemanno.^([1])

“The French bourgeoisie of 1789 did not for a moment leave its allies,
the peasants, in the lurch. It knew that the foundation of its rule was
the destruction of feudalism in the countryside, the creation of a free
landowning (_grundbesitzenden_) peasant class.

“The German bourgeoisie of 1848 is without the least compunction
betraying the peasants, who are its most natural allies, the flesh of
its flesh, and without whom it is powerless against the nobility.

“The continuance of feudal rights, their sanction under the guise of
(illusory) redemption—such is the result of the German revolution of
1848. The mountain brought forth a mouse.”^([10])

This is a very instructive passage: it gives us four important
propositions: 1) The incompleted German revolution differs from the
completed French revolution in that the German bourgeoisie betrayed not
only democracy in general, but also the peasantry in particular. 2) The
foundation for the full consummation of a democratic revolution is the
creation of a free class of peasants. 3) The creation of such a class
means the abolition of feudal burdens, the destruction of feudalism, but
does not yet mean a socialist revolution. 4) The peasants are the “most
natural” allies of the bourgeoisie, that is to say, of the democratic
bourgeoisie, which without them is “powerless” against the reaction.

Making proper allowances for concrete national peculiarities and
substituting serfdom for feudalism, all these propositions can be fully
applied to Russia in 1905. There is no doubt that by learning from the
experience of Germany, as elucidated by Marx, we cannot arrive at any
other slogan for a decisive victory of the revolution than: a
revolutionary-democratic dictatorship of the proletariat and the
peasantry. There is no doubt that the chief components of the “people,”
whom Marx in 1848 contrasted with the resisting reactionaries and the
treacherous bourgeoisie, are the proletariat and the peasantry. There is
no doubt that in Russia too the liberal bourgeoisie and the gentlemen of
the Osvobozhdeniye League are betraying and will continue to betray the
peasantry, i.e., will confine themselves to a pseudo reform and taking
the side of the landlords in the decisive battle between them and the
peasantry. Only the proletariat is capable of supporting the peasantry
to the end in this struggle. There is no doubt, finally, that in Russia
also the success of the peasant struggle, i.e., the transfer of the
whole of the land to the peasantry, will signify a complete democratic
revolution and constitute the social support of the revolution carried
to its completion, but it will by no means be a socialist revolution, or
“socialisation” that the ideologists of the petty bourgeoisie, the
Socialist-Revolutionaries talk about. The success of the peasant
insurrection, the victory of the democratic revolution will merely clear
the way for a genuine and decisive struggle for Socialism on the basis
of a democratic republic. In this struggle the peasantry as a landowning
class will play the same treacherous, vacillating part as is now being
played by the bourgeoisie in the struggle for democracy. To forget this
is to forget Socialism, to deceive oneself and others as to the real
interests and tasks of the proletariat.

In order to leave no gaps in the presentation of the views held by Marx
in 1848, it is necessary to note one essential difference between German
Social-Democracy of that time (or the Communist Party of the
Proletariat, to use the language of that period) and present-day Russian
Social Democracy. Here is what Mehring says:

“The _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ appeared in the political arena as the
’organ of democracy.’ There is no mistaking the thread that ran through
all its articles. But in the direct sense, it championed the interests
of the bourgeois revolution against absolutism and feudalism more than
the interests of the proletariat against the bourgeoisie. Very little is
to be found in its columns about the separate working-class movement
during the years of the revolution, although one should not forget that
along with it there appeared twice a week, under the editorship of Moll
and Schapper, a special organ of the Cologne Workers’ League.^([11])
[Zeitung des Arbeiter-Vereins zu Köln] At any rate, the present day
reader will be struck by the little attention the _Neue Rheinische
Zeitung_ paid to the German working-class movement of its day, although
its most capable mind, Stephan Born, was a pupil of Marx and Engels in
Paris and Brussels and in 1848 was the Berlin correspondent for their
newspaper. Born relates in his _Memoirs_ that Marx and Engels never
expressed a single word in disapproval of his agitation among the
workers; nevertheless, it appears probable from subsequent declarations
of Engels’ that they were dissatisfied, at least with the methods of
this agitation. Their dissatisfaction was justified inasmuch as Born was
obliged to make many concessions to the as yet totally undeveloped class
consciousness of the proletariat in the greater part of Germany,
concessions which do not stand the test of criticism from the viewpoint
of the _Communist Manifesto_. Their dissatisfaction was unjustified
inasmuch as Born managed nonetheless to maintain the agitation conducted
by him on a relatively high plane. . . . Without doubt, Marx and Engels
were historically and politically right in thinking that the primary
interest of the working class was to push the bourgeois revolution
forward as far as possible. . . . Nevertheless, a remarkable proof of
how the elementary instinct of the working-class movement is able to
correct the conceptions of the greatest minds is provided by the fact
that in April 1849 they declared in favour of a specific workers’
organisation and decided to participate in the workers’ congress, which
was being prepared especially by the East Elbe (Eastern Prussia)
proletariat.”

Thus, it was only in April 1849, after the revolutionary newspaper had
been appearing for almost a year (the _Neue Rheinische Zeitung_ began
publication on June 1, 1848) that Marx and Engels declared in favour of
a special workers’ organisation! Until then they were merely running an
“organ of democracy” unconnected by any organisational ties with an
independent workers’ party. This fact, monstrous and improbable as it
may appear from our present-day standpoint, clearly shows us what an
enormous difference there is between the German Social-Democratic Party
of those days and the Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party of today.
This fact shows how much less the proletarian features of the movement,
the proletarian current within it, were in evidence in the German
democratic revolution (because of the backwardness of Germany in 1848
both economically and politically—its disunity as a state). This should
not be forgotten in judging Marx’s repeated declarations during this
period and somewhat later about the need for organising an independent
proletarian party. Marx arrived at this practical conclusion only as a
result of the experience of the democratic revolution, almost a year
later—so philistine, so petty-bourgeois was the whole atmosphere in
Germany at that time. To us this conclusion is an old and solid
acquisition of half a century’s experience of international
Social-Democracy—an acquisition with which we _began_ to organise the
Russian Social-Democratic Labour Party. In our case there can be no
question, for instance, of revolutionary proletarian newspapers being
outside the Social-Democratic Party of the proletariat, or of their
appearing even for a moment simply as “organs of democracy.”

But the contrast which had hardly begun to reveal itself between Marx
and Stephan Born exists in our case in a form which is more developed by
reason of the more powerful manifestation of the proletarian current in
the democratic stream of our revolution. Speaking of the probable
dissatisfaction of Marx and Engels with the agitation conducted by
Stephan Born, Mehring expresses himself too mildly and too evasively.
Here is what Engels wrote of Born in 1885 (in his preface to the
_Enthüllungen über den Kommunistenprocess zu Köln_. Zürich, 1885^([2])
):

The members of the Communist League^([12]) everywhere stood at the head
of the extreme democratic movement, proving thereby that the League was
an excellent school of revolutionary action. “. . . the compositor
Stephan Born, who had worked in Brussels and Paris as an active member
of the League, founded a Workers’ Brotherhood” (“Arbeiterverbruderung”)
“in Berlin which became fairly widespread and existed until 1850. Born,
a very talented young man, who, however, was a bit too much in a hurry
to become a big political figure, ‘fraternised’ with the most
miscellaneous ragtag and bobtail” (Kreti und Plethi) “in order to get a
crowd together, and was not at all the man who could bring unity into
the conflicting tendencies, light into the chaos. Consequently, in the
official publications of the association the views represented in the
_Communist Manifesto_ were mingled hodgepodge with guild recollections
and guild aspirations, fragments of Louis Blanc and Proudhon,
protectionism, etc.; in short, they wanted to please everybody [_allen
alles sein_].” “_In particular, strikes, trade unions and producers’
co-operatives were set going and it was forgotten that above all it was
a question of first conquering, by means of political victories, the
field_ in which alone such things could be realised on a lasting basis.”
(Our italics.) “When, afterwards. the victories of the reaction made the
leaders of the Brotherhood realise the necessity of taking a direct part
in the revolutionary struggle, they were naturally left in the lurch by
the confused mass which they had grouped around themselves. Born took
part in the Dresden uprising in May, 1849 and had a lucky escape. But,
in contrast to the great political movement of the proletariat, the
Workers’ Brotherhood proved to be a pure _Sonderbund_ [separate league],
which to a large extent existed only on paper and played such a
subordinate role that the reaction did not find it necessary to suppress
it until 1850, and its surviving branches until several years later.
Born, whose real name was Buttermilch^([3]) has not become a big
political figure but a petty Swiss professor, who no longer translates
Marx into guild language but the meek Renan into his own fulsome
German.”^([13])

That is how Engels judged the two tactics of Social Democracy in the
democratic revolution!

Our new-Iskraists are also pushing towards “Economism,” and with such
unreasonable zeal as to earn the praises of the monarchist bourgeoisie
for their “seeing the light.” They too collect around themselves a
motley crowd, flattering the “Economists,” demagogically attracting the
undeveloped masses by the slogans of “initiative,” “democracy,”
“autonomy,” etc., etc. Their labour unions, too, exist only on the pages
of the Khlestakov-type^([14]) new _Iskra_. Their slogans and resolutions
betray a similar failure to understand the tasks of the “great political
movement of the proletariat.”

Notes

^([1]) “Witnesses: Herr Gierke and Herr Hansemann.” Hansemann was a
minister who represented the party of the big bourgeoisie (Russian
counterpart: Trubetskoy or Rodichev, and the like); Gierke was Minister
of Agriculture in the Hansemann Cabinet, who drew up a plan, a “bold”
plan for “abolishing feudal burdens,” professedly “without
compensation,” but in fact for abolishing only the minor and unimportant
burdens while preserving or granting compensation for the more essential
ones. Herr Gierke was something like the Russian Messrs. Kablukov,
Manuilov. Hertzenstein and similar bourgeois liberal friends of the
muzhik who desire the “extension of peasant landownership” but do not
wish to offend the landlords. —_Lenin_

^([2]) Revelations About the Cologne Communist Trial, Zürich, 1885.–Ed.
—_Lenin_

^([3]) In translating Engels I made a mistake in the first edition by
taking the word _Buttermilch_ to be not a proper noun but a common noun.
This mistake naturally afforded great delight to the Mensheviks. Koltsov
wrote that I had “rendered Engels more profound” (reprinted in _Two
Years_, a collection of articles) and Plekhanov even now recalls this
mistake in the Tovarishch^([15])—in short, it afforded _an excellent
pretext to slur over the question of the two tendencies in the
working-class movement_ of 1848 in Germany, the Born tendency (akin to
our Economists) and the Marxist tendency. To take advantage of the
mistake of an opponent, even if it was only on the question of Born’s
name, is more than natural. But to use a correction to a translation to
slur over the question of the two tactics is to dodge the real issue.
[Author’s note to the 1907 edition.—Ed.)] —_Lenin_

^([4]) PLACEHOLDER

^([5]) PLACEHOLDER

^([6]) PLACEHOLDER

^([7]) PLACEHOLDER

^([8]) PLACEHOLDER

^([9]) PLACEHOLDER

^([10]) PLACEHOLDER

^([11]) PLACEHOLDER

^([12]) PLACEHOLDER

^([15]) PLACEHOLDER

^([13]) PLACEHOLDER

^([14]) PLACEHOLDER

 
